#750 - Is Filled With Intertwine


Any people in these super expert, place in Central Region are to dominate a character of side!

Life and Death Realm expert, quite Battle Saint expert on deep sea Continent.

For example Ning Yudie just broke through Life and Death Realm, quite in first-order Battle Saint.

Life and Death Realm expert, is Battle Saint Realm expert, must experience Life and Death Tribulation, smokes Small Heavenly Tribulation in mouth.

Small Heavenly Tribulation regarding martial artist, is not only a Life and Death tribulation, is a test.

After entering Life and Death Realm, passed Small Heavenly Tribulation to promote Divine Sea Realm several times, but this so-called “”was several times different regarding each martial artist, but wants to promote Divine Sea, least must experience five times, to six Small Heavenly Tribulation.

Moreover a martial artist talent is higher, experience Small Heavenly Tribulation are more, enters the strength after Divine Sea Realm to be also more formidable!

Therefore Small Heavenly Tribulation number of times how much, weighs a martial artist future future.

In Sea God Continent has many Battle Saint expert, but the batch of Battle Saint expert of present, are the elites in Battle Saint, they are away from surmount Divine Sea Realm to have one step remote! Therefore basically is six steps, even seven step Battle Saint.

These Battle Saint passed six times, even seven Life and Death Realm.

And the any/random person stands, Cui Xie formidable many of strength scale over four Life and Death Tribulation!

In other words, the casual person comes Central Region, can sweep away entire Central Region!

This grade of terrifying existence, unexpectedly came over a hundred people!

Many martial artist in Under Heaven Merchant Union see this, is the what kind of heart startled?

Shi Kefan, Yan Yueshan and Mo Haishan three people feel creepy feeling immediately, the vest send coolly, previous time faces Heavenly Evil Sect, in addition they have with the courage that it fights, is now facing these super expert, they then do not have including the energy of revolt!

The strength disparity was too big, any revolt is the futile effort.

For all this, Shi Kefan braces oneself to fly goes, has done obeisance doing obeisance toward numerous super expert, “I am Under Heaven Merchant Union Union Master, sees from Divine Country expert!”

Is Situ Haotian of head looked at a present fatty lightly, was opens the mouth to ask: “Luo Zheng?”

The Shi Kefan strength is no doubt good, but also merely aims at Central Region expert, in the Situ Haotian eye, but is Peak Battle Venerable, like Shi Kefan this realm martial artist, only use on Sea God Continent, scrambles for the Tower of Evil top layer seat.

Moreover in the Situ Haotian heart has evaluated the Shi Kefan strength silently, even if the strength of this person in Peak Battle Venerable is also, perhaps had been inferior compared with it Zhao Fenqin and Zhou Zhuhe, is more impossible to compare Monster Night Race and demon race's these Peak Battle Venerable.

Hears this Divine Sea Realm to ask Luo Zheng at present greatly, on the Shi Kefan face reveals the hesitant color, said honestly, stands in the Merchant Union Union Master position, he should now without hesitation cups one hand in the other across the chest to deliver Luo Zheng, for lasting of Under Heaven Merchant Union, this is he most correct procedure, relates Merchant Union and Luo Zheng's pretends non-involvement completely.

These Divine Country expert, should be insufficient to be interested in his Merchant Union.

But Luo Zheng after all has the great merit to his Under Heaven Merchant Union, although his Shi Kefan bragged the businessman, but made him so betray Luo Zheng, was very difficult to achieve.

But as Merchant Union Union Master, he cannot be unfair to Under Heaven Merchant Union!

“Big Brother!”

Yan Yueshan has been roaring to Shi Kefan.

How they could not see that Shi Kefan does hesitate because of what?

It looks like in Yan Yueshan, these expert at all are not they can resist, even if they want to shelter Luo Zheng, is fights a hopeless battle!

Shi Kefan sighed the one breath darkly, in the heart thought that, thinks that Luo Zheng will not blame itself, let alone Luo Zheng in Heaven's Awakening City, now wants to run away is impossible......

However Shi Kefan has not opened the mouth, the escaping light actually flies to shoot to come from Heaven's Awakening City together, future Luo Zheng.

Under Heaven Merchant Union many Elder and three fatty Union Master turned head to look at the past, saw that the Luo Zheng air/Qi calmed down the idle appearance, on the face reveals the incomparably stunned expression.

Can this fellow be so indifferent? As if simply hasn't placed in these over a hundred Divine Country expert the eye?

Does Luo Zheng have the means to resist them really?

Stunned may incessantly be the Under Heaven Merchant Union high levels, in Heaven's Awakening City, the innumerable Merchant Union deacons secretly is observing the condition on sky with martial artist, on the face of each martial artist is covering cold frost, sees this, the blind people know, Heaven's Awakening City was very dangerous!

Under glare of the public eye, Luo Zheng actually flutters to Situ Haotian in front, shows a light smiling face, immediately said: “The previous skyhawk prairie leaves, thought never, has not thought that will summon helps one another, Luo Zheng deeply feels ashamed!”

Situ Haotian is light smiles, “the Young Hero Luo Zheng word crossed, you give the environment that we human race create, perhaps for generations will suffer the good fortune owing to the merits of ancestors, this minor matter, mentioned without the foot.”

A Luo Zheng person reverses the pattern in Tower of Evil, to the influence and significance that Purple Heart Sacred Ground has is very profound, so long as gives human race enough time, in the future will certainly become the large clan who in Sea God Continent ranks among the best, how is Purple Heart Sacred Ground ungrateful to Luo Zheng?

Also this reason, Situ Haotian personally will walk.

Luo Zheng smiles lightly, the side little red ray dissipates, these rays twine, the congealment, transforms a slender body afterward, is Luo Zheng's sword spirit, smokes.

Is smoking the flash of presenting, the Monster Night Race six Divine Sea Realm big energies, dozens Life and Death Realm expert fly high the posture that makes to knee down, is facing smoking, saying with one voice: “See my king!”

Dozens Life and Death Realm expert and several Divine Sea Realm big energies, such respectful pays respect...... Luo Zheng's that sword spirit?

In Heaven's Awakening City, Shi Kefan, Yan Yueshan and Mo Haishan, many Elder, martial artist in innumerable Merchant Union in this moment are dumbfounded, the head suddenly somewhat turned unable to turn around......

This already thorough subverted their world outlooks......

Is this matter?

These people, as if are not Great Yu Divine Country expert.

Are these people the reinforcements in Luo Zheng mouth?

Will the reinforcements, why side sword spirit to Luo Zheng so be also respectful? Has a need for line of so big rituals?

In Central Region, does not have Divine Country, among martial artist, wants to come also to take the strength as Venerable.

Even if Cui Xie, has not let the qualifications that the person kneels pays respect.

After all everybody is martial artist, everyone refuses to accept anyone, your Cui Xie indeed is fierce, but absolutely does not have fiercely to that degree!

Let one crowd of Void Tribulation Realm martial artist kneel pays respect to your Cui Xie? No way, let alone other Life and Death Realm expert......

Only if after establishing Divine Country, constructs one monarchy system, may make entire Central Region martial artist submit, this also requires the long time, the consolidated imperial authority, making in Central Region numerous martial artist approve you are their monarchies, has the qualifications said character who the sovereign proclaims oneself emperor......

Even so, truly competent expert, as before not with your line of so big rituals.

But at present these Divine Sea Realm big energies, true kneeling in the smoking front, on the face that reverent meaning completely has stemmed from the innermost feelings, does not camouflage!

Shi Kefan could not speak at this time, if can speak, he really wants loudly to shout one now, Blue Heaven, the earth, who tells me now, exactly what happened!

Even to break their brains, cannot find out Luo Zheng side sword spirit, is the Monster Night Race king, is the spirit symbol of control entire Monster Night Race, in upper realm, don't said that was Divine Sea Realm expert, even if the strength far ratio smoked formidable these Realm Lord, same must pay respect to smoke, in their eyes, this was a normal matter!

Smoked lightly glances several Divine Sea Realm to be able greatly, immediately saying gently: “Dispense with ceremony.”

These Monster Night Race expert, this drew out the body, respectful drawing back in one side.

Shi Kefan hesitant fluttering to Luo Zheng's side, gingerly asking: “Luo, Brother Luo Zheng, this, this what's the matter?”

That Situ Haotian called Luo Zheng, was Young Hero Luo Zheng, Luo Zheng was symmetric by the person of the same generation with that Situ Haotian, Shi Kefan thought suddenly, oneself did call “Brother Luo Zheng”somewhat to overstep again?

But this Luo Zheng is only 20 years old skeletal age, his can Shi Kefan call him for “Luo Zheng Lord”? This also too not like, even if Cui Xie cannot take on Shi Kefan so to call!

Shi Kefan was filled with intertwine.

( Today returns to one's old home, on the road has delayed, faint, but before 12 points, wants four! Must clench teeth!)





#751 - Gluttonous


Where does Luo Zheng know in the Shi Kefan heart to be so puzzled?

However sees the appearance that Shi Kefan stutters, Luo Zheng also knows, perhaps he was given startled arrived by Situ Haotian this group of people.

Therefore Luo Zheng comforting said: “Union Master Shi, don't worry, these people are the friends who in the two years the time knows.”

“Friend......”

Shi Kefan indeed was not worried that he was not only not worried, but also delighted, has this kind of group of people to assume personal command, what is Great Yu Divine Country?

But where Luo Zheng in the two years went to, has known such one crowd unexpectedly “friend”.

This must have big face, can invite this kind of group of friends!

Yan Yueshan is always irritable, he wishes one could now on pulling Luo Zheng, making Luo Zheng tell him the reason of entire matter, but these over a hundred expert assume personal command in side, Yan Yueshan where dares to speak?

As for Mo Haishan, his words were quite few, on that plump and fair-complected face does not have many expressions, now seems like most normal, is only his innermost feelings shocking degree, naturally does not need any person to be few.

“Friend, good, friend!”Shi Kefan has gawked a while, builds the smiling face of whole face, immediately said: “Since is the Luo Zheng's friend, my Under Heaven Merchant Union from, when must host a banquet to welcome! Quick, please enter in Heaven's Awakening City quickly!”

Shi Kefan where dares to have slight neglecting at this time?

However the Shi Kefan words said that Situ Haotian and the others on the faces did not have any expression, even the polite smiling face did not have continually.

Shi Kefan in Central Region perhaps is the famous character, as Merchant Union most important Union Master, the influence is nothing less than big, in the Situ Haotian eye is actually only a being nothing to speak of small role.

These over a hundred Sea God Continent expert, only sell the face that Luo Zheng and smokes.

Sees their aloof appearances, the Shi Kefan also awkward scratching the head section, does not know that said any good, only then with begging the look is looking at Luo Zheng.

Luo Zheng quite does not let Shi Kefan extremely in poverty-stricken, therefore shows a faint smile, said to Situ Haotian: “The Haotian/clear sky senior, came from far away, my Luo Zheng naturally must receive cordially well, but also please enter a city a to chat.”

Situ Haotian then nods, many expert follower Luo Zheng, flies toward Heaven's Awakening City.

In Heaven's Awakening City in resplendent in gold and jade green main hall, over a hundred wide tables set up in an array, transmission that assorted beautiful woman shuttle in, fine cooked food are too busy.

Receives these expert, where Under Heaven Merchant Union has slight neglecting? It can be said that this is Merchant Union in history, the reception of highest specification!

Various types of fine food, come up just like the running water general end.

These food, majority are the valuable things in Merchant Union warehouse, some food are seven levels, even is on eight levels of monster beast the most precious spot.

In Heaven's Awakening City is abundance of capable people, is not only Pill Refining Master, refiner master these, the chef is also entire Central Region most top, cooked food that so processes, standard naturally also first-class.

However, making one that Shi Kefan and the others shocked appear randomly.

Many martial artist in Central Region have not thought, these expert table manners are actually so ugly, is full of praise to various emaciated looks, while the magnanimous tiger swallows the sea to drink.

Shi Kefan loves dearly not actually, the wealth of Under Heaven Merchant Union, far exceeds any sect, poverty how can eat?

Shi Kefan cannot think absolutely, these Life and Death Realm expert, Divine Sea Realm can see these cooked food greatly, entered a city general just like the country dweller, as if several lifetime have not eaten the so delicious thing, indeed make them somewhat unable to think through.

Shi Kefan cannot think through, Luo Zheng is actually very clear reason.

Situ Haotian no doubt is looking down upon the Central Region martial artist strength, is born a Life and Death Realm expert incomparable misery in Central Region, but in Sea God Continent, Life and Death Realm is also expert of Battle Saint rank, even assumes sole responsibility for an important task continually cannot achieve, two Continent radically are not a strength of scale.

However, since entire Sea God Continent has been in the confusion, among several sacred ground, attacks mutually, erupts various conflicts regarding Tower of Evil, each race must face the survival the crisis.

Under this environment, Purple Heart Sacred Ground, is other sacred ground, the first important matter is to develop martial skill, trains expert, where will be born the culture of what food and drink? Regarding martial artist, so long as were not unpalatable were good, was unpalatable, to survive also to swallow forcefully.

In fact in Sea God Continent besides having many expert, in other aspects, for example the literary arts, vocal music wait/etc. aspects, are well below Central Region to be broad and profound, their first important matter is the survival, is formidable!

Compares Central Region to want lucky many, the space that other races simply have not developed, after human race occupied Central Region, the crisis that at least has not survived, has, is only conflict between human race and human race, can therefore be born the colorful culture in the river of history.

Eats the person mouth to be short, causes difficulties for others leniently, numerous expert on Sea God Continent ate happily, the atmosphere also enlivened actually, Situ Haotian was also merry with Shi Kefan, understood in Central Region to Shi Kefan the human race condition and development wait/etc..

Shi Kefan is also glib, the nature answered to Situ Haotian one by one.

After the food and drink, is several hundred wears the beautiful woman of long skirt to enter in the palace, plays with the sounds of various string and woodwind instruments, a beautiful woman also dances lightly......

That night, Merchant Union people busy unbearable, to entertain this group of expert, Merchant Union also nursing the vigor caused.

Although Luo Zheng sits above the seat of honor, but on the face is actually hanging the smiling face of manipulation, his interest is actually not too high.

Ning Yudie that he most cares about, although there is a maid to look, but she static lying down on the bed, is unable to move as before.

After this Great Yu Divine Country expert deals with, he must personally walk four big Divine Country, nosed that ancient jade origin, but before then, Luo Zheng actually first requested to help in Situ Haotian they, having a look at them to have the means to treat Ning Yudie.

A night of music and song.

Regarding their this cultivation base characters, does not sleep several months, spirit is full of as before.

In Heavenly Star Hall, after Situ Haotian puts out a hand gives Ning Yudie to take the pulse, shook the head, the conclusion that results is also similar, “this female is not the serious illness, but the strength of life has dried up completely, to treat and cure with her, must seek for the thing of strength of supplement life.”

“On Sea God Continent has this type of thing to exist?”Luo Zheng anxious asking.

Situ Haotian shakes the head, “I have not seen on Continent, cannot conclude whether in Profound Nether Cave exists, if will explore in Profound Nether Cave to have this type of thing in the future, my Purple Heart Sacred Ground will certainly dispatch the person to deliver.”

On the Luo Zheng face revealed a reluctant smiling face, although he believes that Situ Haotian can live up to one's words, but not to mention in Profound Nether Cave whether had, but Luo Zheng actually could not wait for the too much time.

After all person the strength of life is consuming unceasingly, although he has supplemented strength of the part of life with the aid of that Li Hetai ancient jade to Ning Yudie, but that is also only a futile attempt, how long god knows can Ning Yudie support?

This way, Luo Zheng must go to four big Divine Country, looks for that ancient jade clue.

These over a hundred expert in Heaven's Awakening City stays, in the Luo Zheng heart eagerly is then hoping, hopes that Great Yu Divine Country that Heartless Reverend arrives at Central Region in a big hurry.

Only then after having solved this problem, Luo Zheng can.

But waited right and left, waited quick one month, actually as before disappeared, Luo Zheng was actually somewhat anxious, he even regretted to break that Eight Trigrams Mirror, otherwise he can also provoke through Eight Trigrams Mirror that Heartless Reverend, quite made him pass Chaotic Star Sea in a big hurry......

Luo Zheng worry, Situ Haotian and the others are not anxious.

Central Region perhaps not suitable cultivation, but is suitable to live, in Heaven's Awakening City these days, their days is very leisurely and carefree, has understood the good food and in the local conditions and social customs Central Region fully, after all with is human race, but the taste and aesthetic standard basically are interlinked.

As for these Monster Night Race expert, is less anxious, can accompany in the side of king, is they biggest being honored, they also for fear that smoke catch up with them to walk!

Situ Haotian leads hundred expert to arrive at Central Region 33 days later......

Sky over Chaotic Star Sea, six escaping light are advancing rapidly.

Through Chaotic Star Sea is not an easy matter, even if after the Star Sea storm stands still, but must face in Star Sea the endless ominous beast.

But ten levels, even the strengths of 11 levels of ominous beasts, are endure to compare existence of Divine Sea Realm expert!

Even if Heartless Reverend this Divine Sea Realm big energy, must be careful, do not provoke these ominous beasts for wonderful.





#752 - Star Sword Reverend


In six escaping light, two people are the Divine Sea Realm big energies, another four escaping light are Life and Death Realm expert.

Like Central Region such of martial artist guess, four big Divine Country indeed has not placed in Central Region the eye.

In four big Divine Country eyes, the place that Divine Country is, is this Great Thousand World center, in the opposite of vast ocean, is almost the barren lands.

As for that “Heavenly Northern Region”in the Middle Ages and ancient times time, in four big Divine Country had many martial artist to go, the place that but that bird did not defecate, absolutely did not have what chance to say, therefore four big Divine Country rarely had the risk that martial artist is willing to take to fall from the sky, entered Heavenly Northern Region, let alone consumed the big price to attack and occupy Heavenly Northern Region.

Therefore from ancient to present, comes Heavenly Northern Region martial artist, is some offends expert that the Divine Country choice has become a fugitive, under has no way out, they can choose to live in seclusion in Central Region actually.

This difference.

Because of saintess's instruction, certainly wants Heartless Reverend to trample flat that behavior “Cloud Hall”a small fourth grade sect influence......

Before this Heartless Reverend cannot master, the solemn Great Yu Divine Country saintess, why to small sect on Heavenly Northern Region beyond several tens of thousands miles will lose one's temper.

After the understanding, Heartless Reverend actually understood, originally that was called the Luo Zheng's boy, once crime saintess.

If pure is this reason, perhaps Heartless Reverend personally will not go into action, he as the Divine Sea Realm big energy, does not obey orders in the saintess directly.

He comes the Heavenly Northern Region reason, nature, because the secret in Luo Zheng mind!

The instance that the Heartless Reverend soul was being swallowed, truly is actually sure to sees clearly in the Luo Zheng mind to have anything to exist, that is a huge enticement!

Often thinks of this matter, excitement that the Heartless Reverend mind cannot suppress, if appropriates to oneself this secret, his in the future will be light, will link Great Yu Divine Country also to by his Heartless Reverend be stepped on the under foot.

Four big Divine Country were away from Heavenly Northern Region extremely to be remote, moreover above the journey must avoid some important places, they try not to provoke in these formidable seas the ominous beast.

Several days later, Great Yu Divine Country six expert appeared in the Heavenly Northern Region east side finally.

“Has no interest, there as if has small sect, we...... Has a look, another Divine Sea Realm expert that”and Heartless Reverend comes together, named Star Sword Reverend, he and Heartless Reverend are close friends, under these time is also Heartless Reverend vigorously invites, together comes with him.

In the Great Yu Divine Country martial artist eye, Heavenly Northern Region one line not slightly dangerous, including the place that Life and Death Realm expert can lord it over, regarding them, only needed the closing one's eyes crush to be OK, in comparison, Chaotic Star Sea compared with many of Heavenly Northern Region danger.

Small sect in that Star Sword Reverend mouth, naturally is in Land of Far East third grade sect Fish Dragon Sect.

Heartless Reverend coldly smiles, broke in Fish Dragon Sect suddenly, powerful fleshly body stepped on directly above the open area of Fish Dragon Sect sect main hall.

“Bang!”

This Heartless Reverend surface seems is a young lad appearance, in fact was actually one lived over a thousand years of old monster, the eternity giant of being worthy of the reputation, this foot will step on, in the open area before Fish Dragon Sect big palace gate, took him to come as the center of circle crack suddenly, above a surrounding area hundred mu domain produced the innumerable dense and numerous cracks!

“Who is, is who excels at rushing to my Fish Dragon Sect!”

Fish Dragon Sect Sect Master Xiao got angry.

When Sect Master Xiao runs out of the main hall, under the vision sweeps, the whole face angry expression vanishes into thin air immediately, on the face has the incomparably attentive smiling face immediately......

However in the Sect Master Xiao heart is actually shouting'mother-fucker'.

Does motherfucker, how have Divine Sea Realm to appear greatly?

When Divine Sea Realm in Central Region can be the same with the cabbage greatly, regularly braves?

Although in the heart was foul-mouthed, the smiling face on Sect Master Xiao face actually genial incomparable, after having has encountered over a hundred super expert bitter experiences before this, Sect Master Xiao discovered that own heart also became strong, at least bumps into at present these six expert, Sect Master Xiao performance is not rude.

“This Grandmaster, actually does not know that ray of light near my Fish Dragon Sect, what does have?”The Sect Master Xiao smiling face such as the flower is common, said with a smile toward Heartless Reverend.

Heartless Reverend looked at Sect Master Xiao one lightly, cold sound said: “Does Heaven's Awakening City, walk?”

Also must go to Heaven's Awakening City!

Are these people also look for Luo Zheng's?

A while ago that Divine Country had over a hundred super expert to pass, how also to dislike insufficiently?

However the words said that over a hundred expert do encroach upon, after going to Heaven's Awakening City, a news from his Fish Dragon Sect? In Sect Master Xiao heart strange, but his where dares to ask?

Sect Master Xiao is very clear, kills cat curiously, under oneself will talk too much will perhaps bring in the calamity of taking a life, will extinguish the calamity of sect, how does he dare to ask randomly?

Therefore Sect Master Xiao has pulled out a map very much agily, respectful goes forward to give this young lad appearance the Divine Sea Realm big energy, immediately said with a smile: “This was my Central Region map, Heaven's Awakening City has labelled on the map, you can seek according to the map......”

Heartless Reverend receives, shakes rope the map, immediately writes down in the mind, immediately snort/hum, six expert no longer spoke, changes into together the escaping light, directly soars the Heaven's Awakening City direction to go.

This Heartless Reverend has not actually left behind any reward......

After that six people walk away, Sect Master Xiao toward them “bah”previous that over a hundred expert granting his lower grade saint item, these two Divine Sea Realm can really be also parsimonious greatly!

Less than day, six escaping light rapid close Heaven's Awakening City.

Stood in the entrance of city wall, Heartless Reverend has swept one lightly, he at that time in Eight Trigrams Mirror, but has remembered the Heaven's Awakening City surrounding environment, although Under Heaven Merchant Union has swept clear the battlefield these days, is the Heartless Reverend memory will not be wrong, here was Heaven's Awakening City.

“Did not know, boy whether also in Heaven's Awakening City,”Heartless Reverend light saying.

Star Sword Reverend asked: “What secret the boy has, lets have no interest you so to miss?”

Heartless Reverend actually yes smiles, “does that boy where have what secret? Doesn't my this do the matter for the saintess?”

Star Sword Reverend cold sound said: “Your this saying, deceives saintess, do not bring to deceive me, does your my many years of good friend, want to cover-up to me?”

Saw that Star Sword Reverend was somewhat disgruntled, Heartless Reverend opens the mouth to say finally: “Was good, since I agree invited you to come Central Region together, naturally wants to share that secret with you together, I can only tell you, this secret was related with a dragon vein clan!”

“A dragon vein clan!”

Hears the Heartless Reverend words, on the Star Sword Reverend face reveals the surprised color suddenly, but transfers is the expression that the whole face does not believe: “Has no interest, do not joke with me.”

A secret of dragon vein clan, is four big Divine Country biggest secrets.

Four big Divine Country history, compared with time-honored many of it Central Region, above that piece of Continent, various civilizations had the innumerable years alternately.

Therefore the history in Divine Country, even can summarize is ancient times, Middle Ages and recent antiquity......

But a dragon vein clan, from the ancient times with Divine Country for enemy, arrived Middle Ages time, a dragon vein clan with then “seven big Divine Country”have launched a rock the earth war, even the True Dragon present world, helping a dragon vein extermination of entire extended family kill three big Divine Country.

After arrived recent antiquity, Divine Country got the winning side finally, thoroughly eliminates a dragon vein clan, making a dragon vein clan segment Lishihe a legend in Divine Country.

Even if the legend, an interior of dragon vein clan still has many legacy and vestiges, these things are common just like gold ores, attract Divine Country martial artist to go to unearth.

Therefore any secret that involves a dragon vein clan, in Divine Country is incomparably precious, after all these years, Divine Country martial artist unearthed arrived to be too many in a dragon vein clan too many advantage......

“How I will crack a joke with you, when I seize this boy, searches for the soul to refine the soul to him, when the time comes you knew!”On the Heartless Reverend face reveals the self-confident smiling face.

Saw that Heartless Reverend so sincerely believes that Star Sword Reverend has also believed 2-3 points, on the other hand, offended expert martial artist in Divine Country much, will find the opportunity to hide in Heavenly Northern Region, these martial artist hide in Heavenly Northern Region has a falling from the sky point eventually, is this secret is these martial artist belts comes, in martial artist by Central Region took arrived, this also and has the possible matter.

“Since that person has a secret of dragon vein clan, the strength thinks that will not be weak, does not know that what helper he also does have?”On the Star Sword Reverend face reveals a prudent color actually.

“Hahaha......”heard the Star Sword Reverend words, Heartless Reverend has smiled immediately, “the strength of that boy was indeed good, Void Tribulation Realm middle stage, extinguished Life and Death Realm Fourth Layer martial artist kills!”

“?”The Star Sword Reverend vision dodges, Void Tribulation Realm, is Life and Death Realm, cannot enter the Star Sword Reverend eye, but listens to the Heartless Reverend tone, can the boy actually by Void Tribulation Realm middle stage cultivation base, extinguish kills Life and Death Realm Fourth Layer?

This was very fierce.

===========================

===========================





#753 - Vying To Answer First


Even if in four big Divine Country, can extinguish Life and Death Realm by Void Tribulation Realm, this grade of martial artist also has in the Divine Country historical legend.

At least past Star Sword Reverend absolutely could not achieve.

Therefore a Heartless Reverend such saying, Star Sword Reverend even more has been interested in Luo Zheng, since this Luo Zheng is so fierce, perhaps then because of a dragon vein clan that secret legacy reason?

“Relax, the star sword, when have the brothers I deceived you?”

After saying, Heartless Reverend has promoted own altitude suddenly, faces Heaven's Awakening City deeply to inspire, continuous world yuan qi gathers to come toward him, in the sky is suddenly blustery!

Immediately Heartless Reverend roared suddenly.

“Luo Zheng! Luo Zheng! Luo Zheng!”

“Comes out! Come out! Comes out!”

His sound roared, clarity that in entire Heaven's Awakening City everyone listened, that sound was similar to startling thunderclap is common, resounded through near many martial artist ears.

Was only a pity bad luck is actually these common people in Heaven's Awakening City, under most common people in so call out, is similar to several thunder and lightning blasts open in own forehead front, under this sound shakes greatly, turned on the supercilious look directly, has fainted!

These strength bad martial artist, similarly are also very uncomfortable, under the vibration of this sound, the feeling vitality tumbles, heart “plop”“plop”keeping jumping, binaural in has cluck the blood to flow.

This is also Heartless Reverend intends to show off.

Divine Sea Realm expert shows off, is that imposing manner the what kind of great strength?

In the Heartless Reverend heart is also very self-satisfied, perhaps these did martial artist in this Heaven's Awakening City, frighten to must to tremble?

In Great Yu Divine Country, they do not dare such recklessly, this to be just like a wealthy man in big city, originally is possibly nothing in his big city, but comes to a arrived countryside small place, must always show off wealth, shows off one's power.

In the arrived martial artist world, turned “has played ruthlessly, shook the power and prestige!”

Sees Heartless Reverend so, Star Sword Reverend also smiled, similarly also flies upwards, absorption part of world yuan qi that is also without change with Heartless Reverend, “have no interest the interest, I also try, Haha!”

“Luo Zheng! Luo Zheng! Luo Zheng!”

“Comes out! Come out! Comes out!”

In these two Divine Sea Realm can greatly, four Life and Death Realm expert looked at each other one, on the face has also been hanging the light happy expression.

As the personal servant, they actually do not dare to snatch Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend crest of wave, but the person of Divine Country, goes to any place to have the superiority feeling, then should have the good play performance, extinguishes in any case kills Central Region martial artist just like regarding them chops the melon to cut the dish to be ordinary, they do not worry, having a look at martial artist in this Heaven's Awakening City to have anything to respond that said again.

In Heaven's Awakening City, a silence.

The big city, does not have martial artist to appear, as if a dead city general......

“Works as the turtle?”The corners of the mouth of Heartless Reverend reveal wipe the color of grinning fiendishly, he seems like a young young lad, the expression on face actually fierce ruthless spicy, expression and appearance serious does not want to call.

“Does not dare to come out,”Star Sword Reverend light saying with a smile: “Heavenly Northern Region martial artist, not only strength is small and weak, disposition also spiritless incomparable.”

However the Star Sword Reverend voice just fell, in Heaven's Awakening City presented escaping light, that escaping light from far to near, is directly soars Heartless Reverend.

Future Luo Zheng!

On the Luo Zheng face is hanging the light happy expression, in the heart actually is really joyful, looks forward to eagerly, finally these fellows hoping!

Heartless Reverend and Luo Zheng have handed over a hand, how doesn't he know the Luo Zheng's appearance?

Saw that Luo Zheng all alone goes, on the Heartless Reverend face is also hanging the smiling face, said to Luo Zheng: “You know the limitation actually, knows unable to run away, on own initiative appeared, after obtaining that thing in your mind, I can keep your entire corpse.”

The Luo Zheng's vision actually slightly glitters, “entire corpse? Heartless Reverend, I do not plan dead!”

“Really is the joke, you refuse stubbornly dead, can by you?”Star Sword Reverend is actually contemptuous saying, Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, even if the Luo Zheng strength can strike to kill Life and Death Realm expert outstandingly, how his Star Sword Reverend does place in him the eye?

Luo Zheng is actually not salty not pale saying with a smile: “I refuse stubbornly dead, nature by me, otherwise do you think?”

Heartless Reverend actually extends take action, gently said toward the Luo Zheng's body gesture: “Your life, already in our hands, tiny ant......”

“I come, did not discuss this with you,”Luo Zheng restrained suddenly the smiling face on face, “I came, wants to ask the question!”

Great Yu Divine Country six expert hear Luo Zheng this saying suddenly, is actually somewhat bewildered, asked the question? What question asked? Own life did not have, does he also plan to ask the question?

However since Luo Zheng said that Heartless Reverend also is really somewhat curious, immediately opens the mouth to ask: “You want to ask, what issue?”

Luo Zheng actually took out several shatter ancient jade from sumeru ring, that ancient jade has disrupted, is incomplete.

This ancient jade Li Hetai gives to Luo Zheng's ancient jade, in which the strength of life came by the Ning Yudie absorption, to look for the ancient jade clue, Luo Zheng naturally will preserve.

When Luo Zheng pulls out this ancient jade, Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend, as well as they behind four Life and Death Realm expert slightly stare, on the face is reveals to feel strange the color.

“Well, how will you have this thing?”Heartless Reverend stares in the Luo Zheng hand that shatter ancient jade to ask.

Hears the Heartless Reverend words, in the Luo Zheng heart jumps slightly, this Heartless Reverend knew ancient jade in own hand, this ancient jade definitely came from Divine Country, moreover has in Divine Country!

“What this is ancient jade? Where obtains? In four big Divine Country also has?”This is the matter that Luo Zheng most cares about, therefore he asked.

Who knows that Heartless Reverend coldly smiles, “although does not know where you get so far as this thing, but I have not told your necessity.”

The Luo Zheng's vision sparkled, on the face is hanging smiling face polite saying: “Troubles you to tell me?”

“In Divine Country, this is not the great secret, but will tell the person of dying, actually will be meaningless,”saying of Heartless Reverend coldly.

“No,”Luo Zheng swung the finger suddenly, smiles, “is very meaningful!”

A Star Sword Reverend brow wrinkle, his individuality many that Heartless Reverend is more discrete, sees the Luo Zheng's expression and tone, so wind light cloud Dan, always thought that some do not suit, therefore asked at this time: “What significance?”

Luo Zheng smiles proudly, the expression on face is very pure, but is also very brutal, “your six people, who told me first, whose life I forgave!”

The Luo Zheng's words said suddenly, immediately made Great Yu Divine Country these six martial artist stare staring, suddenly six people suspected that oneself ear misunderstood.

On the Heartless Reverend face reveals not very awkward expression, “what? Do you want to say again?”

A Void Tribulation Realm little fellow, helped Life and Death Realm expert and Divine Sea Realm with them can say that greatly this words, suddenly they thought the Luo Zheng's head had the issue.

“Said again, who told me this ancient jade secret first, I forgave whose life,”Luo Zheng has repeated one side, immediately added on one: “Can vie to answer first!”

Heartless Reverend “Hehe”has smiled two, “wastes the time with you, is really the wrong choice, the star sword, your day star searches for the soul big law to be able maximum degree the mind of raid that fellow, I hold him, you search for the soul to him again!”

Heartless Reverend knows the secret in Luo Zheng's mind, he also clear, that True Dragon soul is not easy to handle, previous time enters a soul in Luo Zheng mind to be extinguished kills, but that soul also has strengthened together using the spirit cup soul, compared with his main body soul is also not weak.

Therefore Heartless Reverend does not dare to enter in the Luo Zheng's mind casually, if his soul were swallowed by True Dragon, then on gain does not equal the loss!

However a Star Sword Reverend cultivation soul mystique, actually happen to restrains this situation, why this is also Heartless Reverend can have the reason that Star Sword Reverend comes together, otherwise Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend personal friendship is good, is willing to share and him this grade of secret?

Saw that Heartless Reverend will soon begin, on the Luo Zheng face reveals regrettable look.

“Nobody vies to answer first, was a pity really, you are not worried about your life evidently...... Comes out!”





#754 - Bewildering Heart Domain


The speed that Divine Sea Realm can fly to escape greatly fully is hard to imagine.

Even if Divine Sea Realm can want another Divine Sea Realm big energy that kills one to flee fully greatly, quite uses energy.

In order to prevent this group of Great Yu Divine Country expert runs away, expert concealment of over a hundred Sea God Continent in surroundings, moreover used Monster Night Race Secret Treasure “emerald tree”to cover their aura.

The emerald tree is Monster Night Clan unique one Secret Treasure, so long as abandons the tree seed, in three day can grow person of high young trees, these young trees can merge into one organic whole with other trees, does not look like slightly the towering feeling, so long as stands under the emerald tree, can cover own aura completely.

However this emerald tree can only be used to ambush, actually cannot be used to escape, after all three days of vegetative cycles were too slow, escape time naturally brought not to use.

This little while Luo Zheng's voice just fell, over a hundred formidable imposing manners release suddenly, these imposing manners instantaneously numerous expert include in which Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend and other Great Yu Divine Country.

But Monster Night Clan six Divine Sea Realm big energies, as well as Purple Heart Sacred Ground Situ Haotian and the others, from the domain proliferation of body.

Only then after arriving at Divine Sea Realm, can have own domain!

Each domain of person differs from, but generally acts according to attribute cultivation technique that oneself major to probably come.

These domains one layer upon layer superimposes, then covers in which Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend!

Where Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend think that will have this matter?

Nine Divine Sea Realm big energies......

Even if in four big Divine Country, Divine Sea Realm can not be the cabbage greatly, like Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend two Divine Sea Realm big energies, holds an important post in Great Yu Divine Country, even if the Great Yu Divine Country saintess also being hard verbal command they.

Broken Divine Sea, is equal to existence in unique common custom, is equal to every is the immortal.

If not this Great Thousand World had change, they early can fly upwards, became the immortal exists generally.

Heartless Reverend understood very much the Central Region martial artist strength, Life and Death Realm can enjoying the sight and sound of the wind whipping up the water that this Continent stirs, these comes Heavenly Northern Region, actually he can sweep away, if not abstains from that True Dragon in Luo Zheng mind, Heartless Reverend does not need to bring Star Sword Reverend to come completely together!

This Heavenly Northern Region in four big Divine Country martial artist eyes, just like own back garden general security.

From stepping into this lands, they on all martial artist to this lands have the power that Life and Death has given and taken away.

But how they can think, here can encounter these many Divine Sea Realm big energies?

Suddenly, Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend had have hoodwinked, came from Life and Death Realm expert in Great Yu Divine Country has even rubbed own eye, was he actually the suspicion is sees? How to have this unthinkable matter?

By the Central Region resources, trains the Divine Sea Realm big energy, even if one, two are also very reluctant, suddenly jumps these many, he suspected really oneself also in dream.

Divine Sea Realm on Sea God Continent can be headed by Situ Haotian greatly, six people of wrapping of Great Yu Divine Country solid, but a few words had not said, only has Luo Zheng light saying with a smile: “Last opportunity, where this does ancient jade come?”

Luo Zheng was saying, again held up ancient jade in hand to ask.

Star Sword Reverend and Heartless Reverend this moment mind revolves rapidly, they think is actually how during these expert surround gets out of trouble, where some moods answered the Luo Zheng's issue?

However Star Sword Reverend and Heartless Reverend are not willing to reply Luo Zheng's to inquire, they behind these Life and Death Realm martial artist did not think.

Divine Sea Realm can actually strength of the spelling, under the fight of this rank, Life and Death Realm only be able to degenerate into the cannon fodder greatly.

And a head of Life and Death Realm expert on rotation fast, immediately replied: “I know, this is Life Origin Stone! Digs from Feather Sovereign Mystical Place!”

“Feather Sovereign Mystical Place?”The Luo Zheng eyebrow raises, stares at that Life and Death Realm expert to continue to ask: “This Feather Sovereign Mystical Place in four big Divine Country?”

This Life and Death Realm expert vies to answer first suddenly, Star Sword Reverend and Heartless Reverend turned head to stare that Life and Death Realm expert one maliciously, Heartless Reverend was sneers saying: “You think that you told him, did he let off you?”

On that Life and Death Realm expert face reveals color of the fearing, but the survival instinct got the winning side, no matter how, regarding him is also an opportunity of life, he continues to say to Luo Zheng: “Feather Sovereign Mystical Place in four big Divine Country center, is in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea!”

Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea......

Fame of this Life Origin Stone in four big Divine Country is not evidently low, the quantity should be many.

These news, after Luo Zheng can definitely go to four big Divine Country, noses again, now Luo Zheng is also only a preliminary confirmation, if these ancient jade in four big Divine Country quiet nameless, is the extremely scarce thing, in Divine Country, Luo Zheng can choose other plans radically untraceable.

For example Luo Zheng can choose to enter in Rising Dragon Stage to fly upwards True Dragon Realm.

Although by his present strength, enters upper realm by far not to be unqualified, will be only for Ning Yudie, Luo Zheng at risk of life will also rush in any place.

After pondering over slightly, Luo Zheng smiles lightly, then said toward Heartless Reverend: “You said right, he replied my issue, I naturally can let off him! Begins, leaves behind that person of life then!”

Other Life and Death Realm expert hear Luo Zheng this saying, the heart jumps slightly, on the face reveals meaning of the regret, being nothing secret of this Life Origin Stone also in four big Divine Country, but general martial artist does not have the opportunity of contact, early knows them should really...... Vying to answer first.

Now regretted that was also late, didn't cultivation to this share, which murder the decisive person? Nobody will choose to sit waiting for death, issues an order in Luo Zheng's, all people begin at the same time!

Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend release own domain in the flash, Heartless Reverend covers Luo Zheng, the form in a flash, kills without consulting anybody toward Luo Zheng!

Although in the Heartless Reverend heart is also doubt, why Luo Zheng small Void Tribulation Realm middle stage martial artist, why can verbal command these Life and Death Realm, the Divine Sea Realm big energy, but he also understands, no matter the truth is anything, if he wants to strive for the life the opportunity, must coerce Luo Zheng!

Therefore under this begins, Heartless Reverend is directly soars Luo Zheng.

Facing the Divine Sea Realm big energy, Luo Zheng besides crazy drawing back, has almost no alternative, by his present strength, perhaps with fourth grade, is as for the fifth-order Life and Death Realm expert strength quite, was passed four times, five Life and Death Tribulation Life and Death Realm expert.

He is also not Divine Sea Realm greatly can match.

Luo Zheng draws back, a silhouette appears nearby Luo Zheng's immediately, an appearance of that person of features suggesting extraordinariness and immortality, is Situ Haotian.

Since they help the Luo Zheng resistance powerful enemy, where can not prevent?

Situ Haotian smiles to that Heartless Reverend lightly: “You, should be my match.”

Heartless Reverend is nipping the tooth, in the vision glitters to wipe the color of ruthless offense, pats the palm, the brown ray takes him to sweep across as the center of circle!

Divine Sea Realm can greatly confrontation, compared with Life and Death Realm expert fearful many.

In fact Life and Death Realm expert on the scene almost belongs to the dozen of soy sauce role, once was involved in Divine Sea Realm to be able greatly in domain, their fates exceptionally will be pitiful, therefore these Life and Death Realm expert are maintaining the distance, regarding has not begun in the surroundings.

The Heartless Reverend brown ray spreads, immediately hears exclaiming of his coldly: “Bewildering Heart Domain!”

That brown ray then by being able to see the speed spreads toward the surroundings!

As long as “Bewildering Heart Domain”was covered martial artist by that immediately felt own heart jumps crazily, as if fell into some hysterical/frenzy mood, wants to attack to leave oneself recent martial artist.

Heartless Reverend the Bewildering Heart Domain, is an extremely fierce domain.

Everything is involved in martial artist in Bewildering Heart Domain, mental will lose, immediately the violent disposition sends greatly, crazy striking distance recent martial artist!

If gives Heartless Reverend enough time, displays this Bewildering Heart Domain, covers entire Heaven's Awakening City, the less than half double-hour, in entire Heaven's Awakening City all martial artist will kill one another!

However, what today Heartless Reverend faces is many Divine Sea Realm big energies! Divine Sea Realm can greatly mental firm, so is can it be that easy to lose?

( Thanks support, is moved! Really has not retained the draft, has to retain the draft me to be able the earliest possible time to send! Over the two days diligently multi- code-points!)





#755 - Ganging Up To Surround And Beating Up


Many Divine Sea Realm can think that greatly heart jumps crazily, but during blinking returned to normal.

The Divine Sea Realm expert expert forms of combat and general martial artist differ from, both sides fight are in the domains suppress first mutually, counter-balance, then is collision between true essence and fleshly body.

Influence very big of domain to the martial artist strength, but each martial artist domain is also various.

Some martial artist domains are very overbearing, even can describe with the rascal, but some martial artist domains are only some auxiliary effects.

Like Heartless Reverend “Bewildering Heart Domain”can harass the mood of match, if makes him confront a Divine Sea Realm big energy alone, can make the mind of opposite party have the huge change, in a short time makes the opposite party hot tempered, is hard to stabilize to display own strength.

However now nine Divine Sea Realm can be in the Heartless Reverend domain greatly, these nine Divine Sea Realm big energies have actually shared Heartless Reverend “Bewildering Heart Domain”the pressure, the nature could not form much to threaten to them greatly.

Places in the Heartless Reverend domain, Situ Haotian both hands wield gently, colors proliferate generally by the screw, when these screws moved several after Situ Haotian, glitters suddenly dazzling rays, this time Situ Haotian seemed just like a small Sun is ordinary, all people were shot by that dazzling ray is unable to open eyes.

“Harasses the mind the domain...... A little meaning, but was too weak, Haha!”

The Situ Haotian sound transmits in that ray, in the spoken language is containing the self-confident aggression!

Although human race Purple Heart Sacred Ground ranks in Sea God Continent, but representative human race top martial artist is not small and weak, if really small and weak, Purple Heart Sacred Ground early the destruction, human race also had been removed on Sea God Continent.

human race can support by strenuous efforts now, is dependence these three top Divine Sea Realm expert!

Perhaps the Situ Haotian strength is inferior to Liu Yu, as well as the leader in Two Demon Sacred Grounds, but his strength can include Sea God Continent first ten absolutely!

“Divided Spirit Domain!”

The domain of Divine Sea Realm behavior, is uses own strength to divide an own domain, relies on own strength, can change the rule in domain in the limited range!

This is also so-called and heaven “struggle”domain.

Naturally, Divine Sea Realm the range of domain influence is very limited . Moreover the rule that changes relatively is also limited.

If the area of influence of this domain can surround the entire entire world, but the rule can also arbitrarily change, this person was equal to Heavenly Way......

Situ Haotian Divided Spirit Domain then can in the range that the ray covers, transforms innumerable spirit fragment!

After these rays shine, innumerable Situ Haotian appear in the ray, looked at the past, seemed one army comprised of Situ Haotian!

After tens of thousands of spirit fragment appear, then besieges toward Heartless Reverend.

Saw that this piece threatens spirit fragment to well up toward oneself, the Heartless Reverend complexion in great surprise, pats own top of the head, then condenses an eye from his top of the head, that eye looks, then gives people a feeling of suffocation.

“Pent-up anger evil eye! Extinguishes to me!”

“......”

One continuously is glittering the flame ejaculation of imaginary color gloss, this evil eye is also the thing of there's a long story behind this, if ordinary time Heartless Reverend will not bring to meet the enemy, now is Heartless Reverend most crisis time, his where also has slightly hesitant?

That flame also seriously is fierce incomparable, the sea of fire that so sprays as if extremely restrained spirit fragment that Situ Haotian transformed, flame sweeping in the past, immediately the cleanness of over a thousand spirit fragment burning down!

“Good, what a pity...... Is by far insufficient,”Situ Haotian eats this Heartless Reverend, since he under the Luo Zheng's invitation, came Central Region personally, can not expose one?

In Divided Spirit Domain that in he is, Situ Haotian is almost invincible existence, only if there are expert to be able all spirit fragment to extinguish at the same time kills, can the Situ Haotian true body compelling, indifferent Heartless Reverend is unable to achieve this point obviously!

Continuous spirit fragment rushes the Heartless Reverend side, all “Situ Haotian”on face appears a light happy expression, will immediately point at pinches gently, an invisible imposing manner sends out.

In this moment, Situ Haotian was alive general just like the ancient times Saint sovereign, sent out a space underground conceited imposing manner!

“Heaven extinguishes the tribulation to refer to!”

Divine Sea Realm, can say that the sovereign proclaims oneself emperor!

However Battle Sovereign in general sense, Battle Emperor, only then in four big Divine Country is existing.

Above Sea God Continent is sacred ground, said tradition that the sovereign proclaims oneself emperor, but this does not represent them said imposing manner that the sovereign proclaims oneself emperor!

Over ten thousand Situ Haotian erupt as if to exterminate the world vitality suddenly the imposing manner to explode together to shoot toward Heartless Reverend, the ray that each spirit fragment projects, has the Situ Haotian main body 1/1000 strengths, these over ten thousand spirit fragment shoot suddenly, was equal to that proliferated ten times the Situ Haotian strength!

In other words, in the Situ Haotian domain, you must deal with ten Situ Haotian also to attack, so formidable strength almost unimaginable!

Luo Zheng stands above the Heaven's Awakening City city wall, vision brilliant looks at this, can observe and emulate the fight of Divine Sea Realm expert, regarding Luo Zheng is also the heaven-sent opportunity.

Is this domain might?

Luo Zheng is thinking......

If can step into Divine Sea Realm in the future, is born the domain, does not know that has the what kind of effect? Can compare favorably with the Situ Haotian domain?

Regarding Luo Zheng is an opportunity of study, in many martial artist regarding Heaven's Awakening City is?

Divine Sea Realm expert fights, afterward may affect really broadly, although there are other Divine Sea Realm expert protections, is a control is not good, the huge power and influence fluctuates, can perhaps entire Heaven's Awakening City evaporating......

However Merchant Union martial artist braves the huge danger, observes and emulates airborne fight of this day.

This cannot see a fight for a lifetime!

Numerous martial artist mind are looking at this, is trembling unceasingly, some Heart of Martial Way insufficiently stable martial artist, will have the resistance the psychology, thinks own this generation cannot reach this altitude, has a feeling of frustration.

But some mentality positive martial artist, then both eyes illumination, expected own some day can break Life and Death, enters Divine Sea, obtains the so formidable strength!

This is the Heart of Martial Way effect, can positive more positive!

“Bang!”

In the sky presented a small Sun again, simultaneously erupts the huge sound, that sound is sad and distant, transmits over a thousand miles range.

As the ray diverges gradually, a young young lad appears in again, that Heartless Reverend extinguishes the instance that the tribulation refers to rumbling in the heaven, was hides into a small tortoise shell.

That tortoise shell is all over the body Paris green, just like using a bulk jasper builds, seems pretty extraordinary.

However is this tortoise shell, has actually resisted some Situ Haotian all huge attacks, but even so, Heartless Reverend in tortoise shell is very distressed, on his face appears to wipe the unhealthy dark red color, obviously the injury is heavy.

Saw that Heartless Reverend resisted itself this to strike unexpectedly, on the Situ Haotian face revealed the color of accident/surprise, the Central Region strength no doubt is well below Sea God Continent, but legacy in this Divine Country, should also on strongly to plan compared with Sea God Continent!

If not because of so, Heartless Reverend should that hit in Situ Haotian is disappeared directly.

“Snort, today I and you must decide a victory and defeat surely!”Heartless Reverend bites the tooth to say to Situ Haotian.

“With me?”Situ Haotian smiles lightly, “should be we are right!”

This Heartless Reverend actually wants with the Situ Haotian one-to-one fight, although Situ Haotian has the full assurance to defeat this person, but Divine Sea Realm can want to extinguish in the situation of independent combat greatly kills the opposite party is very difficult, he is actually not willing to be played to cheat to escape by this Heartless Reverend......

Therefore the Situ Haotian voice falls, several other Divine Sea Realm can greatly the domain also one layer upon layer launches, covers toward Heartless Reverend.

Saw this, the heart of Heartless Reverend downward sinks immediately, ends......

He from Great Yu Divine Country, crosses Chaotic Star Sea, at that time was how high-spirited? Where once thinks, Central Region unexpectedly does become his place of falling from the sky?

All Divine Sea Realm can take action, various domains cover greatly at the same time, firmly is stranded Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend, suddenly in the sky unceasingly erupts the bellow that makes the will of the people tremble.

The solemn Great Yu Divine Country two Divine Sea Realm big energies, on nine people by Sea God Continent were ganged finally then up to surround and beaten up dead, in Shi Kefan that and the others in Heaven's Awakening City observes, cannot bear shake the head, said the character who the sovereign proclaims oneself emperor like this falls from the sky, somewhat is rather pitiful......

===========================

===========================





#756 - Slave Mark


Shi Kefan naturally does not feel sorry for that Heartless Reverend, is only the Divine Sea Realm big energy from surely, even over a billion martial artist is born, builds Divine Sea is requires the innumerable resources and time, but falls from the sky only needs the short time, naturally can make the person heart live the sigh.

This is the martial artist world, even if you visit Divine Sea, called the sovereign to proclaim oneself emperor, could not escape the destiny that as before was extinguished kills.

Actually Divine Sea Realm can be extinguished greatly very much difficultly kills, even if in four big Divine Country, Divine Sea Realm can fall from the sky greatly is also the earthshaking important matter.

This that Heartless Reverend and Star Sword Reverend are actually extremely in the general idea, solid, almost may run away roadless, will fall to the so pitiful fate that nine Divine Sea Realm can surround greatly.

This fight continues the number column fragrant time merely, belongs to quietly.

Luo Zheng is shouldering both hands, slowly flutters toward the sky, arrives around last Life and Death Realm expert.

This Life and Death Realm expert replied the Luo Zheng's inquiry, Situ Haotian and the others have actually let off the life of this person.

The Luo Zheng's vision light gaze on this face, this person also passed five Life and Death Tribulation expert, wants the formidable three points compared with it Cui Xie, look that but this time facing Void Tribulation Realm middle stage Luo Zheng, on the face actually reveals fearing.

Luo Zheng knows certainly, this person fears is not oneself, but is behind person.

“You, you comply not to kill saying that my......”that Life and Death Realm expert stutters.

Luo Zheng nods, immediately said with a smile: “I indeed comply not to kill you, is I cannot the ignores you in Central Region, cannot make you return to Great Yu Divine Country, you...... Tries to find a solution?”

“This!”That Life and Death Realm expert complexion concentrates, doesn't this bully the person? He was planned to speak these words, was the present situation, how Luo Zheng bullies him? Extinguishes kills him is also only a thought matter, after all Luo Zheng has not taken an oath with Heart of Martial Way.

After thinking, that Life and Death Realm expert actually shakes the head immediately, “I cannot find out any means!”

But at this time, Luo Zheng behind not far away Situ Haotian was light smiles, “wasn't this simple? Can't you from waste cultivation base?”This suggestion is simple and brutal.

Discarded cultivation base Life and Death Realm expert, was equal to basically deceased person, has struggled the life to pay the price with the day, broken Life and Death, started to contend with Heavenly Way, after discarding cultivation base, that Small Heavenly Tribulation will not actually cancel!

Once after Heavenly Tribulation starts, according to certain rule methodical arrival, successive will not fall, is certainly surefooted.

This Life and Death Realm expert passed the last Life and Death Tribulation also hundred years, sixth Life and Death Tribulation soon will perhaps arrive, he has not grasped resists sixth Life and Death Tribulation, will therefore follow the having no interest Daoist to come Central Region, comes also to follow Heartless Reverend to mix some chances, two, if Heartless Reverend is willing to help him, passed next time probability also big increase of Life and Death Tribulation.

If cultivation base were discarded, he is average person one, how resistance next round Life and Death Tribulation?

Therefore hears the Situ Haotian words, that Life and Death Realm expert is saying of being filled with righteous indignation: “Discards my cultivation base, then with killing me also had anything to distinguish!”

Situ Haotian coldly smiles, “this suggestion was good, kills you are the simplest choice.”

The Luo Zheng's vision selects, light is looking at present this Life and Death Realm expert, so long as his a few words, Situ Haotian will take his life.

Sees Luo Zheng's this expression, that Life and Death Realm expert was also immediately anxious, interesting to listen to that his words said that who really doesn't fear death? Let alone he passed five Life and Death Tribulation, if endured sixth Life and Death Tribulation, can start to attack Divine Sea Realm, in his front, in addition also has the excellent future to wait for him!

The weather is not hot, but Life and Death Realm expert, even if places oneself in the sea of fire can also be self-poise, but his forehead the class on sweat a little bit, after having actually thought at this time, this Life and Death Realm expert then clenches teeth saying: “I have means!”

“What means?”Luo Zheng actually curious asking, looks like in Luo Zheng, discards this person of cultivation base to be imperative, really not good that massacres him to be quite safe.

After all Situ Haotian their impossible long time to guard Central Region, they must return to Sea God Continent, when Situ Haotian walks, but also who can suppress this Life and Death Realm expert?

“Has a mystique in our Divine Country! Slave mark! You plant the slave mark to me!”That Life and Death Realm expert urgently said.

“Slave strength mark?”The Luo Zheng's look moves slightly.

“Right, any person who plants the slave to print, is unable to the order revolt of Master, unable to go against the will of Master, completely will be loyal in own Master, you plant slave seal to me, when you my Master!”Saying of that Life and Death Realm expert anxious hasty.

“This slave seal, is so fierce?”Luo Zheng stares at that person to say.

“Right!”The opposite party determines incomparable saying.

The slave in this Life and Death Realm expert mouth prints indeed is also overbearing incomparable, but after being planted, indeed can also retain own thought that but will obey to the Master unconditionally.

That martial artist has not been resigned to under slave seal by the race, some disposition arrogant martial artist choices die, will not choose is planted slave seal, solemn Life and Death Realm expert who likes being treated as in the slave general, direction?

However this Life and Death Realm expert actually compares to fear death, cultivation base was discarded also dies, was extinguished at the scene kills also dies, after this plants the slave to print, in addition can also live on dishonorably.

Moreover perhaps in the future, Luo Zheng looks at him to feel sorry, releases his slave seal?

Therefore desperate, this Life and Death Realm martial artist finds out this kind of means.

“You said that this slave prints so mysteriously, how is also a law?”Luo Zheng asked.

That Life and Death Realm martial artist hurries to take out small brown stone token from own sumeru ring, is actually drawing up fine incomparable rune above this stone token.

When Luo Zheng sees that rune, the forehead jumps immediately gently, this is...... divine mark?

At this time, the Azure Dragon sound has actually made a sound, “right, this is divine mark.”

“Why haven't I seen this divine mark?”Saying of Luo Zheng doubt.

Luo Zheng while cultivation, the technique of divine mark has not actually put down, although Azure Dragon passes to own these divine mark, in addition he was unable to draw up completely, but the principle and shape of each divine mark, Luo Zheng firmly has written down in own mind.

This divine mark, Luo Zheng simply has not actually seen.

Azure Dragon is light smiles, “you have not seen have also been very normal, the divine mark technique is not my dragon race all, I teach to your divine mark, is True Dragon Clan legacy divine mark, the divine mark in his hand, from human race legacy, on the other hand, only then your human race will develop this divine mark, enslaves other people...... Hehe.”

Azure Dragon excels at the say/way of divine mark, as if somewhat does not spare a glance to this divine mark.

“Is determination unmistakable?”Luo Zheng asked Azure Dragon again, he definitely will soon after visit four big Divine Country, if Life and Death Realm expert took the guide, can actually time-saving reduce effort much.

But if by this fellow deceiving, when Situ Haotian they leave, can Central Region raise a rumpus by him? Luo Zheng does not hope this matter occurrence.

Azure Dragon is determination incomparable nod, “this is a very common slave mark, enslaves later is unable to revolt, but the compulsory requirement, the strength of your soul compared with Fang Qiang great ability, if your soul weak in the opposite party, will receive backlash of slave mark.”

“I understood,”Luo Zheng has the self-confidence to own soul.

Even if that Heartless Reverend soul, is Battle Soul Realm, the present Life and Death Realm expert soul, impossible own soul is formidable.

Therefore Luo Zheng to then said to that Life and Death Realm expert: “Such being the case, I can enslave you.”

That Life and Death Realm expert on the face revealed look that does not prefer at this time, the leeway that but he does would rather not choose, can only dispirited threw that brown stone token to Luo Zheng.

Luo Zheng has stroked this divine mark, immediately true essence irrigation, activated this slave mark instantaneously, immediately he shoots again toward the opposite party that slave mark.

That mark pasted instantaneously above this Life and Death Realm expert forehead, bloomed the little ray, after the ray on his forehead completely vanished, his both eyes the delay got up immediately, simultaneously nods to say to Luo Zheng: “My Master, what do you have to tell?”

Luo Zheng shows a faint smile, opens the mouth saying: “I want you to commit suicide.”





#757 - Sets Off


Hears the Luo Zheng's words, the expression that on Situ Haotian and other faces appears acclaiming, they know certainly that Luo Zheng will not make the opposite party commit suicide, but this is the most effective probe.

This Life and Death Realm expert heard the Luo Zheng's words, both eyes restored the pure brightness gradually, seemed like similar to the normal person without doubt, under the Luo Zheng's order, he extended take action suddenly, condensed green true essence, these true essence condensed sharp thorns, must pat shortly toward own head.

If his hand pats, definitely died.

When at a crucial moment, the Luo Zheng light order said: “Stops!”

That Life and Death Realm expert hears the Luo Zheng's order, hand that raises also stiff in airborne, is looking at Luo Zheng with the vision of questionnaire, seemed waiting for Luo Zheng has issued an order.

“Was good, did not need to commit suicide, told me your name,”Luo Zheng asked.

Life and Death Realm expert nods, immediately replied: “I called Cao Junfeng.”

“Is very good, with me, after”Luo Zheng said that immediately does not return flew toward, that Cao Junfeng also nods, follows closely in Luo Zheng behind.

This slave mark is very special, after being enslaved, did not lose, turned into the puppet, he has oneself consciousness as before, so long as by the Luo Zheng's order influence, this Cao Junfeng as before is not similar to a normal person generally not different, other people cannot see any clue.

He is unable the disobedient Luo Zheng's words.

Less than time of double-hour, this possibly is in Central Region in history the biggest crisis, like this with ease was melted.

Shi Kefan and the others the stone in heart also fell to the ground.

However they do not have anything to be good to be worried actually, leads this group of expert arrive at Central Region the time from Situ Haotian, has determined the destinies of Great Yu Divine Country these fellows.

Actually what Shi Kefan they are clearer, Luo Zheng became Central Region leader in fact, even if he has not established the Divine Country ambition, but this fact actually has to acknowledge.

Let alone these over a hundred super expert, pure takes Luo Zheng strength, nobody can resist with him in Central Region.

This point, in Central Region martial artist of some thoughts are very slightly clear.

They also feel a lucky, good Luo Zheng not series Central Region ambition, if Luo Zheng wants to establish Divine Country, but also who can be disobedient he?

What they are not clear, Luo Zheng has the ambition, in fact any person of Luo Zheng's ambition in Central Region is bigger, his goal has not limited in Great Thousand World, he knows oneself in the future in the entire entire world!

However this goal, he quietly places in the heart.

Solved Great Yu Divine Country martial artist, Situ Haotian and other expert as if eagerly did not return to Sea God Continent......

Situ Haotian, is Monster Night Clan martial artist, indeed is infatuated with various good food in Heaven's Awakening City also to have the culture, above Sea God Continent has Liu Yu to assume personal command, their these expert also rarely enjoys this serenity, this time they naturally must seize the opportunity.

However Luo Zheng is actually not able to wait again, how long his not clear Ning Yudie can support, but one day, are early many a hope, therefore Luo Zheng will go to four big Divine Country days to decide, the time decided seven days later.

Situ Haotian hears the Luo Zheng's plan, is wanted to dispatch several expert to follow Luo Zheng, goes to four big Divine Country together.

Luo Zheng actually rejected.

Four big Divine Country should compared with Sea God Continent more formidable Continent, in which expert be innumerable.

Leads one group of expert to go to four big Divine Country, will only bring in a bigger trouble, this is not Luo Zheng the result that wants to see, he only wants to attain enough Life Origin Stone now, saves Ning Yudie, as for resists with four big Divine Country? He and between four big Divine Country also does not have the big enmity, will eat to the full has supported will have done.

Since Luo Zheng insists on rejecting, Situ Haotian and the others were not proposing, they decided accompanies Luo Zheng to leave, returns to Sea God Continent.

Luo Zheng has not returned to Cloud Hall Ning Yudie, Cloud Hall is no doubt safe, but eventually also some the families of being ready to make trouble, now Luo Zheng are in Central Region, but can also suppress them, no one dares to act rashly, but Luo Zheng, if leaves Central Region, after the time is long-time, did not say, person greedy always with day after day opens along with passing of time.

In comparison, Shi Kefan they and Ning Yudie any conflict, in the Central Region present pattern, has not protected Ning Yudie also to have more than enough to spare.

After seven day, in Heavenly Star Hall.

Xi Youqin relying on gently in Luo Zheng's behind, on the face completely is the reluctant to part expression.

These days Xi Youqin also accompanies Luo Zheng to live in Heavenly Star Hall, looks that Luo Zheng long oh the sound was sighing to Ning Yudie, depressed, in her heart not only envied Ning Yudie, and loved dearly Luo Zheng.

What a pity she radically is incapable of changing these, can only accept with pleasure, for this man soon another woman will go to the distant place to take risk......

expert in that Divine Country, in powerful formidable far more than hundred times compared with Central Region?

This Luo Zheng's degree of hazard, clarity that Xi Youqin that even if not care about to the martial arts also knows.

“Luo Zheng, do I go together with you?”The Xi Youqin gentle voice said, she was been as far as possible gentle by oneself sound, perhaps such Luo Zheng accepted the possibility that is also bigger.

Xi Youqin these days besides taking care Luo Zheng, escapes frequently into Purple Extreme Realm cultivation, she does not like cultivation, this arid cultivation for her is a suffering, but she is very clear oneself potential.

So long as Xi Youqin cultivation to certain situation, pays certain price, can communicate True Spirit.

But True Spirit in Purple Extreme Realm, has to destroy the day to extinguish the place the ability, if the bitter experience danger in four big Divine Country, she at least can help Luo Zheng!

“It is not good,”Luo Zheng categorical rejected, not slightly hesitant.

Xi Youqin probably already anticipated that Luo Zheng will reject, on her face does not have slightly the angry color, but continues to say with the mild-mannered incomparable sound: “Complies my this time?”

Luo Zheng exhaled, is actually turns head, is looking at Xi Youqin, puts out a hand to trace her soft face gently, shows a faint smile, “except for this time!”

Xi Youqin then curls the lip, whisper that the non- sentiment does not hope: “When next time does not know......”

“Very will not be long,”Luo Zheng, only then the comfort said.

Facing Xi Youqin, present Luo Zheng has also had light feelings, this female like that is not perhaps nimble and resourceful like Ning Yudie, might as well smoke like that nimble and resourceful, most starts even is depressed, ill-flavored, after is her disposition transformation, actually exceptionally annoys the person to love tenderly.

The Xi Youqin vision is somewhat dim, lowers the head does not know that is thinking anything, before long she as if thinks arrived anything, raised the head to say with a smile suddenly: “Good, next time you must promise me!”

“What complies with your?”Luo Zheng asked.

“No matter I raise anything to request, you must comply!”Xi Youqin said with a smile, above that simple and elegant face full was the earnest expression.

Sees Xi Youqin this appearance, in the Luo Zheng heart a beat, immediately nod silently.

In Heaven's Awakening City all martial artist, whether or not belong to Merchant Union, went outside, is looking up to the sky, today is the day that over a hundred expert leave.

Under Heaven Merchant Union three Union Master naturally that must see off personally.

However what quite speechless is, Situ Haotian they have not carried off any expensive gift, several treasures that Under Heaven Merchant Union bestows, was turned down by them.

After all treats as the treasure in Central Region lower grade saint item, in the Situ Haotian eye is also very ordinary treasure, how the thing that Under Heaven Merchant Union bestows they to have a liking for?

However lets not probably be, Situ Haotian that the person smiles bitterly has actually carried off some food in many Central Region, even also begged several famous chefs to Merchant Union......

These chefs themselves are also martial artist, but cultivation base only has Innate, fiercest is also Spirit Illumination Realm.

Heard that can go to another Continent, serves these Divine Sea Realm big energies, these chefs naturally joyfully consented, in Under Heaven Merchant Union laborious for a lifetime, he is also only a chef, served these Divine Sea Realm to serve greatly, possibly wanted them one happily, perhaps oneself can break through hopefully, regarding them this was a rare opportunity.

Luo Zheng before departure, deeply looked at one to lie down Ning Yudie on bed, after he left Heavenly Star Hall, on face all sad and lost to vanish, what replaces it is the resolute color of whole face!

Afterward Luo Zheng is bringing by Cao Junfeng that oneself enslave, they converges with Situ Haotian, directly soars Central Region Land of Far East to go.

Situ Haotian they return to Sea God Continent, but Luo Zheng on the storm idle time while Chaotic Star Sea, crosses Chaotic Star Sea to enter four big Divine Country territories!





#758 - Crossing


Leaves the Central Region news about Luo Zheng quietly, was strictly controlled by Under Heaven Merchant Union.

Now entire Central Region martial artist, so long as head clear points understands, Under Heaven Merchant Union has controlled to occupy Central Region the position of overlord firmly, but Under Heaven Merchant Union takes Luo Zheng as to follow the lead now.

In fact after beginning Luo Zheng defeats Cui Xie, this pattern has formed, several other big fourth grade sect have learned the collective to keep silent, courage and strength that because they simply have not contended with Under Heaven Merchant Union.

But has one group not to know along with Luo Zheng super expert where braves, extinguishes after the thunder method with ease kills Divine Country expert, Blood Wood Cliff, Profound Yin Hall and Black Mountain Sect and other fourth grade sect, can only choose to bow the head to profess allegiance, they rejoiced, Luo Zheng has not established the plan of Divine Country.

If he plans to establish Divine Country, incorporates all sect, joins Cloud Hall and Under Heaven Merchant Union influence, now in Central Region who can revolt?

No matter how, the Luo Zheng's influence became a Central Region advertisement, this why Under Heaven Merchant Union will also carry on the reason of security to the Luo Zheng's whereabouts, so long as he here, regarding Great Yu Divine Country is also a considerably large deterrent force.

Shi Kefan and the others believe certainly, if Great Yu Divine Country turns out in full strength, even if Luo Zheng is unable to resist.

However four big Divine Country not necessarily is the monolithic bloc, they will not be certainly flustered for a small Central Region big fee/spent.

The Chaotic Star Sea sky, two escaping light go toward the east side straightly shoots, after seeing off Situ Haotian, Luo Zheng with that is called Cao Junfeng martial artist to go hand in hand, crosses Chaotic Star Sea!

The Chaotic Star Sea storm idle time, can maintain three to six months approximately, Luo Zheng must overrun while the down-time period of storm.

These days Luo Zheng has understood Great Yu Divine Country as well as another three big Divine Country situations through Cao Junfeng probably.

Is completely different from the Central Region situation, above this piece of Continent is dominated by four big Divine Country, does not have all forms of sect.

Establishes sect, is equal to establishing the innate influence, but Divine Country does not allow this situation to exist absolutely, once because some sect rises slowly, with Divine Country will resist, even may birth new Divine Country.

Therefore in the past seven big Divine Country by destruction three, four big Divine Country patterns have extended from ancient now, again do not have new Divine Country born, is considered as last seriously throughout the ages universal.

However martial artist needs cultivation, among Divine Country also needs to train the successor and successor, therefore in Divine Country has another sect form to exist, that is Martial Mansion.

Other Great Yu Divine Country Divine Country, have all kinds of Martial Mansion to exist, sect in this Martial Mansion and Central Region is similar, however all Martial Mansion are the control in the Divine Country hand, every large or small Martial Mansion also has become cultivation sacred ground in Divine Country, wants cultivation, obtains bigger resources to promote into more formidable, must join Martial Mansion.

“You, to enter Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, must join some Martial Mansion,”two people fly to escape in the Chaotic Star Sea sky, Cao Junfeng so suggested.

“Why?”On the Luo Zheng face reveals to feel strange the color, immediately asked.

Cao Junfeng direct reaction: “Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is place of miracle, for these years, has been monopolized by four big Divine Country, any independent martial artist does not have the qualifications to enter, let alone enters mined Life Origin Stone.”

The Luo Zheng's eyebrow selects slightly, more puzzled asking: “Since Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is a sea area, should broad incomparable, how these four big can Divine Country defend this sea area?”

“This you have not to know that although Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea said that is a sea area, actually is about only an inland lake, but is a relatively quite big lake, to monopolize many mystical places in this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, four big Divine Country with large army exhibit in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea all around, let alone...... Many forts in four big Divine Country, the big city regarding the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea construction, in entire Divine Country about 70% population, 90% expert lives in the seashore, wants to enter secretly radically is the impossible matter,”Cao Junfeng 1510 replied.

After the planted slave prints, Cao Junfeng will not deceive Luo Zheng, Luo Zheng even can the sensation to the matter that in the Cao Junfeng mind thinks, naturally can distinguish his these words to say not empty.

This somewhat troubled actually.

Plans according to Luo Zheng's, he wants to enter Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea secretly, if can unearth Life Origin Stone in that so-called Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, he attains can leave directly, then finds the opportunity to return to Central Region.

But now looks like, enters Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is a major problem.

“Joins Martial Mansion, certainly has to enter the qualifications of Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea?”Luo Zheng then also asked.

“Hehe,”Cao Junfeng shows a faint smile, “every year four big Divine Country will send for entering Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, has four big mystical places in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, separately is Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, Divine Sovereign Mystical Place and Dream God Mystical Place, last Heavenly Star Mystical Place.”

Luo Zheng slight bow, four big Divine Country can develop this situation, in each Divine Country some certain Divine Sea Realm big energies, think the resources in these mystical places unable to be few, perhaps will not compare Tower of Evil and Profound Nether Cave in difference Sea God Continent.

However Luo Zheng most cares is Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, after all this Feather Sovereign Mystical Place is Luo Zheng this line of goals, obtains enough Life Origin Stone in Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, he can go home.

Immediately Cao Junfeng then said: “To enter first three mystical places, must join some Martial Mansion, moreover at least is fifth grade above Martial Mansion, in four big Divine Country all fifth grade above Martial Mansion will have certain quotas, wants to enter Feather Sovereign Mystical Place to obtain these quotas.”

“Obtains the Martial Mansion quota?”Luo Zheng also asked.

Cao Junfeng said directly: “Joins Martial Mansion, becomes in Martial Mansion most outstanding martial artist!”

Luo Zheng itself to joining other Martial Mansion, is some mood of contradiction, like initially he went to Tower of Evil the time, Purple Heart Sacred Ground human race invited him to join, was rejected by Luo Zheng.

Luo Zheng is a person of keeping old friendships in mind, although by his present strength, Cloud Hall could not contain actually he, but Luo Zheng strengthens is Cloud Hall.

“Besides joining Martial Mansion, didn't have other means?”Luo Zheng also asked.

“No, only if you can go against in Divine Country these Battle Sovereign Battle Emperor to kill Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea......”Cao Junfeng saying that immediately his strange looked at Luo Zheng one, “by your strength, joins Martial Mansion, strives for a quota people should not be difficult.”

Before going to Central Region, Cao Junfeng also listened to Heartless Reverend to mention Luo Zheng, Heartless Reverend has told their various people, in Central Region presented a super talent, in these Divine Rank Talent compared with Divine Country also wanted more formidable, even by Void Tribulation Realm middle stage cultivation base, extinguished has killed Life and Death Realm Fourth Layer martial artist.

The Spirit Illumination Realm more step extinguishes kills Spirit Core Realm martial artist, this is not the strange matter, many Divine Rank Talent can accomplish.

But martial artist cultivation, more is cultivation arrives at later stage, the span of strength is bigger, therefore Void Tribulation Realm middle stage extinguishes kills Life and Death Realm Fourth Layer expert, this somewhat was unthinkable.

Cao Junfeng oneself is Life and Death Realm expert, whenever he passed time Life and Death Tribulation, felt oneself are similar to is reborn the general great strength, Luo Zheng can jump over the step to challenge Life and Death Realm expert, is conceivable he to have the talent of what kind of evildoer/monstrous talent?

After Luo Zheng thinks, immediately got over an emotion, joins other Martial Mansion is also only the expedient measure, now or the Ning Yudie life is most important.

Therefore Luo Zheng sets firm resolve, after entering Divine Country, first looks to enter Martial Mansion, he is always impossible top/withstand these Battle Sovereign Battle Emperor to enter Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea really......

In the Luo Zheng mind thinks, above the front sea level presented huge vortex suddenly.

Even if the Chaotic Star Sea storm is at the condition of standing still, in this sea area likes as before with the mountain common wave is tumbling, when a that vortex appearance, is several such as the mountain common wave circles to go.

“Big vortex!”

vortex in this Star Sea, has almost the Central Region 1/10 area, that vortex edge flood innumerable white bubbles, but the center-section is also maintaining the sea water azure color, but the arrived this vortex base, is jet black one piece, as if this vortex under can be ordinary to the hell!

After Cao Junfeng sees this huge vortex, the complexion immediately changes, said hastily: “Quick, flies in a big hurry, flies the upper air!”

Although he was enslaved by Luo Zheng, but also has own thought eventually, he is unable to resist the Luo Zheng's order, but will fear death as before.

( Wished everybody lunar year in which the last month has 29 days joyful first, thank léī13000 to read hitting of coin to enjoy!!! Thank smokes 500 to read the coin to hit to enjoy! Thank the life lonely such as the snow and rune/symbol Xingu hitting enjoys! Although new year's celebration matter are many, but does not need to rest! Also must accumulate the manuscript eruption! Your support are I am only, is the biggest power! Thanks!)

===========================

===========================





#759 - Arrival


Through slave seal, Luo Zheng can feel the feeling of Cao Junfeng innermost feelings, let alone is mammoth at present, as if has any fierce monster beast born, the Luo Zheng's personal appearance in a flash, follows Cao Junfeng to shoot to go toward sky whirlwind.

The area of this world sea has gone far beyond the land, but the ominous beast quantity in sea, on the creature compared with land are more thousand times of ten thousand times.

human race is not the only control in Great Thousand World, even if looks like in Sea God Continent also to have various many intelligent races.

But in various under seabed races of sea, the ominous beast is also everywhere, but the sea of length and breadth has given these biological richer resources and growth space.

Like initially Luo Zheng just entered Heavenly Vast Immortal Grave the time, encounters has compared favorably with the Life and Death Realm high rank ominous beast, but the Heavenly Vast Immortal Grave position, is away from Central Region is not very remote......

As for the Chaotic Star Sea center, has to endure compared with Divine Sea Realm can greatly the ominous beast, even can more formidable lifeform exist compared with Divine Sea Realm greatly.

“Whish......”

When Luo Zheng and Cao Junfeng raise the personal appearance toward place above rapidly, presented a giant shadow from that vortex under suddenly!

A fierce fluent sound transmits, immediately Luo Zheng saw a huge living thing surfaces, rises with a spring toward the sky!

“This is anything!”Sees this huge living thing, on the Luo Zheng face also reveals panic-stricken.

The build of this ominous beast, perhaps under that only “Ominous Scorpion”compared with Profound Nether Cave also small many!

However now Luo Zheng is in Chaotic Star Sea after all, with the broad sea contrast, like in Profound Nether Cave did not see actually that only Ominous Scorpion shocks.

But dangerous degree, high is not only low.

“This is swallows to imprison the water eyeball beast! The build is huge, altogether has four in Chaotic Star Sea! Also must continue, this thing leaps, can achieve to count a hundred thousand zhang (3.33 m) altitude of!”Cao Junfeng is not willing to answer the Luo Zheng's issue very much, now is the escape is definitely important, but the Luo Zheng's issue he actually must reply.

“Four, your this does know?”The Luo Zheng's mentality is actually steadier, not having Cao Junfeng so to fear, naturally, he maintains high-speed is flying to escape toward the place above as before.

“Naturally, the people of Divine Country are clear, once four big Divine Country united many Divine Sea Realm big energies, even enters in Chaotic Star Sea to catch this Cang Qiu water eyeball beast the cub, afterward under a Cang Qiu water eyeball beast anger, rushed to Divine Country Continent, my Great Yu Divine Country one-third national territory, after changing into the ruins, returns to the sea!”Cao Junfeng answered.

Hears this saying, Luo Zheng was also speechless.

These four big Divine Country martial artist also are really crazy, the ominous beast of this rank, definitely is not Divine Sea Realm greatly can resist, they also dare to enter Chaotic Star Sea to catch their cubs unexpectedly!

one-third national territory that however Cao Junfeng said that although has not exaggerated, but the loss of Great Yu Divine Country so is not big.

Said like before this Cao Junfeng, four big Divine Country important cities revolve Divine Country Continent central Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea to construct, regarding Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, is the extremely lively places, each Divine Country stature occupied the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea one-fourth coastlines.

However in this Divine Country Continent surrounding, basically is habitation few areas, even if were destroyed one-third national territory, is not big to the loss of Great Yu Divine Country.

However this also explained, four big Divine Country martial artist are crazier, is greedier!

So long as since then, by this Cang Qiu water eyeball beast was discovered after human race trail, they without hesitation will leap the water surface attack.

After this huge Cang Qiu water eyeball beast leaves the water surface completely, then two people dashes to toward Luo Zheng.

“On! Also wants on!”Cao Junfeng urgently said.

Luo Zheng continuously elevates with his personal appearance, quick has worn out the cloud layer, flies to shoot toward the deep space on.

“This...... Can the fellow jump is so high?”The thick cloud layer blocked below field of vision, Luo Zheng was looking under asking.

The Luo Zheng's voice just fell, saw that colossus has broken through the cloud layer, to continue they to pursue toward Luo Zheng, that huge body harasses the air current, has opened out a large cave the thick cloud layer!

“My goodness! Continues to rise!”Luo Zheng not slightly hesitant.

Under Luo Zheng raises unceasingly, suddenly saw that huge nettle rashes blow toward them.

“Is the astral wind!”

These winds in the upper heavens by no means colorless invisible, in surrounding embed of astral wind gold threads, this is being the counter-flow astral wind in deep space, it is said can the smashing that being involved in material strangles to death!

Luo Zheng more than once has experienced this astral wind.

The body of cultivation stars, must use the stars attraction own sensation stamina, moves fast beyond trillion miles, each cultivation time Luo Zheng must pass through this astral wind level.

However before, is only the Luo Zheng's sensation passes through, but this time, is fleshly body arrives.

This astral wind level almost can twist broken all, even if Luo Zheng has the body of high grade immortal item, perhaps is unable to resist!

Facing this giant astral wind nettle rash, the Luo Zheng personal appearance turns, from the sky delimits an astonishing curve, actually toward astral wind level leeward leaps rapidly.

Cao Junfeng sees that is also follows.

Actually stands in the Cao Junfeng angle, he looks forward to Luo Zheng to be strangled to death by this astral wind, no one shoulders a slave to print into others' slave, is unable to control including own life, let alone is he Life and Death Realm Fifth Layer expert?

But in his mind does not dare to have this thought that after all Luo Zheng controls his all, has the power that takes to give and take away to his life!

Under Luo Zheng so deflects rapidly, has avoided the above astral wind, at the same time, that huge swallowing imprisons the water eyeball beast is actually grips toward above one, violent astral wind cutting in that swallows to imprison in the back of water eyeball beast, presents huge margins instantaneously!

“Áo!”

This swallows to imprison the back of water eyeball beast, immediately one covered with blood, the blood splutters just like giant waterfalls.

Swallows to imprison the water eyeball beast to stare Luo Zheng and Cao Junfeng with that pair of giant both eyes bitterly, afterward the head downward, plants toward cloud layer below one......

This swallows to imprison water eyeball beast not to fly fortunately, but relies on strength of the leap to clash, if this giant beast will fly, perhaps Luo Zheng and Cao Junfeng life difficult insurance.

Stands in the sky of cloud layer, Luo Zheng also has a lingering fear, he looked at Cao Junfeng lightly, “your four big Divine Country, with and swallowed to imprison the water eyeball beast to tie the so big enmity, this giant beast saw unexpectedly the person must kill......”

Cao Junfeng also traces the sweat on forehead, shakes the head to guess: “Possibly was this only swallows to imprison the cub that the water eyeball beast produced by these Divine Sea Realm to steal greatly.”

This swallows to imprison the water eyeball beast is similar to by the blood that the astral wind cuts the waterfall is ordinary, sways in the sky, many blood drops integrated in the cloud layer, Luo Zheng then presented big group blood-color cloud layer at present, if this cloud layer flutters to Central Region or Divine Country, perhaps will have blood rain.

“I looked that goes forward along the cloud layer above,”the Luo Zheng suggestion said.

Even if the Chaotic Star Sea storm stood still temporarily, but is full of all sorts of dangers as before.

“Above cloud layer? That is more dangerous!”On the Cao Junfeng face reveals color of the fear.

“Above cloud layer also has the danger?”The Luo Zheng's vision jumps.

Just said in Luo Zheng, on the Cao Junfeng face floats off smiles bitterly together, “said the danger, the danger came, walks quickly, we will be safer under of cloud layer.”

At this time, in the distant place of boundless sea of clouds, the shadows of several drifting from place to place grazed toward here, although seemed fuzzy incomparable, in addition but can identify that is giant ominous birds and beasts.

Although does not know the strength of this ominous birds and beasts, but is not they can resist.

They no longer spoke, dug in the sea of clouds, returned to arrived Chaotic Star Sea, continued to fly to escape toward Divine Country Continent......

Above that Chaotic Star Sea giant wave, a big dark red bloodstain, has been needless saying that this definitely is just now that only swallows to imprison the water eyeball beast to remain.

This above, Luo Zheng also has encountered many dangers.

For example in the sea level strange appearance several cover entirely the dense fog the reef, hears an interesting to listen to incomparable singing sound from that reef, that singing sound as if can touch the soul of person, lets nearness that the person can not help.

Luo Zheng and Cao Junfeng almost the say/way, approached that reef until Luo Zheng and Cao Junfeng, saw above the reef was standing faintly several rugged shadows time, Luo Zheng in Azure Dragon by mind was awakened, although does not know that these shape fearsome shadows were anything, but Luo Zheng was also clear, once approached, died surely not fresh.

But that Cao Junfeng actually as before be with smile on the face strategic place goes.

At this time Luo Zheng also only then using slave seal, compulsory order Cao Junfeng followed itself, him from Gate of Death dragging......

Knocks to pass through Chaotic Star Sea on this, after having cost more than ten days of time, Luo Zheng saw the distant place to present piece of Continent finally.





#760 - Watches A Capital Crime


Luo Zheng present piece of Continent, vast boundless, he is unable to determine this Divine Country Continent size.

However Luo Zheng estimated that four big Divine Country the piece of Continent, should compared with Sea God Continent and Central Region mostly.

“Which Divine Country territory is this?”Luo Zheng asked.

The Cao Junfeng slight bow, replied immediately: “Crosses Chaotic Star Sea to come from Central Region, part that Chaotic Star Sea borders on is Li Fire Divine Country, another part is my Great Yu Divine Country, at present should this region be the Li Fire Divine Country territory, which Divine Country the Master wants to enter?”

“Chooses Li Fire Divine Country!”

Luo Zheng does not plan the cultivation development in Divine Country, his goal is very clear, with Life Origin Stone.

Since Luo Zheng is unable to enter in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea sufficiently, must choose Martial Mansion.

Four big Divine Country regarding Luo Zheng are incomparably strange existences, likewise, in four big Divine Country also nobody knows his Luo Zheng, not like he just entered Sea God Continent the time, just entered encounters demon race's to chase down.

However what Luo Zheng must pay attention is that Divine Country saintess.

Initially Luo Zheng had killed the Great Yu Divine Country Divine Country imperial prince in Heavenly Vast Immortal Grave, this Divine Country saintess vowed solemnly that must kill him to revenge, Luo Zheng naturally cannot silly to choosing Great Yu Divine Country.

Although in Divine Country is populous, but where expert is rare, even if Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, in Divine Country impossible like cabbage, everywhere is, if Luo Zheng chooses Great Yu Divine Country, perhaps if bitter experience that Divine Country saintess troubled.

Cao Junfeng to Luo Zheng's choice any comment, he has not been only followed cautiously in Luo Zheng behind, no matter how, he has saved a life in Central Region, although now becomes the Luo Zheng's slave, so long as Luo Zheng falls from the sky, or had no need for itself, he had obtained free one day eventually.

Like such that Cao Junfeng said that by sea region in sparsely inhabited, two people were in the midair to fly to escape high-speed are so long, don't said that a even/including big city had not seen, a small town did not have, this simply compared with Central Region bleak many.

However flies to escape toward the front under along with two people, surrounding cities also gradually were many.

Luo Zheng has nosed at will, in these cities overwhelming majorities are also the ordinary mortals, even if there is martial artist, Innate.

He naturally cannot stop over here, to continue.

Is again thorough toward the Black Iron Divine Country interior, successively presented some medium cities, slowly is some large-scale cities.

This Divine Country layout and Central Region are completely different, in Central Region is eastern one, western, scatters just like the board game piece generally above Central Region Continent, but the city in Divine Country jumps over toward in leaves, the city is bigger.

Luo Zheng in these cities had discovered some Martial Mansion, including some Martial Mansion achieves third grade, even fourth grade sect influence, but Luo Zheng has not stopped over as before, said like Cao Junfeng, only then fifth grade as well as fifth grade above Martial Mansion has to explore the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea quota.

Several days later, Luo Zheng front finally presented a giant city finally.

In the front door of that city, stands erect is reaching as high as the statues of three hundreds of zhang (333 m), the altitude of this statue had almost a hill size.

Sees Luo Zheng to size up this idol, nearby Cao Junfeng told Luo Zheng immediately, “this was the Black Iron Divine Country first God sovereign, Black Iron Battle Sovereign! Black Iron Divine Country is establishes by him.”

“Did he die?”Luo Zheng asked.

Spirit Core Realm expert can live for several hundred years, Void Tribulation Realm is 1,000-2,000 years, but Life and Death Realm is reaches for several thousand years, as for Divine Sea Realm can greatly the life calculates by for ten thousand years, in Divine Country definitely eternal giant in not deficient legend!

“Died, Black Iron Divine Country is also one of the legacy glorious Divine Country, this Black Iron Battle Sovereign lived 13,000 years old, fell from the sky eventually,”spoke of here, on the face of Cao Junfeng also revealed color of the regret.

On four big Divine Country martial artist, has together the invincible spell, that died, nobody can escape.

Generally speaking, after cultivation to Divine Sea Realm, can fly upwards upper realm, pursues its ui more formidable life level, but in this Great Thousand World is actually not able to fly upwards!

In Central Region fortunately, almost nobody cultivation arrives at Divine Sea Realm in any case through the ages, can the flying upwards significance not be big, fiercest is also Life and Death Realm, the major part dies under Life and Death Tribulation.

However in four big Divine Country, has a big ticket Divine Sea Realm big energy, these Divine Sea Realm can gather greatly, is unable to fly upwards, finally exhausts the life, will wither, dies under the curse of Celestial Five Wanings.

martial artist sets up the world, then struggles to assign with the day, is this Great Thousand World Innate is insufficient, how should this life struggle?

This is also in Divine Country all expert helpless places.

Actually in Sea God Continent expert in many sacred ground, for example the generation of Liu Yu, faces this issue similarly.

However Monster Night Race is different from other races, they can communicate with upper realm, if important, can cause upper realm Monster Night Race to attach great importance, they are also have other methods to fly upwards, has Rising Dragon Stage like True Dragon Clan, can actually break this limit.

Present big city named Lone Crane City, is in Black Iron Divine Country the second largest city, is next to the Divine Country capital.

This and other big cities naturally have to ban the spatial ban, Luo Zheng to will not fly in rampantly directly Lincheng.

Until Luo Zheng enters in Lone Crane City, feels the Divine Country makings!

In Central Region, even if in Heaven's Awakening City, Void Tribulation Realm martial artist is also remote dozens people, big Heaven's Awakening City mortal and martial artist perhaps over a hundred million, this proportion small astonishment.

But in Luo Zheng enters shortly after Lone Crane City, actually one after another 23 encounter Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, the light from the proportion, perhaps are less than Heaven's Awakening City many, but absolute quantity were many.

“Jade Profound Martial Mansion in this Lone Crane City, has the sixth grade sect strength, in four big Divine Country is also hè hè famous Martial Mansion, by your current strength and cultivation base, should be able to be involved,”Cao Junfeng is said to Luo Zheng.

Luo Zheng nods, actually some anxieties, “doesn't Martial Mansion recruitment disciple, generally aim at these low realm martial artist?”

The Azure Clouds Sect recruitment disciple in Central Region, generally in view of beginner, even if Cloud Hall, is impossible to recruit a Spirit Core Realm disciple, these big sect even very repel to independent martial artist, after all cultivation has after voluntarily, joins other sect, is very indeed difficult maintains loyal.

Cao Junfeng is actually shakes the head smiles, “Master you have considered thoroughly, Divine Country has with your Central Region greatly is very different, in Divine Country, so long as you place, even if the person of Divine Country, was in itself a Divine Country member, Martial Mansion did not want to train own disciple, but helped Divine Country training.”

At this time Luo Zheng actually has contrasted with Martial Mansion and sect, but in fact should take sect and Divine Country contrast.

For example Cloud Hall is equal to the Divine Country words, then this Martial Mansion can only be equal an elite hall in Cloud Hall, it is not an independent sect influence, therefore in Martial Mansion all resources are also Divine Country directly entrust with.

But Luo Zheng said that as independent martial artist, others Martial Mansion will not treat as “independent martial artist”to regard with Luo Zheng, they Luo Zheng will also recognize that is a Divine Country member.

Big is it possible that king earth world, Luo Zheng enters into the Divine Country flash, is Black Iron Divine Country one, discussed what “independence”?

At this time Luo Zheng was understands reluctantly.

Does to inquire slightly, was held responsible to go to the Jade Profound Martial Mansion road, Luo Zheng and Cao Junfeng were directly soar to go.

Cannot fly, can only march forward on foot, when passes through a street, right Luo Zheng was actually sees has built a big red city wall, had the ocean waves sound to transmit from the city wall faintly, during the breath can also smell the salt taste of sea.

“Does here have sea water flavor/smell? Is it possible that is......”

Luo Zheng goes down to this Divine Country Continent interior, is far away from Chaotic Star Sea, if outside the city wall has the sea water, may is Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea!

Cao Junfeng nods to say immediately: “Master has guessed right, this separation of one wall, is Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea!”

This Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea mysterious? Even if not let enter in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, looked that isn't good?

Luo Zheng actually wondered.

Saw Luo Zheng this appearance, Cao Junfeng has actually been unalarmed by strange sights, but said with a smile: “Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, related to four big Divine Country dominant positions, this inland sea is their something for one's own exclusive use, ordinary martial artist indeed is looked that qualifications do not have!”

“If looked?”Luo Zheng also asked.

Cao Junfeng smiles, “looks at one, is the capital crime!”





#761 - Jade Profound Martial Mansion


Luo Zheng was very curious to this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, can a small inland sea, how gather how many mystical places?

By a Cao Junfeng saying, in his heart was been so more curious, what ghost this is Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea? General martial artist looked that doesn't let look to be the same? Looks at one continually is capital crime!

This is simply bewildered!

“Entire is Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea revolved by these city walls?”Luo Zheng asked.

“Right, this city wall has constructed entire, entire Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea solid revolves, moreover all arranged banned the spatial ban, so long as anybody broke through this ban, will have Life and Death Realm expert to rush over......”

Builds a city wall regarding an inland sea, this project was also vast being hard imagines.

Hears this saying, Luo Zheng stares dumbfounded, can too exaggerate?

What treasure in this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is hiding, being worth them controlling so solid?

However these Battle Sovereign Battle Emperor in Divine Country are not the fools, they such make the reason of definitely having such makes.

The people often are this, is curious, more wants to look at one, Luo Zheng also really wants to cross this city wall, looks at this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is any thing!

“Won't you want to break through this to ban the spatial ban? Even if you can resist these Life and Death Realm martial artist, but Divine Sea Realm can also follow on somebody's heels greatly,”Cao Junfeng so warned.

Luo Zheng smiles, shakes the head, he naturally cannot make this piffle, he is understands that Cao Junfeng warned several days ago, if he wants to break through forcefully, enters Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, will only bring in chasing down of numerous Battle Sovereign occupying land area, is unable to enter in Feather Sovereign Mystical Place.

Immediately Luo Zheng then left this high city wall, after the time of burning a joss stick, Luo Zheng looks for Jade Profound Martial Mansion in arrived legend finally.

How regardless to say, this Jade Profound Martial Mansion is also equal to Martial Mansion of sixth grade sect influence, the style that this Martial Mansion front door also establishes is unusual, but has innumerable martial artist to lie in front of this Jade Profound Martial Mansion on the ground, worships on bended knees toward Martial Mansion.

The Luo Zheng's vision sweeps at will, lies in the martial artist more than over ten thousand people of ground many, moreover overwhelming majorities are Spirit Illumination Realm to Spirit Core Realm martial artist, sees this, the Luo Zheng knitting the brows head, “this what's the matter?”

Cao Junfeng shakes the head said immediately: “This Jade Profound Martial Mansion is Black Iron Divine Country military study sacred ground, these martial artist want to enter, but is actually not able to obtain the qualifications, only hopes that own sincerity persuades a Martial Mansion people, some day can enter in Martial Mansion.”

Luo Zheng was also speechless, to enter Martial Mansion, unexpectedly so......

Central Region martial artist can through many channel cultivation, for example unable to enter some sect, can do obeisance into other sect greatly, even becomes independent martial artist, voluntarily cultivation.

But in Divine Country, these are actually in the absolute monopolistic position by Martial Mansion of Divine Country support, wants cultivation to a higher level, is potential achievement, except for entering in Martial Mansion has no other alternative!

Initial time, many martial artist are unable to enter Jade Profound Martial Mansion, going home that can only lose low-spirited.

Afterward in martial artist heart unwilling, then could not kneel in front of Jade Profound Martial Mansion.

This kneels, is ten years, in all weather......

Finally Elder in Jade Profound Martial Mansion read his heart to be honest, although his talent was insufficient, but received in him Martial Mansion finally.

Afterward once started, it can hardly stop.

martial artist that many talents are insufficient, after entering the Jade Profound Martial Mansion failure, then also kneels in this.

Short has to kneel for one year two years, long also has to kneel for ten years eight years, but Jade Profound Martial Mansion is actually not willing to enroll these people again.

The martial artist will is very important, talent similarly is also important, solemn Martial Mansion naturally impossible time waste on them.

Numerous martial artist read thinks that heart honestly spirit, tried to enter in Jade Profound Martial Mansion through this method as before.

On the Luo Zheng face reveals not very awkward expression, immediately steps the Martial Mansion entrance stair, is directly soars the front door to go.

By this Martial Mansion is also standing erect many guards, majority are Spirit Core Realm martial artist, these martial artist see Luo Zheng Void Tribulation Realm cultivation base, sees Luo Zheng behind follower Life and Death Realm expert, the expressions on their face are also very respectful.

Which big Aristocratic Family son of the influential mostly is, leading own old servant to register.

Can take own old servant Life and Death Realm expert, the Luo Zheng back Aristocratic Family energy is not perhaps small, even may be the emperor's relatives!

Even so, a guard blocked Luo Zheng, the guard was to Luo Zheng polite saying with a smile: “My does Jade Profound Martial Mansion do?”

“I want to participate in the inspection of Jade Profound Martial Mansion,”Luo Zheng light saying.

“Inspection?”That several guards have looked at each other one, immediately one of them said: “Our Jade Profound Martial Mansion has inspection every month, but is not today, in addition the next inspection needs to wait for half a month the time, moreover participates in the inspection also to need......”

This guard immediately matters needing attention of inspection, detailed introduced to Luo Zheng.

The matter that Luo Zheng worries about has not occurred, like such that Cao Junfeng said that so long as were in Divine Country, even if were the Divine Country subjects, this Jade Profound Martial Mansion did not repel to Luo Zheng, through the inspection was a Martial Mansion people!

Moreover Martial Mansion is not sect, does not have what limit and request to Luo Zheng itself.

Enters Martial Mansion is the Martial Mansion disciple, rather after becoming Martial Mansion, with Martial Mansion is the partner, both sides' relations are not the high and low obedience, but is a coordinated cooperation.

In fact four big Divine Country have the competition, besides Heavenly Star Mystical Place, put in many manpower and resources in three big mystical places, therefore four big Divine Country competitions also highly turn red-hot, so under the competition, in Martial Mansion various benefits naturally also came up.

Luo Zheng nods, immediately brings Cao Junfeng to depart, since will come according to planning one step one step moves, something anxiety can serve no purpose at all.

Today Luo Zheng then for the time being departs.

For half a month the time, Luo Zheng also greatly slightly inspected this Black Iron Divine Country internal pattern, the mentality in head was also clearer.

In this Black Iron Divine Country altogether two sixth grade Martial Mansion, one then in the Black Iron Divine Country capital, another is this Jade Profound Martial Mansion.

In the hands of two Martial Mansion grasps is entering the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea quota, but wants to obtain these quotas, must become the apex in Martial Mansion exists!

Because enters Feather Sovereign Mystical Place martial artist, at least is Life and Death Realm expert, even if Luo Zheng adopted the inspection, in Martial Mansion with arrived good achievements, but if wants to obtain the Heavenly Feather Sacred Ground quota, must compete with these Life and Death Realm expert.

Regarding these situations, Luo Zheng also already expected, he actually gentle that the mood puts, besides cultivation, even has also purchased some books, understands some customs and local conditions and social customs in four big Divine Country much.

More many of understanding, more are favorable for Luo Zheng, the opportunity always leaves person who is prepared, these enters Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, is related to the Ning Yudie life, Luo Zheng makes no mistake.

Relatively speaking, this Divine Country one line, actually must be easier more and comfortable than Sea God Continent one line.

Luo Zheng is also clear, then he must face among competitions with many expert as before.

Half a month later, Luo Zheng then registered according to instruction, after a arrived data plate, entered the Jade Profound Martial Mansion front door.

However Luo Zheng just entered, suddenly four Life and Death Realm martial artist threaten to clash from him, sees front Luo Zheng, one of them is commands: “Go away!”

Luo Zheng hears the following sound, a brow slightly wrinkle, just turned head, the front surface then welcomes a whip!

His brow wrinkle, Cao Junfeng has taken the lead to seize firmly that whip, the Luo Zheng's vision then falls on these four Life and Death Realm expert behind a person, that is one wears the son of the influential of brocade robe, seems, only then 17-18 year appearance, but had Void Tribulation Realm later stage cultivation base.

===========================

===========================





#762 - Black Iron Command


This wears the son of the influential fresh good looks of brocade robe, the deportment bearing is uncommon.

Can have four Life and Death Realm martial artist to take the guard, the status perhaps compared with initially Luo Zheng in that Divine Country imperial prince of Heavenly Vast Immortal Grave bitter experience, could not miss many.

This son of the influential should be some important personage in Black Iron Divine Country, at least is also a character of imperial prince rank, Luo Zheng so guessed in the heart.

He initially enters Black Iron Divine Country, in addition is unfamiliar with the people and place, therefore walks is cautiously, lest annoying troubles.

However Luo Zheng avoids strongly troublesome, has to look for itself as before troublesome.

Youngster coldly looked at Luo Zheng, in the eye full is the meaning of provocation, simultaneously cold sound asked: “Are you also participate in the inspection martial artist?”

Luo Zheng's mind one revolution, is actually suppresses own mood, on the face even flood the smiling face, “is.”

“Good, in my Black Iron Divine Country also has foundation so solid independent martial artist, you with me, I must participate in the inspection of this round Jade Profound Martial Mansion,”has not thought that in this youngster mouth actually emits such a few words.

Martial Mansion is not sect, in fact so convenes martial artist, actually must select the strength good later generation, competes in the mystical place with other Divine Country.

If trades to do is Cloud Hall, perhaps will only recruit martial artist in the Cloud Hall interior, however the Divine Country thinking pattern is different, in their opinion, so long as is competent, can enter the mystical place, the buried treasure in excavation mystical place.

Follows this youngster?

The Luo Zheng's vision concentrates, actually shook the head, rejected this request.

“Sorry, I came and went freely, was not familiar with be others' personal servant,”Luo Zheng then neither arrogant nor servile replied.

Hears the Luo Zheng's words, then Life and Death Realm expert drinks to Luo Zheng: “Bold, my family young master makes you follow him, thinks highly of you!”

Luo Zheng look has not actually changed, instead light reply: “Since thinks highly of me, why forces someone to do something against his will?”

The youngster interested stared at Luo Zheng to look at two, immediately smiled, “good, had the strength of spirit, we walked!”

Immediately these four Life and Death Realm expert then crowd around this youngster to go far away, is on the Luo Zheng face reveals the color of accident/surprise on the contrary, here worst plan at the scene begins, four Life and Death Realm expert were passed two times, was as for three Life and Death Tribulation martial artist, they wanted to extinguish kill Luo Zheng not to be perhaps easy.

What Luo Zheng fear alarms the Divine Sea Realm big energy in city, in Divine Sea Realm can, Luo Zheng want to escape greatly is not perhaps easy.

Looks back that youngster goes far away, nearby Cao Junfeng actually relaxed, is said to Luo Zheng: “You bore patiently fortunately a moment ago.”

“What's wrong? Who is the fellow?”Luo Zheng asked.

Cao Junfeng then said: “If I have not misread, the youngster is Black Iron Divine Country Swallow King.”

“Swallow King? His age already bestowed the title of king ?”Luo Zheng strange say/way.

Four big Divine Country local conditions custom Luo Zheng already from Cao Junfeng there understanding was similar, from the Divine Country structure, in the dynasty with common custom was very similar.

However the Divine Country imperial prince wants bestowed the title of king, is actually the countless sufferings and hardships.

Divine Country country dominates in Divine Sea Realm can greatly in hand, each Divine Country Country Lord must step into Divine Sea Realm, may wield the general situation.

Divine Sea Realm can greatly the life is very glorious, takes for ten thousand years as the life of unit, their children quantities many to a situation of exaggeration, it is said Great Yu Divine Country Country Lord, then has over ten thousand sons!

These over ten thousand sons, are over ten thousand imperial princes.

From that flash of birth, these imperial princes must compete for the love of father with other people, some imperial princes, even the life did not have the opportunity to speak 1-2 words to the father!

Therefore the competition between imperial princes, among the competition difficulty compared with ordinary martial artist is bigger, is more brutal!

The average people do not have the strength, in addition can also mix to start well and end well, but the imperial prince does not have the strength, the destiny is then more miserable than the average person.

At present this imperial prince can bestowed the title of king, his strength naturally glory not belittle young.

“This Swallow King, is the pride of their Black Iron Divine Country, hehe, in their Black Iron Divine Country young one generation, the status was also next to Crown Prince, best not to have the conflict with him, at present indeed is good to deal with, but provoked these Divine Sea Realm big energies, could not eat to capture!”Cao Junfeng then so warned.

Luo Zheng nods, then walks in the direction that Swallow King leaves.

In this Martial Mansion naturally can bump into many martial artist in all directions, from Innate Secret Realm of most foundation, to Spirit Illumination Realm, arrives at Spirit Core Realm not to be rarely seen again, large number of elderly persons, and manner of leaving clash, little pays attention to other matters.

Even if discovered that Luo Zheng is Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, follower Life and Death Realm expert, is only in a hurry after shooting a look at one, cautiously lowers the head to leave, appears to other people does not pay attention.

According to the previous confession, Luo Zheng is looks for the arrived registration inspection the courtyard.

Walks from the Martial Mansion entrance, has the innumerable courtyards to set up in an array to this foot under.

Comes to register the inspection naturally is independent martial artist, but under the division of martial artist realm, the place of respective registration completely is also different.

Population most is the courtyard that is responsible for Innate lifeform being, in that courtyard discharges a character long line, around this long line does not look at to the end the position, as if long and narrow team also revolves the foot to circle, under the homespun cloth estimate, perhaps several tens of thousands people.

“These many people register, when can this wait till?”Luo Zheng looks at that long line, asking of wondering.

“Hehe, here stands in line 1-2 moon/month teams, is the common matter, since has stepped into Innate lifeform, to enter Martial Mansion, what arranges 1-2 moon/month teams is?”Cao Junfeng said with a smile.

Luo Zheng nods, above the open area outside this Martial Mansion, but was some people have knelt the several years, even dozens years, to enter Martial Mansion.

In Innate lifeform nearby courtyard, is then responsible for recruiting Spirit Illumination Realm martial artist, this Spirit Illumination Realm martial artist quantity are also many, that long line is also similarly hard to see the tail, but relativity Innate lifeform has been short.

Gets down again is responsible for the Spirit Core Realm martial artist courtyard, the Spirit Core Realm martial artist quantity that comes to inspect did not calculate many, only had several hundred people.

Even if evidently is in Divine Country, can cultivation to Spirit Core Realm as before is also only the small number of people.

But the Luo Zheng directly opposite is responsible for recruiting in the Void Tribulation Realm martial artist courtyard, only then Miao Miao Shuren, has no need to line up.

cultivation after Divine Country to Void Tribulation Realm, was boils basically has raised one's head, at least can also assume sole responsibility for an important task, was only like Central Region in like that almost cannot dominate a side.

Void Tribulation Realm following martial artist enters Martial Mansion, naturally for the resources in Martial Mansion, various cultivation technique, medicinal pill, cultivation secret room wait/etc.......

These resources are establish by Divine Country take action, is nothing less than big regarding the martial artist attraction, but rank higher Martial Mansion, in which resources are more outstanding, why this also many low level martial artist enters the Martial Mansion reason.

However Void Tribulation Realm martial artist was different.

Void Tribulation Realm martial artist walks above the martial arts for a long time, the general sense place of cultivation to the martial artist use of this rank is not big.

Can expedite expert divine item like Tower of Evil that type, can only in cultivation to Peak Battle Venerable, the arrived Void Tribulation Realm later road, must close right up against itself to go forward, can only in Life and Death informed and experienced, breaks through in the adverse circumstance slowly, if can obtain the good chance in this process, that is the road of perfect grasping principles, which martial artist without did not yearn.

Comes to participate in the inspection Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, holds the same goal with Luo Zheng, enters the sea of miracle on behalf of Black Iron Divine Country!

In these Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, few parts are independent martial artist, another part is other Martial Mansion martial artist, for example some third grade, Martial Mansion that even Void Tribulation Realm martial artist in fourth grade Martial Mansion, they are is unable to give to enter the quota of sea of miracle, can only choose a higher grade Martial Mansion.

Naturally, jumps from Martial Mansion to another Martial Mansion, does not mean the betrayal, after all with belonging to Divine Country, is equal to the elite hall in Cloud Hall, plunges into another hall.

Luo Zheng just entered in this courtyard, the Spirit Core Realm female greets, the manner is actually good, asked that Luo Zheng wants to participate in the inspection, strives for Black Iron Command?

Black Iron Command, enters the token of sea of miracle, four big Divine Country agree the good custom, each Divine Country can only issue that every year the quantity suitable token, these tokens are equal to entering the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea token, Great Yu Divine Country issues naturally is Da Yu command.

From afar, came from far away, the goal is this, Luo Zheng naturally nodded.





#763 - Red Circle


Afterward that Spirit Core Realm female was Luo Zheng one by one has registered.

Luo Zheng also somewhat worried, feared the opposite party inquired the Luo Zheng's source, he has discussed with Cao Junfeng before this, was simple has fabricated a status.

Cao Junfeng told Luo Zheng not to need to be worried, Divine Country did not ask the source generally, independent martial artist when were the hidden world was OK.

After all regarding Black Iron Divine Country, any person is unimportant, more importantly has enough strength, fights for resources in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, after these resources take, Divine Country itself can also divide to one, therefore they do not regard as important the source.

Since let alone around God big Divine Country the surrounding sea, these many ten thousand years, can it be that all martial artist have stemmed from Divine Country itself, rarely has the foreign country guest, in the Divine Country Country Lord eye, martial artist in every our country, will certainly belong to my Divine Country.

Therefore Luo Zheng then one by one answered the issue of that Spirit Core Realm female, but mentioned Luo Zheng name time, he hesitated slightly, immediately replied: “I called Luo Tianxing.”

Luo Zheng this name, actually does not suit in Divine Country, is mainly is used to guard against that Great Yu Divine Country Divine Country saintess.

After registering, this young girl shows a faint smile, then all information seals in together the bamboo sign, immediately has given Luo Zheng, “the first inspection decides three days later, when the time comes this Martial Mansion martial artist, will enter the stage with your independent martial artist, hopes that you can have a good showing!”

Interesting to listen to that this Spirit Core Realm young girl words said that in the heart actually has drawn actually the conclusion to the Luo Zheng's destiny, this called Luo Tianxing martial artist, was doomed only to become a set-off, cannot escape destiny that was eliminated.

Is the competition in Divine Country how frigid?

In Jade Profound Martial Mansion also only then less than 50 quotas, is 50 Black Iron Command.

But is only in Jade Profound Martial Mansion has close 600 Void Tribulation Realm martial artist to compete, these Void Tribulation Realm martial artist overwhelming majorities are Void Tribulation Realm later stage, is higher than cultivation base of this youngster at present, martial artist that let alone Jade Profound Martial Mansion trains, compares these independent martial artist formidable many by far!

Not only so, in these 50 quotas, some imperial princes participate to rob, Swallow King that for example just registered, that is almost settled to attain Black Iron Command.

In addition, 200-300 independent martial artist like Luo Tianxing, independent martial artist dares to enter for the inspection, competes for Black Iron Command, cultivation base is at the Void Tribulation Realm later stage Peak condition basically......

In her present youngster, although seems the foundation is good, the 20-year-old skeletal age is Void Tribulation Realm middle stage martial artist, but wants to attain Black Iron Command now, is too early.

The young girl is only the innermost feelings so is thinking, the meaning of but during that slightly humble smile, revealing also looked by Luo Zheng in the eye.

Does Luo Zheng cast a sidelong glance, how he who sees clearly the will of the people cannot understand?

He will certainly not care about the idea of this young girl, is with a smile to that young girl, after this bamboo sign income pouch, then left Jade Profound Martial Mansion.

Three days later, Luo Zheng enters Jade Profound Martial Mansion once more, after having shown the bamboo sign in hand, has the specialist to guide him to enter the Martial Mansion deep place.

What presents in Luo Zheng present is a large-scale square, in the square gathered many martial artist, each martial artist disseminates the Void Tribulation Realm aura.

When the Luo Zheng's vision transfers to the square center, the vision then suddenly concentrates, Divine Sea Realm big energy! Moreover is three!

Divine Country really lives up to reputation, is only in Martial Mansion has three Divine Sea Realm big energies merely, and has the possibility very much, in this Jade Profound Martial Mansion continues these three Divine Sea Realm big energies!

However this Jade Profound Martial Mansion can be considered as the sixth grade sect influence, even if divides alone from Divine Country, actually is also considered as on existence of sacred ground rank.

In Sea God Continent human race Purple Heart Sacred Ground also can only calculate that initially enters sixth grade sacred ground, is three Divine Sea Realm big energies, like this calculates, Jade Profound Martial Mansion can indeed compare “sixth grade sacred ground”this kind of Martial Mansion merely is only the Black Iron Divine Country subordinate, expert in four big Divine Country indeed are hard to count!

No wonder for these years, they treat as place of barbarian desolate Central Region, rarely has Divine Country martial artist to be willing to go to Central Region.

Recalls, initially in Heavenly Vast Immortal Grave bitter experience that Divine Country imperial prince and Divine Country sacred ground, they to Central Region were what kind of disdaining, pride and arrogance that on their faces revealed that also had the strength to be the backing.

Even so, Luo Zheng does not have slight flinching.

Mind like still water, the Luo Zheng's mentality is gentle, clear(ly) knows that this road is difficult, he actually left unprecedented, has no alternative, the disposition makes it so, is the destiny makes it so.

After entering the square, guiding the Luo Zheng's person then to exhort him to wait here, immediately floating departs.

Is standing erect about over a thousand Void Tribulation Realm martial artist around the square, entered Void Tribulation Realm is also established expert, was maintaining certain alert, but was insufficient to reveal the hostility, instead most people were face wind light cloud Danqi calm down the idle appearance.

Reveals the hostility to other people at will, not only will incur some unnecessary trouble, let alone also fell the low grade only then the weak one all day long stares to others, expert is not careless?

Also because of this, the atmosphere is appears somewhat strange.

Sees this, on the Luo Zheng face appears together the understanding happy expression, he is also shouldering both hands, stood in the corner.

Who knows that he just stood firm, feels the vision to strafe together without consulting anybody toward oneself, he turned head to look at the past, was that young “Swallow King”.

Even if evidently by bestowed the title of king, this Swallow King were wanted to participate in the inspection, oneself compete for Black Iron Command diligently!

Being true that really Cao Junfeng said that even if the Divine Country imperial prince, such as in the cloud world cannot obtain too many giving favored treatment in this expert, must strive by oneself.

Divine Country this procedure actually is also right, why can Country Lord control big Divine Country? Dependence eventually own strength.

If because of Country Lord reason, the imperial prince sovereign females are then lazy in cultivation, after first Country Lord died, who can inherit the position of Country Lord? Perhaps shortly greatly can win by other formidable Divine Sea Realm.

Only then continuously trains the Divine Sea Realm big energy, moreover if needed Divine Sea Realm can outstanding person, be able to continue greatly Divine Country!

Discovered that Swallow King is staring at itself, Luo Zheng has then given an opposite party light smiling face.

That Swallow King is only coldly looked at Luo Zheng one, then moves to elsewhere the vision arrived.

Before long, probably was the person has expired, after a deacon handed over a list, three Divine Sea Realm that the management inspected can then open the mouth to say greatly: “Competed for the preliminary inspection of Black Iron Command to start, the content of this inspection was simplest, everybody minute of raid entered in the square, squeezed out beyond the opposite party by oneself own strength the red line, even if were the winner! In the square can fight, but cannot kill people! The offenders, punish mercilessly!”

That Divine Sea Realm can say greatly, puts out a hand in a ground gently racket, appears in the square central ground the colorful pattern.

The ground of this square does not know that is made by any metal, seems to the person a sincere/heavy incomparable feeling, the most addendum circles of these patterns are actually arranging a red line.

After hearing that Divine Sea Realm can announce rule greatly, on numerous Void Tribulation Realm martial artist face not too many expressions.

Sees this, Luo Zheng actually recalled that on the same day he just entered the Azure Clouds Sect's time, whenever heard inspection content time, many martial artist always discuss spiritedly.

Under the relativity, present these over a thousand Void Tribulation Realm martial artist quality natures are different, young steps into Void Tribulation Realm Divine Rank Talent to be different like Luo Zheng and Swallow King, the majority of Void Tribulation Realm martial artist age is heavy, from dozens years old to over a hundred years old, even several hundred -year-old Void Tribulation Realm martial artist has.

They naturally cannot look like just stepped into the new military recruits of martial arts to be common, exhibit one to anything very novel manner.

Quick, that Divine Sea Realm can start to announce that greatly first round enters the list that in the circle inspects.

This round inspection, is 30 people participates, but in these 30 people can only leave behind three people to exist, in other words 90% people will be eliminated.

Luo Zheng's both eyes shut, is actually inclining the head and listening attentively that Divine Sea Realm to read the name greatly, 30 names read quickly, has not heard “Luo Tianxing”three characters, first round was not one's turn itself evidently.

First round was called name to have the advantage also to have the fault, the fault is not the familiar rule and environment, after the successor can advance observing and emulating, in the heart alerts something needing attention ahead of time, but the advantage is also obvious, everybody not familiar rule, then can chaotic win!

Quick, 30 Void Tribulation Realm martial artist entered the stadium at the same time, entered in the square central red circle.

The vision of people also glitters, ahead of time inspected very importantly, was eliminated by elimination directly, then just misses with Black Iron Command, as Divine Country martial artist, everyone is clear Black Iron Command the importance, in this moment, nobody will choose to keep the hand!





#764 - Winners


Then was was just entering in red circle, many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist then overran toward the center of red circle.

The diameter of this red circle is about dozens zhang (3.33 m), regarding Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, one step can step, in each martial artist heart clear, enters must take the advantageous terrain instantaneously, prevents to be pushed by other people.

“Go away! Here is my position!”Grandiosely is similar to orangutan general martial artist roars.

This martial artist actually steady standing in the central zone of red circle, after nearby several martial artist fight for the failure, the vision maliciously is also staring at that grandiose martial artist, but this grandiose martial artist is Void Tribulation Realm later stage Peak, the temples are blow up high, transmits a sincere/heavy aura from him, as if itself cultivation extremely overbearing cultivation technique, everybody does not dare to fight for with him directly.

After 30 people respectively select oneself position, Divine Sea Realm expert is announces: “The first round, starts!”

“hū hū hū......”

After that Divine Sea Realm expert just ordered, true essence of all martial artist within the body at the same time erupt!

“Well?”

On the Luo Zheng's face reveals strange look on the contrary.

This true essence erupts, as if all imposing manners were included in the red circle!

Saw that on several other hundred martial artist faces revealed to see not the strange expression, Luo Zheng has also felt relaxed, Divine Country developed these many years, affirmed to be progressive than it Central Region, was only his experience is evidently insufficient.

Other did not say, if Void Tribulation Realm martial artist displays fully, what location also there is able to undergo lives to devastate?

If 30 Void Tribulation Realm martial artist resist fully, don't said this square, can perhaps this Martial Mansion instantaneously destroying......

Evidently all strangeness, are in this embed above the floor and that red circle of various patterns.

When the Luo Zheng guess, Void Tribulation Realm martial artist in red circle started to begin.

This rule is really simple, so long as rumbles beyond the red circle the opposite party, simultaneously prevents itself to be rumbled to exit.

“Hehe, middle that grandiose martial artist estimate must have bad luck,”Luo Zheng is actually light saying with a smile.

Although his voice is small, but surrounding several Void Tribulation Realm martial artist also listened in the ear, on that several Void Tribulation Realm martial artist faces revealed the contemptuous vision immediately.

Luo Zheng actually does not know, places the red circle midpoint that Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, is the same with Luo Zheng, is one becomes famous for a long time independent martial artist, that grandiose martial artist is actually Body and Essence Dual Cultivation, cultivation cultivation technique is overbearing fierce.

It looks like in many people, since this grandiose martial artist the choice participates in the inspection, then attains an profound iron to make is also the matter of being settled.

Therefore hears Luo Zheng to say this saying, they then thought that Luo Zheng was extremely friendless and unlearned.

However Luo Zheng just said that in red circle immediately had the mutation!

In red circle altogether also only then 30 Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, but just started in the inspection, really has near half martial artist suddenly toward that grandiose martial artist take action!

This grandiose martial artist strength is fierce, how can by a person of strength, hard anti- several Void Tribulation Realm martial artist?

But this red circle so small range, regarding Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, can only be “remote of Half Step”that grandiose martial artist is also hard to seek for the avoidance the place, can only resist hardly!

Under this grandiose martial artist complexion big change, only then explodes suddenly drinks one, is actually revolving astral essence, with that more than half Void Tribulation Realm martial artist hard anti-.

“Ha!”

“Bang!”

Great disparity in strength between both are not the tiny bit!

Several Void Tribulation Realm martial artist launch an attack, that grandiose martial artist was similar to breaks the kite of line to be ordinary, was rumbled directly beyond the red circle!

“pū pū pū......”

Meanwhile, that grandiose martial artist was the blood of mouth spitting also has sprinkled place.

Less than time of breath, the most popular character was was eliminated merely, lets many martial artist sharp drop eye.

Three Divine Sea Realm can look at each other one greatly, on the face is having a light happy expression, their three as if also already expected so.

But formerly ridiculed that Luo Zheng's that several martial artist, was the surprise looked out Luo Zheng, in the heart was actually strange, the vision of this fellow was actually sinister.

Audience these many martial artist, it is estimated that can see this point, only then that three Divine Sea Realm big energies, Luo Zheng.

Although the rule of Jade Profound Martial Mansion establishment is simple, but must participate really gets the winning side, needs certain plans besides the strength.

Everybody is in this red circle, finally can only the remaining three people, all people not be willing to be pushed by others, then everybody's goal is not the weakest person!

Because of each martial artist facing own match, the appraisal, you looks like me is weaker than? Good, you are not big to my threat, I naturally cannot process you personally, you either were processed by others, the person who when either is eliminated was similar, processes you again! You are in any case weaker than me, eat to decide you are also sooner or later matter, why from the beginning good fee/spent strength?

Therefore everybody's goal from the beginning, does not squeeze out most weak one, but most expert!

Under this logic, who is most bad luck?

Naturally is looks like the strongest that fellow! Especially is most rampant, but also dares to occupy that fellow of most advantageous terrain!

Thereupon, has had from the beginning bad luck on that grandiose martial artist of grab dead center, was collaborated expel to leave beyond the red circle by several Void Tribulation Realm martial artist directly.

These martial artist collaborate in the flash, but stems from the taboo of instinct.

Actually establishment this rule inspects martial artist, does not favor contending expert, only if there is strength of absolute crush, otherwise from the beginning expert will become the goal of people.

But under Luo Zheng changes mind, understood the Jade Profound Martial Mansion so intention.

The martial artist strength, cultivation base and strength are also only part, the strength also included the luck and brain, even if many times own is powerful, by opposite party mechanism is calculated completely dies, that grandiose martial artist belongs typically person who has the strength not to have the brain.

Naturally, cannot say that he does not have the brain completely, after all sees martial artist also few that in this rule has far-reaching idea on the spot, don't all people have the brain?

Only can say that everything cannot extremely in the rampancy, the low key resistance is a kingly way.

“Rumbling......”

In the red circle, all martial artist starts to carry on the chaotic fight.

That Divine Sea Realm big energy is to also warn, in the red circle cannot kill people, everybody take action also calculates the restraint, comes nobody to use the weapon, two come everybody's goal is compels the red circle the opposite party, does not aim at offending somebody and killing people.

Naturally, the martial artist take action confrontation, offends somebody is actually hard to avoid, under some martial artist were then collaborated to attack from both sides by several people, was knocked down directly, afterward a foot kicks on the body, is similar to the broken gunnysack is together ordinary, had been kicked from the red circle.

This tangled warfare the time that continues to burn a joss stick, most starts is the peak of being eliminated, some people were rumbled directly, some people were knocked down to throw, some people are the courage are small, under the avoidance, has to leave the red circle.

As the population in red circle starts steadily to reduce, remaining previous ten martial artist start cautiously walks randomly, must look for the opportunity to rumble the red circle the opposite party, but must avoid itself being rumbled to exit.

Movement rapidness of Void Tribulation Realm martial artist how? Previous ten forms is ordinary just like shadows, sways, but some people were rumbled once for a while the red circle.

Finally remaining, only then six martial artist time, little had martial artist to be rumbled, at this time Eldest Marquis was more discrete! In six martial artist, can have three to remain, they have 1/2 opportunity inspections to be qualified!

Suddenly, is rarely has the person to fight mutually.

However these Void Tribulation Realm martial artist do not fight, Martial Mansion naturally has the means to make them fight! That red circle starts to contract unexpectedly!

Saw only that red circle to rock lightly, started to draw, the speed of drawing in toward the center unexpectedly unceasingly is not slow, probably was equal to an old person in the speed on the street strolling.

The red circle contracts toward the center unceasingly, the range is also getting smaller, the space of activity naturally also changed small, in six martial artist some people were finally anxious.

“Rumbling......”

martial artist that cannot calm down first, was first one step is rumbled the red circle.

Remaining two martial artist instantaneously were also rumbled to exit......

The first round inspection also decided the victory and defeat, remaining three martial artist also became the first round winner.

===========================

===========================





#765 - Rampant Swallow King


After first round 30 Void Tribulation Realm martial artist carry on the inspection, the people also understood the rule, first can run, once more, is the low key.

In addition has not entered red circle martial artist, starts newly round to size up!

In many person's mind powerful enemies in heart, if has encountered such match in the red circle, then wants first to squeeze out the bureau him.

As the matter stands, some famous Void Tribulation Realm later stage Peak martial artist, on the face reveal the color of forced smile.

Own strength was formidable enough, participating in the inspection should be a big superiority, has not thought that now actually became a big inferiority.

Hides one's incompetence by remaining silent everybody to be able, the issue is in these people the strengths of many person knows for other people, does this also hide?

Many vision have sized up Swallow King secretly, although this young Swallow King does not stem from Jade Profound Martial Mansion, is he early with arrived own manor, the strength is almost next to Divine Country Crown Prince, the people are actually think that this Swallow King can be eliminated? If 29 Void Tribulation Realm martial artist simultaneously resist Swallow King, this Swallow King can withstand?

Swallow King never cannot realize these Void Tribulation Realm martial artist vision, the implication in that vision?

He is only light snort/hum, the corners of the mouth have cast aside slightly, in the mouth then unclearly said one, “only then the weak one will think of every means!”Since he choice goes to Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, moreover in the name of bestowed the title of king, if this inspection is unable to pass, before he was also the surname of shame to oneself name!

Luo Zheng as before look indifferent is looking at present this, the present situation is most advantageous regarding Luo Zheng, comes his cultivation base, be only Void Tribulation Realm middle stage, two come him not to have the fame in Black Iron Divine Country, at all some impossible people to note his head, now he only needs to hold troops is OK.

“Hehe, this fellows, understand how this game should play,”Divine Sea Realm can say with a smile greatly.

“Has a look whether this year to be born some fierce little fellows, last year entered Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, the harvest of our Divine Country first from the bottom, this way perhaps somewhat has troubled, hopes that this year my Jade Profound Martial Mansion martial artist can confess the past!”Divine Sea Realm can on the face also be heavyhearted greatly.

Divine Country consumes the large amounts of resources to construct Martial Mansion, may have the price! Their goals naturally are to hope Martial Mansion train more elites, then enters Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea “mining”to the Divine Country huge repayment, then develops Martial Mansion, so positive cycle!

Four big Divine Country positive cycle these many years, establish to endure to compare sacred ground Martial Mansion one after another! Can such great strength of four big Divine Country development.

After three Divine Sea Realm chatted several, Divine Sea Realm can pull out that list greatly once more, starts to mention by name.

“Bo Sifan!”

“Ao Gang!”

“Ten thousand handsome......”

“Zhao......”

After that Divine Sea Realm can read greatly, Luo Zheng light looks at that to restore originally the big or small red circle, these round does not have own list as before.

Luo Zheng is not anxious, can always be one's turn own.

The second round inspection starts quickly, the people pay attention to the fight in red circle once more.

This round inspection also wants to be quicker, the time of the first round speed probably less than burning a joss stick, 30 people decided the victory and defeat quickly, other 27 being eliminated leave the field resentfully, but the other three people are in high spirits.

Then is the third round, the fourth round, the fifth round......

After seven rounds, Luo Zheng listens to arrived own name finally.

“Luo Tianxing!”Can in the mouth read the Luo Zheng's alias from that Divine Sea Realm greatly.

The Luo Zheng slight bow, took the step toward front immediately.

The vision of people slightly has stopped on Luo Zheng's, immediately has moved out of the way the vision, after all Luo Zheng also only then Void Tribulation Realm middle stage cultivation base . Moreover the face is strange incomparable, this fellow does not threaten regarding them, radically not in attention, because they think this fellow who called Luo Tianxing, supported in the red circle, destiny that arrived also unavoidably was finally eliminated as before!

Is on that Swallow King face reveals a happy expression on the contrary, this happy expression then sends in view of Luo Zheng, but Luo Zheng uses temporarily as has not seen.

Three Divine Sea Realm can size up Luo Zheng greatly, on the face has glittered a strange color.

“This is called the independent martial artist foundation, seems stable, perhaps his strength endures to compare Void Tribulation Realm later stage!”Saying that Divine Sea Realm can affirm greatly.

Another Divine Sea Realm can nod greatly, “does not know that this boy Master becomes where, really has a faint pressure to me, this boy facing Void Tribulation Realm later stage martial artist, will not be defeated absolutely!”

“Hehe, you two are really conservative,”last Void Tribulation Realm can say greatly: “I thought that this boy can end to defeat Void Tribulation Realm later stage martial artist!”

Several Divine Sea Realm can give the Luo Zheng's appraisal greatly is very good, even if in four big Divine Country, defeats the Life and Death Realm martial artist example not to be many by Void Tribulation Realm, after all the disparity between these two was too big!

Therefore three Divine Sea Realm can only be able to obtain this commentary greatly.

They actually cannot think, Luo Zheng is forcibly by own strength, turned Life and Death Realm Fourth Layer Cui Xie dry!

Also because of so the reason, initially Luo Zheng directed in Heartless Reverend Central Region, if not personally sees, the average person is very difficult to believe that even if these Divine Sea Realm can greatly the vision is sinister, but has underestimated the Luo Zheng's strength as before.

The name can read greatly by that Divine Sea Realm, 30 people have determined basically.

However talked over last “Swallow King”name time, other 28 people could not bear shiver, was maintaining except for Luo Zheng's look indifferent.

Swallow King strength everybody also early has hearing, nobody is willing to encounter Swallow King in the red circle, but at present other 29 martial artist only then a choice, that is the strength of set all people first is eliminated Swallow King expel.

Sees the look that the people dread, Swallow King has smiled one lightly, immediately calmly takes a step to enter the red circle the loyalty!

Since the first round inspection time, after that grandiose martial artist was collaborated to rumble beyond the red circle by several people, was few people are willing to occupy the central zone of red circle.

Although loyalty center is the most advantageous domain, but also is the target of public criticism, occupies this position, isn't courts death?

However Swallow King actually standing calmly, the vision indifferently took a fast look around other martial artist in red circle, on the face has been hanging the contemptuous smiling face, he wants the certificate, had the true strength, by him can other crush 29 people!

A hyena enters in the flock of sheep, may encounter the resistance of flock of sheep, then a lion?

If before this in rounds aimed at these “expert”is a hyena, the flock of sheep also has the strength of resistance, then Swallow King enters the lion in flock of sheep now, these flocks of sheep except for run away in front of oneself, does not have any leeway of choice.

Saw that Martial Mansion Divine Sea Realm can not announce greatly starts, Swallow King said directly: “This round inspection, will contend only one person! Other 29 people of I will be complete bang to be eliminated!”

Hears Swallow King this saying, in the numerous martial artist heart in red circle trembles immediately, they look to look that on the face of Swallow King reveals fear.

Before this if martial artist performance strong of some too, other martial artist will share a common hatred, joins up, but currently on everybody face has the hesitant color, by the Swallow King strength, they joins up usefully?

Luo Zheng stands in the corner of red circle, he actually slightly shakes the head, this Swallow King is very intelligent, his reputation outside, is unable to hide one's incompetence by remaining silent, therefore on reverse its say/way, simply rampantly!

So rampant, will then harass other martial artist mentalities, if lived to dread to the Swallow King real heart, perhaps was hard to form resists him with joint forces!

However must have the rampant strength rampantly, if this Swallow King strength is insufficient, other so rampant under Void Tribulation Realm martial artist are not the fools, nobody will buy his account.

As that Divine Sea Realm can issue an order greatly, this round inspection finally started.

martial artist that martial artist that the fate eliminates, as well as has not participated, also starts to discuss to the situation.

“You said first eliminates who can be? Can be Swallow King?”

“Swallow King is so fierce, who dares to court death with him launches an attack? I guess, is that is called the Luo Tianxing fellow mostly, Void Tribulation Realm middle stage martial artist, hehe......”

“I also guess am he, looks at his physique, where can block others' attack? A fist flew on the bang!”

“Looked that some people have launched an attack to him, it is estimated that he must be eliminated!”

During people's discussion, Void Tribulation Realm later stage martial artist suddenly has charged into Luo Zheng, that martial artist look is fierce, said toward Luo Zheng cold sound: “You, are eliminated to me first!”

The Luo Zheng's vision flashes, has not actually chosen with that martial artist meets the tough head-on with toughness, but in a flash, almost stepped on the edge of red circle to dodge gently in one side.





#766 - Chasing After And Never Giving Up


The Luo Zheng's idea as far as possible maintains the low key, did not reveal that own strength, becomes keeps that three people in red circle safely finally.

By the Luo Zheng present strength, this is not difficult, although the range in red circle is small, but Luo Zheng only needed to dodge unceasingly has been OK, although must face one crowd of Void Tribulation Realm later stage martial artist here.

Let alone this cultivation base, is not noticeable, generally will not become the goals of other people.

However at present this fellow for no reason launches the attack toward oneself, will want to kick to be eliminated, this made Luo Zheng somewhat bewildered.

“Suddenly......”

Under the Luo Zheng's form flutters, almost stepped on the edge of red circle to circle.

From beginning to end Luo Zheng has faced that martial artist, the expression on face is hanging the light happy expression, is maintaining quite calm.

Avoids an attack, properly speaking that fellow should give up, Luo Zheng does not want to look for trouble, even has not launched the counter-attack to that fellow.

Who knows that the opposite party is unforgiving radically, dies to nip in Luo Zheng behind, fist glow greatly rises in hand, does not have greatly the stance that Luo Zheng kicks to be eliminated does not give up!

“Is eliminated to me!”That person is sneering, while launches the attack toward Luo Zheng.

“Careless careless......”

Luo Zheng did not say a word, remnant shades stepped on the edge of red circle to plunder unceasingly, avoided an opposite party another attack, in the heart actually slightly sinks, this fellow did not suit!

The opposite party completely gave up the defense, under so all-out attack, if other people want to kick him to be eliminated are the easy matters.

Luo Zheng and he does not have the enmity to be not resentful, this person does not need to stare at to attack stubbornly, this was equal to that he completely gave up through the opportunity of inspection, goes all out to oneself drag!

Who incites him such to do?

The Luo Zheng's corner of the eye split vision glanced, falls on the body of Swallow King.

Sees only that Swallow King to cross the hands behind the back to stand, stands in the midpoint of red circle, rotates regarding him in his light light corpuscles slowly.

Although surrounding Void Tribulation Realm martial artist seizes to slaughtering just luxurious, does not have anybody to dare to attack Swallow King, but the Swallow King vision stays on oneself!

“Really is this fellow!”

The Luo Zheng's complexion sinks slightly, since he enters this Martial Mansion time, stared by this fellow, generally looks for itself to trouble again, does not know that is what meaning?

Sends for probing my strength?

The solution chases own fellow, by the Luo Zheng present strength is to blink the general time, but Luo Zheng somewhat is scruple.

Stands in the Luo Zheng's angle, by lowest-key, even the bystander seems like the method of luck attains Black Iron Command, then relies on Black Iron Command to enter Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, attains Life Origin Stone, this is the best result!

He does not hope to bring to anybody's attention.

May just enter in this Martial Mansion, stared unexpectedly, this is not a good sign.

“Evidently, nobody dares to launch an attack to Swallow King, he stands there nobody dares to move him! The Swallow King prestige is really uncommon!”

“Nonsense, in young one generation, Swallow King was also extremely expert, besides Crown Prince, that talent Xiao Daoyuan in black Martial Mansion, was Swallow King? However these three people have not been divided the victory and defeat, if these three people of showdowns, I thought that the opportunity of Swallow King win is not small.”

“Swallow King vision, as if centralized on that strange youth.”

“The youth ran 7-8 to encircle around red circle, flees to the wilderness, does not understand to hit back unexpectedly, is really disgraced!”

At this time a 20 over youth was looking at the fight in red circle, was actually light saying: “Disgraced? Snort, was pursued by Void Tribulation Realm later stage martial artist is so long, had not been moved by the opposite party including the sleeves, if this also called disgraced, does not know that anything is called does not lose face!”

The youth of speech, is most expert in Jade Profound Martial Mansion young generation, named Zhan Yun, if must to a Black Iron Divine Country young generation of platoon seating order, he be able with Crown Prince, Swallow King and black Martial Mansion Xiao Daoyuan enters the first echelon.

Luo Zheng belonged to brave the common that kind, was not born in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, is only independent martial artist, cultivation base also only then flies Void Tribulation Realm middle stage, Luo Zheng will not be certainly noticeable.

Because of a Zhan Yun so saying, everybody's vision was centralized immediately on Luo Zheng, in the heart is actually filled with the doubt, “this boy, some Zhan Yun said was so strong?”

Actually is not only Zhan Yun, in three Divine Sea Realm big energies that one side observes, similarly also falls the vision on Luo Zheng.

The performance of Swallow King, these Divine Sea Realm can not pay attention greatly, after all his Swallow King great reputation for a long time, attained Black Iron Command is also the matter of being settled, moreover Swallow King was collaborated expel to leave the red circle by other 29 people, lost has scrambled for the qualifications of Black Iron Command, the child of his solemn Country Lord, had the extremely formidable talent and strength, how possibly to get so far as Black Iron Command?

Greatly what these Divine Sea Realm can pay attention was some new promote, but martial artist, for example looked like Luo Zheng this person.

Naturally, in the independent martial artist quantity of beside Martial Mansion growing, although are many, but the quality is unable to be a worthy opponent with the Martial Mansion talent, these Divine Sea Realm can not count on that greatly Luo Zheng has the strength of Swallow King this talent.

Nowadays Void Tribulation Realm martial artist in Black Iron Divine Country, can enter the first echelon also only then four people, but can enter the second echelon has 36 people.

This first, the second echelon equals 40 people definitely to have Black Iron Command, after all Jade Profound Martial Mansion and Black Iron Command in black Martial Mansion these two big sixth grade Martial Mansion add to have 100, adds on the talents in other 2-3 fifth grade Martial Mansion.

But Luo Zheng can enter the third echelon, and strives for the profound iron command, gains arrived regarding Jade Profound Martial Mansion.

What a pity Black Iron Divine Country independent martial artist rarely has such person, even if there is a such person, their lists also already enabled three Divine Sea Realm greatly to glance, is this is called Luo Tianxing martial artist on the contrary, makes them very strange.

In other words, does not know which corner jumps martial artist that from, moreover strength also good appearance......

Luo Zheng one after another moves regarding the red circle, in the heart is also intertwines incomparably, he does not want take action greatly, but this cannot throw off this fellow, he counted on some people kicking to be eliminated that fellow, in this will pursue will catch up with on the way, many martial artist were kicked to be eliminated, may nobody begin to the following that fellow actually.

This way is not the means.

Thinks of here, the Luo Zheng's vision dodges suddenly, the personal appearance overruns toward the middle of red circle just like snake general flexible swaying from side to side swiftly.

Under this sprint, Luo Zheng especially has avoided that Swallow King, what Luo Zheng has not thought that that Swallow King stood is standing one's ground steadfastly same place, but when Luo Zheng just approached the red circle center, that Swallow King smiles lightly, immediately the single-handed claw, wields gently, is three swift and fierce claw imprint flies high to shoot toward oneself.

That claw imprint oncoming force is extremely quick, then completely blocks the road of Luo Zheng left, middle, and right, if Luo Zheng wants to pass, can only resist hardly.

As for follows Luo Zheng's that fellow, is imposing manner greatly rises, must compel into the hopeless situation Luo Zheng inevitably.

At this moment, the Luo Zheng's form dodges gently, actually shuttled back and forth along the space a distance, from red circle other walked at the same time.

Three claw imprint that Swallow King this wields conveniently failed naturally, is actually directly soars rear that martial artist to go.

At this moment no one has expected, the Luo Zheng unexpectedly direct shuttle space, is on the face of that Swallow King reveals color of being startled, pursues Luo Zheng's that martial artist to be unexpected, has run directly upon Swallow King claw imprint.

“pū pū pū!”

Three sharp claw imprint broke that martial artist clothes robe instantaneously, immediately sends out a resounding, seemed that martial artist guard treasure armor also gives to cut to pieces, immediately the dark red blood flowed following the body of that martial artist.

Swallow King sees oneself injure accidentally the person on one's own side, is only coldly snort/hum, no matter also that martial artist life, the vision follows once more on Luo Zheng.

Also does not know that he in thinking anything, this does not strike, he has not actually pursued Luo Zheng, stands in as in same place motionless.

Nobody pursues himself, Luo Zheng was relaxed immediately.

Now in the red circle the remaining more than ten people, these more than ten people still fiercely are also struggling.

This round struggle, front several rounds is more frigid, because comprehensive several rounds everybody can compete for the final three quotas, is these round because of existence of Swallow King, everybody does not dare to touch him, therefore he was settled has accounted for a quota, the remaining people can only compete for two quotas, the opportunity have been short of one-third immediately.





#767 - How Can Like This?


Under the so crazy competition, has martial artist to be kicked to be eliminated unceasingly.

But because Luo Zheng very vigilant, whenever some people wants to take the localization goal the time, his personal appearance in a flash, is far away from other attack scopes suddenly.

In this red circle, everybody does not have the explicit goal, must eliminate in any case all people, finally only remaining three people, few people pursue to the end and hit hard to Luo Zheng.

In this process, the Swallow King vision is similar to the poisonous snake generally stubbornly is staring at itself, making Luo Zheng feel that is not feeling well.

Naturally, is the same with Swallow King, three Divine Sea Realm can greatly also the vision centralized on Luo Zheng.

“Is skilled in Space Law, moreover seemed complete second layer cultivation, the potential of this boy is good!”

“By strength that the present shows, can be considered as reluctantly on is Divine Rank Talent, can stand the third steps in Black Iron Divine Country, moreover is the top layer of third steps!”

“Such character, should give him Black Iron Command, but I somewhat am worried......”

By three Divine Sea Realm can greatly the vision, how could not see that Swallow King is aiming at Luo Zheng?

“Swallow King has opened the mouth, in this round only then he can attain Black Iron Command, his disposition will perhaps live up to one's words, I am worried about him to Luo Tianxing take action.”

“Oh, in independent martial artist little presents this character, hoping him to be able through the inspection.”

“Perhaps is a little difficult, the first steps our Black Iron Divine Country also only then four people, the strengths between this first steps and second steps differ far, only if this Luo Tianxing strength can stand in the peak of second steps, may contend with Swallow King slightly!”

Luo Zheng does not certainly know, these three Divine Sea Realm can actually be worried about him greatly.

Swallow King indeed has had the strong interest to Luo Zheng, this time participates in the inspection, he will also pay attention new promote expert in young generation.

He planned to seek in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, Jade Profound Martial Mansion first that is called the Zhan Yun fellow, is actually the Crown Prince person, he is unable to win over, but this present Luo Zheng......

Talent of Swallow King judge is very fierce, this point he has inherited oneself father completely, since he sees the Luo Zheng first time, thought that the Luo Zheng's strength is not simple.

These Divine Sea Realm can actually only be able to act according to the Luo Zheng's performance assessment greatly, the Luo Zheng's strength can only be in the apex of third echelon, however in the Swallow King eye, the fellow who this runs away unceasingly, is desirably is moving to warehouse own strength!

His preliminary estimate, the Luo Zheng's strength first echelon possibly cannot go, but the apex of second echelon should not have the major problem.

What is more important is this person before this quiet nameless, naturally will not win over by Crown Prince, this fish slip through, how will Swallow King let off?

Matter that at this time Swallow King must handle only, probes the Luo Zheng true strength!

The first round probe had ended, Luo Zheng displays Space Law no doubt to make Swallow King exclaim in surprise, but he is dissatisfied, the strength of this boy absolutely incessantly a little.

The issue is this Luo Tianxing was too sly, has almost avoided all martial artist, does not fight with anybody, as the matter stands, Swallow King is very difficult to estimate the Luo Zheng's strength.

As martial artist in red circle are getting fewer and fewer, on the face of Swallow King appears the light happy expression, the opportunity always has together, can only probe the Luo Zheng strength by him evidently personally the bottom line!

martial artist only remaining five in quick, red circle, besides Swallow King and Luo Zheng, but also remaining another three Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, after the relative space increases, wanted to leave the red circle opposite party expel somewhat to be difficult.

In five people, three people will remain, anybody was eliminated at this time, inevitably was not willingly, therefore everyone appeared careful at this time, suddenly the aspect was also at a stalemate.

At this time, the red circle started to reduce......

Through formerly observing, everybody was also very clear, the speed that the red circle reduced was quick, once the red circle started to reduce, only required less than 110 the time of breath, will present the final result.

Once the red circle starts to reduce, the complexion of people to change, launches the attack on an according to more violent stance to other martial artist!

“Turns over to the Yuan fist!”

“Crack heart palm!”

“......”

Besides avoidance Swallow King cautiously, that three martial artist display oneself trump card respectively.

And two martial artist seize to slaughtering, but another martial artist naturally impossible to look for Swallow King, his goal naturally was to place on Luo Zheng.

Saw that some people chase down Luo Zheng, on the face of Swallow King appear the smiling face, these time looked that you do run?

Luo Zheng is also clear, now does not counter-attack is not perhaps good.

Saw that martial artist directly soars itself to come, Luo Zheng steps the step gently, adjusts the extremely smooth degree own breath, the strength starts following his body revolution.

At this time transmitted an extremely obliging aura from Luo Zheng's, as if placed with anything him in the same place, incomparable harmony.

That Void Tribulation Realm martial artist can insist now, the strength is not naturally weak, places in Jade Profound Martial Mansion also to be the top level by the strength, steady can include in the Black Iron Divine Country third echelon.

Under his takes a step, personal appearance is similar to the tiger leopard is ordinary, both hands change into pair of claws, is up and down to pat toward Luo Zheng.

“Áo!”

Then the ominous beast empty shade of tiger leopard congeals on him, following his pair of claws opening, was an ominous beast has opened the big mouth, must swallow toward Luo Zheng one.

Divine Country Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, really does not allow slightly to peep!

Only is the strength of this person, perhaps endured compared with the Monster Night Race that Peak Battle Venerable strength, feared some disparities compared with it Ling Yan, but if must compete for Seat Controller in Tower of Evil, he can capture first ten inevitably!

Others were guessing the Luo Zheng's strength, but Luo Zheng in guess at present this person of strength.

“Since you look for me, you are eliminated!”The Luo Zheng's step flutters slightly, form slowly backs up to go!

The red circle is reducing, but Luo Zheng actually carries to the red circle is backing up, under this shrinks draws back, Luo Zheng comes the arrived red circle instantaneously the edge, so long as Luo Zheng is standing same place time of breath, he was equal to being eliminated automatically!

However the Luo Zheng's footsteps, were only point gently in the edge of red circle, time light, but just touched in his tip of the toe, the whole body imposing manner suddenly changed!

“astral essence! Eruption!”

“Whoosh!”

In this instance, the imposing manner big change of Luo Zheng whole body, the whole person changes into together thread, has charged into own match just like the lightning generally!

That giant ominous beast empty shade, has not nipped, but pair of claws of match has not merged with enough time in together, before Luo Zheng actually first one step arrived in the body of match.

This person is a face cut-throat expression, this war, he exerts its utmost, in his mind, so long as has handled this fellow, moreover decided the victory and defeat at the same time, in the red circle on only the remaining three people, he can through the inspection, this one step he how, regardless of must step the past, this possibly affects he key one step!

Therefore he has not kept the hand to Luo Zheng, the pursue strikes to win!

But Luo Zheng, is except for only will run in his eyes away, anything cannot fellow......

But under that fellow retrocedes, appeared in blinking in own nearby......

This......

This martial artist head has not turned around all of a sudden, reveals the dull expression besides the face on, almost does not have any response.

Where Luo Zheng pays attention to the expression of this fellow, under he puts out a hand, grabbed the hand of opposite party, a five fingers buckle, then covered the pulse of opposite party arm gently, as the matter stands, opposite party true essence is unable to transmit, is hard to shake off the Luo Zheng's fetter.

Luo Zheng does not have to think oneself move unnecessarily completely, the opposite party had forgotten radically revolution true essence has worked loose, under this God, was grasped by Luo Zheng one, immediately was similar to the windmill has brandished him generally, brandished beyond the red circle directly.

What this set of completion is clean agile, not slightly loathsome.

Actually in quite low realm martial artist, the fight of this situation is actually common, but after arrived Spirit Core Realm, is an out of the ordinary degree through the strength that true essence erupts, who will make you approach with ease?

Therefore the fight in red circle, was exited by “bang”had not actually been exited by “brandishing”.

At this time saw that Luo Zheng lost the red circle martial artist directly, other martial artist also shocked the speechless situation immediately, in heart as if by prior agreement had a question, how can like this......

===========================

===========================





#768 - Being Forced To Do


“plop!”

This Void Tribulation Realm martial artist was thrown beyond the red circle, numerous falling on the ground.

Compares other injured, even receives severely wounded Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, his situation nature was better, so numerous falls to martial artist of this degree, then has not affected.

But this face lost in a big way.

This Void Tribulation Realm martial artist rather is injured to be rumbled, is not willing like this to be thrown, regarding him is really the great shame.

However he crawls after the ground, head rapid calmed down.

The Divine Country martial artist experience, has the martial artist experience on deep sea Continent to widen a level compared with Central Region, he actually knows that Luo Zheng that speed indeed was just out of the ordinary, the distance or the angle, the opportunity acts bashful unusual is proper!

Other source is an attack gathers the potential is completed, prepares to Luo Zheng to launch attacks the flash, because of so, cannot be responded by oneself, making this boy draw close to own body with ease.

Luo Zheng can make so the judgment, only then an explanation, that is the reaction rate of this fellow is astonishing, judgment ability first-class, and has experienced the innumerable field battles, can exercise this fight instinct, this kind of fellow without doubt is very fearful.

Thinks of here, this martial artist deeply has then inhaled cold air, the gloomy and cold vision has swept Luo Zheng two, but in his eyes has not actually hated, only then awes, only then experiencing understands that Luo Zheng's is fearful.

Besides this person, the shocking degrees of other people are not low.

Although this martial artist lost face, unexpectedly by person forcibly lost, indeed was the matter that lost face very much, but this person of strength was not low, where of includes third echelon character to be weak steadily? Presents most people not to have the qualifications to scoff him!

But most people are surprised to be thrown in him, how has not actually understood Luo Zheng just to achieve, the speed was really too quick.

Reviews three Divine Sea Realm to be able greatly on face, actually reveals the dignified color.

“Had underestimated this boy, his strength absolutely continues the third echelon!”

“Perhaps so the strength, can be an apex in the second echelon!”

“If I have not misread, what he just used is astral essence, his unexpectedly Body and Essence Dual Cultivation?”

Body and Essence Dual Cultivation martial artist, is very rare in any place, in Sea God Continent rarely has martial artist Body and Essence Dual Cultivation, in Central Region almost cannot see, but in Divine Country can Body and Essence Dual Cultivation martial artist also be few.

Luo Zheng just wants to end the fight freely in a short time, if the time lengthened, will only expose more cards in a hand, this is not he wants to see, such being the case, Luo Zheng directly uses astral essence.

But three Divine Sea Realm can so look greatly in the eye, in the heart shocks as before incomparably.

Like Zhan Yun, Swallow King, the first echelon that Crown Prince and Xiao Daoyuan these four people compose, is Black Iron Divine Country legacy, they may inherit the mantle of empire very much!

Therefore general Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, even if the strength strong is also very difficult to include the first echelon, because these characters in first echelon, are the evildoer/monstrous talent in evildoer/monstrous talent, has the strength of absolute suppression in Divine Rank Talent.

This is four big Divine Country strengths, their not deficient Divine Rank Talent!

Along with opening of Grand Era's Struggle, now this time, more and more super talent present worlds.

In Divine Country had ten to 15 Divine Rank Talent to be serious, so long as these Divine Rank Talent cultivate well, in the future will certainly step into Divine Sea Realm, but, Divine Rank Talent actually because of arrival of Grand Era's Struggle, the quantity starts to blowout in these years, in short these year of Black Iron Divine Country presented over a hundred Divine Rank Talent.

Four people of first echelon, can actually other crush Divine Rank Talent!

Therefore they not Luo Zheng and Swallow King their these four people put together, in their innermost feelings, Luo Zheng perhaps is somewhat unqualified.

Strength that now Luo Zheng shows at will, enough he has stood the second echelon was top, this makes them hold in high esteem to Luo Zheng sufficiently.

Even if the second echelon, is not easy to stand, let alone can Luo Zheng also arrange at the apex of second echelon?

In Black Iron Divine Country every large or small Martial Mansion are innumerable, but two big Martial Mansion, Jade Profound Martial Mansion and black Martial Mansion included 90% talents, these talents are similar to great waves wash out the sand are ordinary, washes the water surface is the gold that sparkles to shine, then pours into all resources on them, training, makes these talents have this grade of strength devotedly.

This Luo Tianxing is independent martial artist, has not known that which corner grows, do the resources possibly compare entire Black Iron Divine Country?

But he such bewildered braved.

In the past can always emit several to draw the attention of everyone the gold in independent martial artist, but Luo Zheng actually glistened somewhat let the person glaring.

Swallow King is with smile on the face, is staring at Luo Zheng, said with a smile in a low voice pale: “Insufficient, but also is insufficient, this is not your complete strength, making me have a look at your complete strength!”

Saw that the vision of people are staring at itself, Luo Zheng also only then sighed one darkly, oneself were weak, martial artist in Divine Country the vision or the strength surpassed own was unexpected, wanted with ease through the inspection, did not show own strength to get by under false pretences completely is too difficult.

Then estimated that also has the trouble.

He had not actually forgotten, before this Swallow King has said that this round inspection only then he passes......

Then like Luo Zheng expectation such, moreover two martial artist at the same time also decided the victory and defeat, one of them was rumbled beyond the red circle that directly by another person reduced unceasingly.

According to the rule, should announce result at this time, Luo Zheng, Swallow King, another martial artist through inspection!

However that Swallow King turns head toward that three is Divine Sea Realm can greatly light smiling, has caused a meaningful glance, that Divine Sea Realm can not announce the result greatly.

These three Divine Sea Realm can also want to understand greatly, was Swallow King settles on this Luo Zheng mostly, wanted the thorough probe Luo Zheng's strength.

Black Iron Command is indeed rare regarding other martial artist, but by the status and strength of Swallow King in Divine Country, gets so far as Black Iron Command not to be difficult, this Luo Zheng was really eliminated, but since settled on by Swallow King, helping him make Black Iron Command people should not be difficult.

Such being the case...... They also want to take a look, Luo Zheng true strength.

Swallow King smiles, saying: “I have said that this round, only then I can through the inspection, two, be I deliver you to go out of the red circle, do you exit?”

The Luo Zheng's vision is light, he already expected that attended the meeting this occurrence, in the heart is actually tranquil, but was actually unavoidably fights with this Swallow King at present.

However another person was more depressed, on his face actually reveals an expression angrily, even if you are Swallow King, but can't such bully the person? The father like mad with great difficulty through the inspection, you also planned that destroys the well-mannered assurance to drive out?

However at present the time are not much, starts to contract from the red circle, altogether also only then 100 the time of breath, just the lightning general confrontation, in addition Swallow King started talking, passed 45 the time of breath.

“I through inspecting, why Swallow King you......”in that martial artist heart unwilling, but is not willing to fight with Swallow King, only then opens the mouth to argue.

“Shut up!”Swallow King drinks toward that martial artist coldly, “the this King words, do not want to duplicate second.”

Swallow King stands erect in the red circle most central place, but Luo Zheng and that martial artist one on the left and other on the right, unceasingly reduce along with the red circle, two people also can only move the step unceasingly, closes up toward Swallow King.

This martial artist is shortly getting more and more near with the Swallow King distance, is nipping the tooth, forehead the class on sweat a little bit, in his heart is not certainly willingly! But looks at not far away Swallow King, he also knows, oneself absolutely possibly is not his match, fights with him is not only the result of bringing contempt upon oneself, has the possibility severe wound very much, even incurs the unpredictable trouble!

Finally, under that martial artist clenches teeth, stood in same place, whatever the red circle contraction, moved from his foot.

In other words, he was eliminated......

Many martial artist look to that martial artist, in the vision is also containing the color of pitying.

Indeed was a pity.

It is not high through the probability of inspection, but must be eliminated 90%, but actually had been compelled obviously to be eliminated by Swallow King through the inspection, this went too far.





#769 - Leeward


But Swallow King is Divine Country bestowed the title of king ! Itself is also the super evildoer/monstrous talent in first echelon, how doesn't satisfy can?

This entire Black Iron Divine Country is his family/home, martial artist in Divine Country, who dares to revolt? Who can revolt?

Divine Country is so, is overbearing than it sect, is arbitrarier, was more unreasonable.

Therefore that several Divine Sea Realm big energies, will give so the Swallow King this Void Tribulation Realm martial artist face!

Luo Zheng has not actually paused, he as before along with the contraction of red circle slowly is moving, at this moment his vision enters the water, light is staring at central Swallow King.

Swallow King shows a faint smile toward Luo Zheng, asked to Luo Zheng: “You? Also can give up?”

Swallow King has eaten the Luo Zheng's disposition, he looked that the person is always very accurate, this character, will not easily speak to give up absolutely!

Luo Zheng will certainly not give up, from afar runs is so far, at present this is also not the too big difficult problem, does he prepare to give up?

What Luo Zheng is awkward, whether can fight with Swallow King?

This Swallow King strength is not weak, although he at will toward own take action one time, but Luo Zheng estimated, perhaps his strength plans compared with the Ling Yan outline.

Although Luo Zheng has not experienced Liu Yu, in Tower of Evil, but Luo Zheng estimated that this Swallow King should Liu Yu 200 years ago on Tower of Evil, to promote Peak Battle Venerable the time strength is similar.

Naturally, this is also only the estimate.

Defeats the Cui Xie strength by Luo Zheng, present Swallow King to fear radically insufficient.

At present is an inspection, is impossible to look like the Life and Death war like that erupts all strengths.

Therefore what Luo Zheng consideration is, in the situation of how as far as possible not to exposing oneself strength, deals with this Swallow King.

If Swallow King knows the idea in Luo Zheng heart, corona that proud such as he must be mad, but Swallow King is impossible to guess that in Luo Zheng heart concrete idea, he must probe the Luo Zheng's strength now as far as possible!

A breath, a past of breath.

The red circle unceasingly is also reducing, under Luo Zheng is moving slowly, is also getting more and more near with that Swallow King distance.

Three zhang (3.33 m), two zhang (3.33 m), one zhang (3.33 m)......

Regarding Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, this short distance, some styles and methods have not been able to display.

They have understood anything in the vision of opposite party!

Strength!

Pure strength to spelling!

At this moment, around the square the breath of all disciples also turned very quiet.

Each martial artist interest was assembled.

On the one hand they admire to Luo Zheng, Void Tribulation Realm middle stage, actually successfully kept in the red circle, has the fellow of such strength to be unexpectedly quiet nameless, how they are hard to imagine Luo Zheng to grow right.

On the other hand, in their hearts also pays silent tribute for Luo Zheng, divides the arrived same round inspection with Swallow King.

If Luo Zheng avoids Swallow King, perhaps by his strength, with ease adopted the inspection......

Now he actually wants the direct selection to face Swallow King, does not know that what fate then can be?

Approaches, approaches unceasingly......

In Luo Zheng heart vigilant is also getting higher and higher.

Some do not suit, perhaps this Swallow King strength surpasses beyond own estimate.

Oneself just had shown one's skill, has used astral essence, he clearly knows oneself not only cultivation true essence, but also is body refiner, in this situation also dares to compete the strength and eruption with oneself?

Pulls closer the distance with body refiner, is an extremely wrong choice.

However this Swallow King had not actually abstained from, was waiting for approach, has saying that he has some countermeasure inevitably, or he is also body refiner, is Body and Essence Dual Cultivation?

Since you must die to nip me not to put, that has not done right by, Luo Zheng sighed in the heart slightly.

It is not Luo Zheng looks down on Swallow King, match who the altitude that now Luo Zheng is, as well as he designates, is not the character of Swallow King this level.

When two people are away from the half a Zhang (1.65 m), the Swallow King corners of the mouth curl upwards slightly, pale blue astral essence emerges together instantaneously, moreover instance that astral essence presents, there is other true essence to emerge together.

astral essence and true essence are two non- homogeneous qualitative energies, astral essence are born in completely from the body, but true essence captures the world good fortune.

Although Luo Zheng also frequently also erupts astral essence and true essence, however present Swallow King astral essence and true essence, actually fusion in a body!

Were two nature completely different energies, fused unexpectedly by him? So fuses in together, what forms is what clever thing?

Even if the Luo Zheng experience is vast, saw that this was also shocked.

Really, this Divine Country everywhere cannot underestimate!

After Swallow King astral essence and true essence fuse, then spreads out both hands, comes toward Luo Zheng thrust aside.

This Swallow King fist, has not seemed indeed wants with the Luo Zheng pure competion, does not have the meaning of offending somebody.

Sees that on the Luo Zheng face also reveals a prudent color, both hands ample capacity, the astral essence eruption within the body, at the same time, Luo Zheng also used Might of Dragon Scales!

The Luo Zheng plan using astral essence, coped with Void Tribulation Realm later stage martial artist purely, then this fellow is fierce, was almost sufficient.

But after Luo Zheng discovered that this Swallow King can astral essence and true essence fuse, immediately changed the mind, cannot look down on this Swallow King!

Even so, Luo Zheng has also absorbed about half Might of Dragon Scales!

Afterward Luo Zheng is also the double palm promotes, the speed is not fast, but is in this slow palm, is containing the astonishing strength!

“Pū!”

The double palm of Luo Zheng's double palm and Swallow King arranged at one.

Blows out together the depressed sound.

Under two human feet that is full of the pattern the floor, actually suddenly erupts together the fierce vibration, above starts to present cracks.

“Ka clip clop......”

Since this square as Void Tribulation Realm martial artist inspection, the material of ground naturally after processing, before this that many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist fights, has not made the ground produce any trace, but Luo Zheng and Swallow King merely were only right a palm, can make the ground split completely!

Two strengths, complete fusion in one, does not know what this Swallow King cultivation is what cultivation technique, unexpectedly unites astral essence and true essence completely? Indeed is mysterious!

Luo Zheng has blocked eventually this special strength, although his ground splits, but oneself really am stand one's ground steadfastly, stands on the spot!

But under that Swallow King in Luo Zheng Might of Dragon Scales and astral essence erupt, on the relaxed face changed color suddenly!

The strength that Luo Zheng contains extremely in huge!

Although Swallow King realized faintly Luo Zheng is not simple, but he has not thought that the Luo Zheng's strength exaggerates this degree unexpectedly!

Swallow King lives in Divine Country, because was outstanding on the talent since childhood, is deep the love of father sovereign, although the imperial prince in Divine Country is numerous, but if the talent is outstanding, the resources that obtains are also quite rich and liberal! Under this environment, is the Swallow King experience how vast?

He actually knows, Luo Zheng this strength, should not appear in Void Tribulation Realm!

Even if experienced Life and Death Tribulation martial artist, perhaps is also hard to resist Luo Zheng this strength, how does this fellow achieve?

This strength so is hard to resist, as if looks like the tide of sea is ordinary, is not the manpower can block radically......

Swallow King is not willing to retrocede, is he proud person? Boasted extravagantly can retrocede easily?

His rather Luo Zheng retrocedes, leaves beyond the red circle, then Luo Zheng does not use after any test, he is willing to help Luo Zheng get so far as Black Iron Command!

Black Iron Command!

But now says anything also late, under strength that in Luo Zheng that moves mountains, he does not have the leeway of choice.

Therefore under glare of the public eye, Swallow King retroceded.

one step, two steps, three......

Almost does not have the suspense surmounted the red circle, moreover retrocedes under along with Swallow King unceasingly, his footsteps also become stagger, finally the people see the Swallow King both legs one softly, unexpectedly fell on the ground!

The vision of all people dull looks at distressed Swallow King.

Places Swallow King of first echelon, has almost the overwhelming strength to young generation of expert, in Jade Profound Martial Mansion also only then a Zhan Yun person, can follow the Swallow King footsteps, in addition, takes a broad view at entire Divine Country also only then Xiao Daoyuan and Crown Prince can be a worthy opponent with him!

Although just two people were not Life and Death spelled, even general contest of strength was far continually, was only the pure strength contest.

But without a doubt, under the competion of strength, Swallow King has been in absolute leeward!

( Was sorry, upload time has selected, I do not know how to send two chapters to duplicate m__m to be sorry, wishing everybody valentine day joyful!)





#770 - Struggle


Around entire square, several hundred Void Tribulation Realm martial artist silence, is looking at present.

Three Divine Sea Realm can greatly in eye is the none remaining twinkle!

These three Divine Sea Realm can be Jade Profound Martial Mansion Mansion Lord greatly, Mansion Lord, two vice- Mansion Lord, are the mainstay common character in Black Iron Divine Country! They naturally understand the Swallow King strength.

This Swallow King is not only Body and Essence Dual Cultivation, what is more important, his double-phase physique coordinates their emperor's clan lineage/vein cultivation technique, can astral essence and true essence perfect integration, the strength that so under the fusion erupts far exceeds the same step.

Indeed, Swallow King just now has not used trump card, merely is only pure the strength of fusion will pat, but that is called “Luo Tianxing”martial artist has not used the style, he merely has even used astral essence and pure strength!

Then, Swallow King and Luo Zheng's to spelling fell leeward, how not pleasantly surprised does this make Jade Profound Martial Mansion three Mansion Lord?

Can this boy include in the first steps? Can his strength they posts with Swallow King and Crown Prince?

No matter they do believe that the matter that now sees has proven this suspicion, moreover now looked like is not only the compound issue, this Luo Tianxing strength might be stronger than Swallow King very much!

“Old He, has been mistaken, this boy radically is a freak, does not know braves really from that corner!”

“Hehehe, no matter how, our black iron Martial Mansion this time is to gain arrived, first did not say Swallow King and Crown Prince dispute, since this boy participates in the inspection of my Jade Profound Martial Mansion, naturally is my Jade Profound Martial Mansion excavation!”

“Destiny, the destiny, that black Martial Mansion Xiao Daoyuan suppresses my Jade Profound Martial Mansion steadily, I thought that this Luo Tianxing compares to be also not the least bit off with Xiao Daoyuan!”

In Jade Profound Martial Mansion that Void Tribulation Realm first expert Zhan Yun, both eyes stubbornly stares at Luo Zheng, on the face is revealing the excited color faintly.

“Luo Tianxing, Luo Tianxing......”very strange name, had not always heard Black Iron Divine Country has this kind of character, Zhan Yun the beat of heart plop plop, if changes a place, perhaps Zhan Yun has rushed to challenge Luo Zheng, is only the present Martial Mansion inspection, moreover is in front of three Mansion Lord, Zhan Yun cannot chaotic the custom.

Zhan Yun did not dare chaotically the Jade Profound Martial Mansion custom, is Swallow King is different.

Although the imperial prince in Black Iron Divine Country is numerous, but imperial prince status is also the difference of heaven and earth, he bestowed the title of king, these half Lone Crane City is his manor, he wants to challenge anyone, who can block?

“Haha, Luo Tianxing is right? Good, is very good!”On Swallow King that face flood the hysterical/frenzy happy expression, stares at Luo Zheng to say with a smile together: “You adopted the inspection, this matter for the time being comes to the end, then I must challenge you now!”

The Swallow King voice falls, the turbulent imposing manner gushes out from his within the body, under so covering of imposing manner, many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist immediately color excitedly.

This completely is not the imposing manner that Void Tribulation Realm martial artist can have!

“Perhaps the Swallow King true strength, can be a worthy opponent Void Tribulation Realm martial artist!”

“Really powerful, it is estimated that Void Tribulation Realm First Layer martial artist is not his match!”

“That boy surnamed Luo estimated that has troubled......”

Was covered by the Swallow King imposing manner, a Luo Zheng's brow slightly wrinkle, in the heart is really disgruntled, this fellow this? Luo Zheng is participates in the inspection, does not challenge with the person, does not have the origin must challenge itself.

Therefore Luo Zheng shakes the head, “I reject!”

Hears Luo Zheng's to reply, Swallow King stares slightly: “Rejection? Joke! The challenge of my Swallow King is who can reject easily? Black Iron Command, don't you want? If you comply with my challenge, regardless of your victory and loss, Black Iron Command I can you, various rare treasure Saint pill as you like choose, how you do look?”

Swallow King grants......

In all people both eyes sprays together the fiery color immediately.

Black Iron Divine Country bestowed the title of king, his family property may be many, only a Swallow King family property, can compare favorably with the Jade Profound Martial Mansion these many years accumulations, if can enter in the Swallow King mansion, chose several treasures at will is also gains sends greatly.

Issue regardless of victory and loss......

Even if loses to Swallow King is not the matter of humiliation?

Luo Tianxing that boy walked transports greatly! In the people heart then so thinks.

Who knows that Luo Zheng wooden shook the head, “I reject, I only need Black Iron Command, naturally can attain by my strength, does not need you to give me.”

Is Swallow King the arrogant person? His on own initiative this opens the mouth, is very straightforward! My Swallow King challenges you, is gives you Luo Tianxing several lifetime the face, regardless of the victory and loss I have the generous recompense, he has not thought that Luo Zheng actually so is unappreciative!

On the face of Swallow King is dark red immediately a piece, the whole face scowl, is ordinary just like the volcano that will soon move, may the eruption anytime.

“Oh, the Swallow King natural talent is intelligent, but was too young,”Divine Sea Realm can in the heart deeply sigh greatly.

Three Jade Profound Martial Mansion Mansion Lord also deeply have the same feeling.

Now in entire Black Iron Divine Country, is Crown Prince and Swallow King these two has young one generation of emperor's clan blood relationship to fight!

This Swallow King is youngest, but enters into the first echelon as before steadily, has saying that his future perhaps be dazzling than Crown Prince.

However the Crown Prince strength and Swallow King are also almost the same, many that but old over ten years old, the disposition is also calmer than Swallow King, Crown Prince has not only won over Jade Profound Martial Mansion Zhan Yun, first expert in black Martial Mansion young generation, Xiao Daoyuan also won over.

martial artist in first echelon, altogether also only has four, Crown Prince, Zhan Yun and Xiao Daoyuan then mutually stick together.

Swallow King most troublesome does not have the follower, at present this Luo Tianxing is the excellent goal, Swallow King so then must this Luo Tianxing offending evidently!

Is this good?

Indeed, they can also look, Swallow King is not has the evil intention to Luo Zheng, he challenges Luo Zheng is only pure, because refuses to accept, it is estimated that Swallow King itself also got up pitied heart, was only so under not being able to get out step, on forcibly bit to challenge this Luo Tianxing.

The issue is this grade of evildoer/monstrous talent character, is the exceptionally arrogant temper, your Swallow King oppresses others with own reputation, too should not, others not comply with your challenge on forget about it, but also counted on that others do lower the head with your Swallow King?

Three Divine Sea Realm can sigh greatly, then thought it is necessary to remind Swallow King, therefore Divine Sea Realm greatly can take one step, on the face flood the gentle happy expression, stares at Swallow King saying: “Swallow King has the interest challenge today, is for is not extremely easy, but this after all is the Jade Profound Martial Mansion inspection scene, here challenge perhaps extremely to improper, I looked or pick a lucky day say again!”

“Mansion Lord He!”A Swallow King eyebrow vertical stroke, he is young, the disposition indeed is obstinate incomparable, although he also knows, now should be on good terms in Luo Tianxing, but the temperament had come up at this time, oneself somewhat cannot control.

“Swallow King, listens to my word,”Mansion Lord He light saying with a smile, the lip moves slightly immediately, spoke to Swallow King with true essence sound transmission, other people are unable to distinguish him to say anything.

Some little time, Swallow King slight bow, the imposing manner in within the body suddenly vanishes, what on the face is following is a cloud poor business conditions light color, instead bows with hands clasped the hand toward Luo Zheng, “today we were only right a palm, my Swallow King indeed defeated! However also uses temporarily as gives the friend, another day I from, when asked you to come my Swallow King mansion to banquet!”

Luo Zheng is the whole face is on the contrary bewildered, around this Swallow King manner contrast was also too big, what medicine does the ghost know in his bottle gourd to sell?

Luo Zheng is not certainly clear, in this Divine Country everywhere is also containing various struggles, during he had no intention and Swallow King right a palm, will actually give to involve.

However sells any medicine and Luo Zheng has not related, any your family place banquets is the pleasantries, he is in others Divine Country, was not good too folding the Swallow King face, therefore Luo Zheng nods, did toward Swallow King has bowed with hands clasped.

Afterward Swallow King turns head to take a step to leave, the atmosphere of scene is then lax.

In Zhan Yun of nearby static observation, stares at the back that Swallow King is leaving, looks at Luo Zheng quietly, in the vision is to actually glitter one is vigilant the color.

Although Zhan Yun is Jade Profound Martial Mansion martial artist, but he is actually the Crown Prince person, fighting of Crown Prince and Swallow King is long-standing, at present jumps Luo Zheng, his can Zhan Yun challenge Luo Zheng, on the contrary is the secondary matter, is only so the character, cannot follow Swallow King absolutely!

This matter, must inform Crown Prince as soon as possible!

===========================

===========================





#771 - Ancestral Dragon


Luo Zheng did not care that Divine Country internal struggle, he only cared how oneself attain Black Iron Command.

Today after inspection, then some people return to before this in that courtyard of registration, through inspecting later Luo Zheng was also Jade Profound Martial Mansion one.

The Spirit Core Realm female who that is responsible for registering looked at Luo Zheng one curiously, she is actually very strange, Luo Zheng how by Void Tribulation Realm middle stage cultivation base through inspection?

In the bamboo sign with hand has replaced another purple token, this token as before is not Black Iron Command, immediately Luo Zheng was informed, he can enter in Martial Mansion to study through this token, can obtain Jade Profound Martial Mansion some resources wait/etc..

If other independent martial artist, possibly exceptionally will be excited, independent martial artist cultivation is exceptionally difficult, can integrate in Martial Mansion is also an exceedingly good opportunity. However does not have the too big significance regarding Luo Zheng, his not deficient cultivation technique and medicinal pill, cultivation also totally depends on itself, Martial Mansion is not big to his help, now only to him helpful, is this Black Iron Command.

Left Jade Profound Martial Mansion, that Cao Junfeng waited there for some time outside.

Luo Zheng has issued the order to him, making him wait for itself here, this Cao Junfeng is unable to violate, under the accompaniment of Cao Junfeng, Luo Zheng then returns to arrived own dwelling.

Above, Luo Zheng in holding appreciatively the hand this purple token, after thinking, he inquires: “After I attain Black Iron Command, how long wants to enter Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea?”

Cao Junfeng shows a faint smile, replied: “Generally, three big mystical places will open every year, that mystical place that in three big mystical places but not clear this year must open.”

Luo Zheng knows that in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is occluding Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, Divine Sovereign Mystical Place and Dream God Mystical Place, in addition Heavenly Star Mystical Place, other mystical place Luo Zheng had not cared, but if does not open Feather Sovereign Mystical Place this year, Luo Zheng somewhat was depressed.

“Can eavesdrop on beforehand what mystical place today opens?”A Luo Zheng's brow slightly wrinkle.

“Can! However each mystical place opens, which mystical place controls in the Country Lord hands of four big Divine Country opens is also their four Country Lord decides, wants the words that eavesdrops on...... To you, is some difficulties,”Cao Junfeng replied.

Luo Zheng exhaled, if opens other mystical places this year, likely must wait for one year, but leaves the Luo Zheng's time not to be many, can this not know what to do? By his present strength, impossible to affect the plans of four big Divine Country......

“I knew, you exit,”Luo Zheng light saying.

Cao Junfeng nods, then left the Luo Zheng's room.

Luo Zheng sits cross-legged, the luck, true essence proliferation slowly, is actually preparation static cultivation.

But at this time, in the mind that Azure Dragon started talking, “Luo Zheng, in this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, besides Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, a mystical place you must go.”

“Un?”The Luo Zheng's vision dodges slightly, heard a Azure Dragon such saying suddenly, his whole face felt strange actually the color.

Before this about Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, the news of these mystical places, knew from the Cao Junfeng mouth, now Azure Dragon mentions suddenly, these mystical places and Azure Dragon do they have the connection?

The Luo Zheng's goal is only Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, since Life Origin Stone then in Feather Sovereign Mystical Place obtained, Luo Zheng naturally does not have the big interest to other mystical places.

“Besides three big mystical places, Heavenly Star Mystical Place, right? This Heavenly Star Mystical Place, you must enter,”Azure Dragon also said.

“In this Heavenly Star Mystical Place, what thing there is you needs?”Luo Zheng is actually curious asking.

Luo Zheng knew these nine True Dragon in mind, actually from True Dragon Realm, but why these nine True Dragon will attach above that mysterious furnace, why also changes into together the page, finally drills in the Luo Zheng's mind, is a riddle.

He has asked Azure Dragon, but often mentioned, Azure Dragon was also insufficiently detailed, as if had any hard thing to bring up.

Initially Luo Zheng through Rising Dragon Stage entered in True Dragon Realm the informed and experienced time, Azure Dragon is so, he is not even willing to indicate oneself status to martial artist of dragon vein clan.

Luo Zheng also guessed, what enmity Azure Dragon has with True Dragon Clan, what big hatred even has?

This eventually is only the guess, True Dragon does not raise, Luo Zheng will not ask on own initiative.

Even if Luo Zheng enters Sea God Continent, informed and experienced, Azure Dragon also little gives the concrete opinion, what also young lord moves very much requests, these time is opening the mouth allows him to enter Heavenly Star Mystical Place, what important thing thinks in this Heavenly Star Mystical Place to have, is connected with their these nine brothers?

Azure Dragon actually disappointed smiles in the Luo Zheng's mind, immediately said: “Do you know this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea origin?”

Luo Zheng shakes the head.

Only is Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea these four characters, before this Luo Zheng exceptionally is strange, knew from the Cao Junfeng mouth, also because of these characters, Luo Zheng forgave a Cao Junfeng life.

When Luo Zheng crosses Chaotic Star Sea, after rushing to Black Iron Divine Country, but also the discovery big inland sea, is building unexpectedly also the standing tall and erect city wall......

Also does not know why four big Divine Country must use such big effort, for what?

“Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, is my True Dragon Clan domain,”Azure Dragon light saying.

“Your True Dragon Clan domain?”The Luo Zheng's eyebrow jumps slightly, asked in a soft voice.

“Exactly said, is my True Dragon Clan subordinate race, a domain of dragon vein clan,”Azure Dragon light saying.

In the past a dragon vein clan was control on this Continent, was occupying the entire Divine Country Continent center region, Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, but at that time human race had seven big Divine Country, the union is resisting a dragon vein clan together.

This war stops from time to time to hit, experienced several tens of thousands years.

Finally under a dragon vein clan in seven big Divine Country allied armies force, opens the space channel by the blood sacrifice, a True Dragon release of True Dragon Realm, is only a dragon breath blowout, on destruction three big Divine Country.

The blood sacrifice has also consumed the considerably large price, but seven big Divine Country also had the human race support of upper realm at that time, four big Divine Country that finally preserves a dragon vein clan destruction, have then formed the present pattern.

“Behavior four big mystical places, hehe, is actually a dragon vein clan in the inside story that this survives, is only dragon vein human race before the destruction once more using the strength of blood sacrifice, gives the seal entire Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea by the entire clan lifeform life! To take away legacy of dragon vein clan is not an easy matter,”Azure Dragon also said.

“Was only the time has been separated by these many years, dragon vein clan a strength of start of blood sacrifice gradually was also feeble, four big Divine Country that left behind, then took legacy of dragon vein clan as the treasure house, development slowly, has not thought that from small sixth grade Divine Country, develops present this situation!”

Initial seven big Divine Country, was equal to the sixth grade sect influence, but these four big Divine Country, almost can be considered as on the eighth grade sect influence now!

These two difference, can say that has the difference of heaven and earth!

On Sea God Continent Monster Night Clan of Liu Yu leadership, can only be seventh grade sacred ground.

“In this Heavenly Star Mystical Place, what has?”Luo Zheng is actually curious asking, he cannot find out also has anything is the thing that Azure Dragon wins.

Azure Dragon said: “In the past, this lower realm dragon vein clan through that True Dragon that the blood sacrifice summoned, was our Big Brothers.”

“Big Brother?”

On the Luo Zheng face reveals the surprised color.

Above the mysterious furnace is drawing up nine True Dragon, but these nine True Dragon sizes, the length is various, but in furnace, actually thickest, the appearance is also most dignified True Dragon! That True Dragon had not regained consciousness, until now, waking True Dragon also only has Azure Dragon and Scarlet Dragon.

“Right, my True Dragon Clan dissemination in million Great Thousand World, even if the blood sacrifice, is hard to invite True Dragon, reason that at that time my Big Brother personally take action, was because a dragon vein clan in this in has discovered Ancestral Dragon Egg! But this Ancestral Dragon Egg, now also in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, in final Heavenly Star Mystical Place!”Azure Dragon also said.

“Ancestral Dragon Egg, what does this have?”Luo Zheng felt oneself listen was somewhat muddled.

That Scarlet Dragon actually Haha smiles, “this is not simple, Ancestral Dragon Egg is Ancestral Dragon Egg, in world Ancestral Dragon, only then . Moreover the eternal life does not extinguish, after dying, will produce new Ancestral Dragon Egg, can again the hatching be Ancestral Dragon!”





#772 - Crown Prince And Swallow King


“Who has controlled Ancestral Dragon, was equal to controlling True Dragon Clan! We as most formidable super Divine Beast, naturally will not give human race Ancestral Dragon Egg!”Scarlet Dragon then said.

Luo Zheng has not spoken, to continue to listen to Scarlet Dragon to say.

Scarlet Dragon said: “Therefore the war on this piece of Divine Country Continent, is actually True Dragon Clan with your human race at the lower realm war, was only a pity that your human race has not expected, my Big Brother after the blood sacrifice summoned, has destroyed completely three size Divine Country, in instance that the space collapsed, then has used the mystique, destroyed this Great Thousand World flying upwards channel! Therefore in this contact surface all lifeform are unable to fly upwards!”

“Anything......”the Luo Zheng's vision dodges suddenly.

Since the issue that is unable to fly upwards, has been puzzling this Great Thousand World.

After cultivation base achieved Divine Sea Realm, then has stepped into the say/way of immortal, the category of every embryo is separated from!

For example like Situ Haotian, Liu Yu, as well as these Divine Sea Realm big energies in four big Divine Country, has actually stayed in this Great Thousand World, is unable to fly upwards!

Besides Rising Dragon Stage, does not have the method that other fly upwards again!

All lifeform are clear, this Great Thousand World as if had some problems, but concrete is any issue, does not have a correct answer.

Divine Sea Realm big energy that finally all can fly upwards, was by in dire straits in this Great Thousand World, can only look helplessly oneself entered the immortal five to fade, slowly exhausted the life, elegant, but finally......

Luo Zheng has not actually thought, destroys the Azure Dragon their Big Brothers of this Great Thousand World flying upwards channel?

“Why initially can destroy flying upwards channel?”Luo Zheng also asked.

Azure Dragon sighed, immediately said: “Naturally because of the Ancestral Dragon issue, this Ancestral Dragon Egg is born in this Great Thousand World, my True Dragon Clan naturally must protect carefully, lets its hatching slowly, however human race also pays attention to arrived here, therefore the essence of this war, launches regarding Ancestral Dragon Egg.”

“so that's how it is,”a Luo Zheng silence, “in other words, you allow me to enter Heavenly Star Mystical Place, to obtain Ancestral Dragon Egg, sends in your True Dragon Clan?”

“True Dragon Clan? Snort!”Scarlet Dragon cold snort/hum, in tone is full of the angry strength.

“Seventh Brother......”Scarlet Dragon probably had any words to say, but had actually been prevented by Azure Dragon, afterward Azure Dragon then said: “Right, I want to make you obtain Ancestral Dragon Egg, but not necessarily returns to True Dragon Clan.”

Luo Zheng was actually more and more disorderly, evidently Azure Dragon and Scarlet Dragon and some True Dragon Clan as if also contradictions, previous Luo Zheng entered True Dragon Realm time viewed some issues, but he was a bystander, naturally will not say anything.

Oneself can help the place that obtains, Luo Zheng do as far as possible, all that after all now Luo Zheng obtains, there is Azure Dragon their merit.

Luo Zheng has own anxiety, “this Ancestral Dragon Egg indeed in Heavenly Star Mystical Place, these Divine Sea Realm greatly can unable to obtain, by my present strength, perhaps also insufficient!”

Luo Zheng does not know connections between these mystical places, is these mystical places, since Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, but Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea almost during surrounding of four big Divine Country, if this Ancestral Dragon Egg can obtain, these Divine Sea Realm can perhaps already go in greatly.

Azure Dragon actually shows a faint smile, “Heavenly Star Mystical Place, is different from other three big mystical places, they are certainly impossible to attain, however your words, have a possibility.”

Since Azure Dragon said that Luo Zheng also silently nods, “such being the case, I naturally do my best!”

Although Luo Zheng does not have any assurance, helping Azure Dragon they obtain this Ancestral Dragon Egg, since Azure Dragon they have opened the mouth, Luo Zheng said that anything must try, naturally, he first then must enter Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, attained Life Origin Stone to say again.

Can form a line, but must look how one step develops.

In this dwelling, Luo Zheng is also confined at home, every day wholly-absorbed cultivation, but Cao Junfeng does not have Luo Zheng's to order, keeps close to defend in the entrance.

However three days later, Luo Zheng hears the entrance to hear a slight sound of footsteps suddenly, immediately hears a high-pitched and fine sound, “Crown Prince harnesses, the miscellaneous personnel evades temporarily!”

“Crown Prince?”A Luo Zheng's brow slightly wrinkle.

Afterward hears the Cao Junfeng sound to resound outside, “Master, Black Iron Divine Country Crown Prince came!”

“Un,”Luo Zheng complied with one, immediately sets out outside the arrived room, on his face is hanging the light smile, in the heart is actually quite strange, this Divine Country Crown Prince looks for itself, actually cares for what is?

Luo Zheng goes out, is sees outside the dwelling the big weaponry, dozens Life and Death Realm expert wear the golden brocade robe, the waist is hanging silver shining wearing a sword, sets up in an array in the entrance, the Luo Zheng's vision sweeps at will, the grade that these wear a sword at least is lower grade saint item, what is more important is each contour of wearing a sword is exactly the same.

In Divine Country, has the mass production saint item technique evidently.

Before the guard bodies of these Life and Death Realm, actually the youth sits above the wheelchair, the youth seems the listless appearance, is only in a pair of eyes pupil, is actually glittering the strange gloss.

The youth sees Luo Zheng to look, actually shows a faint smile.

At this time, nearby court eunuch said on the squawk: “Sees Crown Prince, has not knelt down in a big hurry, salutes in a big hurry?”

How is Luo Zheng willing to kneel? coldly shot a look at that court eunuch one eyes, in the heart has actually thought, walked in bewilderedly, making me kneel down, what truth was this?

Who knows that Crown Prince actually scolds saying: “Yu An, what talked nonsense, this friend, was in my Black Iron Divine Country the great talent, under the son knee had the gold, how could also casual to kneel down to the person?”

“But Crown Prince, you are 95 Venerable, future......”that is called the Yu An court eunuch is argues.

“Shut up!”Crown Prince is one scolds, immediately said with a smile to Luo Zheng: “My this servant, was used to it so, Brother Tianxing was sure not to be offended!”

Luo Zheng is only coldly looks at present this, his eyes saw that this Crown Prince and that court eunuch are acting in a play, the goal wants to oneself the impression, as if Crown Prince high to look oneself are first-grade, this Crown Prince comes up “brother”character to be symmetric on according to, but Luo Zheng with this Crown Prince is first meeting, resorts to this method, actually gives a Luo Zheng plans very deep feeling.

In the Luo Zheng heart the self inductance is unhappy.

Let alone he enters this Black Iron Divine Country, does not want to be noticeable, front has Swallow King, behind Crown Prince braves, he more does not want to realize, these fellows must walk.

But Luo Zheng was unable to process carelessly, after all in others' domain.

Therefore Luo Zheng not salty not pale asking: “Divine Country Crown Prince arrives personally, does not know that does?”

Crown Prince shows a faint smile, then said: “I listen to Brother Tianxing through the inspection of Jade Profound Martial Mansion, hears you are the independent martial artist family background, therefore wants to see the Brother Tianxing elegant demeanor, today must see, really has an imposing appearance, is in the person Dragon and Phoenix.”

Luo Zheng thinks, on the face hangs up a smiling face actually, “Crown Prince was so polite, my Luo Tianxing is a careless person.”

Crown Prince actually continues to say with a smile: “Brother Tianxing was polite, today my your family place is equipped with banquets, but also hopes that Brother Luo Zheng accepts this invite to arrive,”was saying, Crown Prince was actually called the Yu An court eunuch to cause a meaningful glance to nearby that.

On the court eunuch face flood the attentive smiling face, uncovers a shining calling card from the bosom, has given Luo Zheng.

Reads that calling card, Luo Zheng is somewhat hesitant, this calling card are meets or does not meet?

arrived Luo Zheng also wants to understand now meaning of this Crown Prince, is mostly same to that Swallow King, wants to win over itself, but compares Swallow King, this Crown Prince manner is politer.

Person but who this world is so, is often politer to you, not necessarily to you more advantageous person.

In Luo Zheng this hesitant, not far away another sound conveys, “Big Brother, you came Lone Crane City, does not come to see the little brother unexpectedly I, was too ungrateful!”

Speech person Swallow King.

Swallow King this coming, does not have anybody, is only all alone.

He wears a azure clothes, leisurely strolls, is looking at Crown Prince, looks at Luo Zheng then slightly to say with a smile: “Luo Tianxing, has been well since last meeting!”

Luo Zheng toward the Swallow King slight bow, in heart wondered, what medicine that between this Swallow King and his elder brothers, in the bottle gourd sell?





#773 - Prisoner'S Cage


This Swallow King days in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, does not branch out the stance of high and low not giving up with.

So to be how well-mannered today, probably with oneself is many years of friend same......

Luo Zheng felt immediately the whole body is not comfortable, but on the Luo Zheng face appears the smiling face, shows a faint smile toward Swallow King, “has been well since last meeting.”

That Swallow King is without consulting anybody walks toward Luo Zheng, puts out a hand to take down the golden calling card in Luo Zheng hand directly, after casting a sidelong glance at will, actually returns to Crown Prince, light saying: “Unfortunately, Luo Zheng complied to go to my Swallow King mansion today a to chat, the elder brother you come late one step!”

This calling card is quite hot in the Luo Zheng hand, Luo Zheng does not know how to process, has not thought that Swallow King actually directly takes, seals to give back to Crown Prince, how could but have complied with Swallow King?

But at present Swallow King is broke through to Luo Zheng, although the temperament of this person manic, but in comparison, is straightforwarder, that Crown Prince gives the Luo Zheng first impression, is the city mansion is too deep.

Was invited by Crown Prince with it to your family place, might as well coordinated Swallow King this play to sing first at present said in the past again.

After the Luo Zheng heart decides, said with a smile: “Your Highness Crown Prince indeed comes late one step, I formerly also received the invitation of Swallow King.”

Hears the Luo Zheng's words, on the Swallow King face is flood the strong happy expression.

Initially Swallow King realm mean time, had not paid attention by Crown Prince, for these years the time, increased day by day along with the Swallow King strength, had gradually after the meaning that Crown Prince met as an equal, among two people gradually opposed.

However Crown Prince old Swallow King over ten years old, let alone is selected as Crown Prince, will be the future crown prince, so will manage, almost in Divine Country all young generation of expert will stand that side Crown Prince, although Swallow King by bestowed the title of king, has proven own strength and talent, because of the subsequent party inferiority, cannot stand up from failure eventually.

On this day Crown Prince knew that in Jade Profound Martial Mansion independent martial artist, martial artist has exceeded Swallow King during the competion of strength unexpectedly, this character, his will Crown Prince let how off? Therefore at the same night rushes to Lone Crane City from the capital, the goal is to win over Luo Zheng.

Has not thought that Swallow King has actually killed in halfway.

By the astuteness of Divine Country Crown Prince, how he could not see that Luo Zheng and Swallow King are performing? But at present he is not good to force someone to do something against his will, therefore Crown Prince instead is very magnanimous saying with a smile: “Such being the case, my this came is also offensive.”

“Is elder brother far more than offensive? This speed, my this is the Younger Brother is also tight that admires,”Swallow King rebutted with sarcasm.

The Crown Prince facial color mighty waves are outmoded, in the vision actually the light rays flash through, grabs the wheelchair with the hand, transferred a circle same place, was actually rumble leads many expert to leave.

Looks the direction that Crown Prince leaves, on the Swallow King face reveals the coldly happy expression, just like is the expression of victor.

Luo Zheng shakes the head, “since is the blood brother, why can so be in sharp opposition?”

Their Divine Country imperial family internal struggle, Luo Zheng actually quite did not understand, although said that martial artist world bad risk, most people are incomparably selfish, but the blood is thicker than water, so manipulated strategically rather on some gains don't equal the loss.

Swallow King is actually saying of coldly: “I, when he is a Big Brother, he does not have, when I am brothers.”

Sees the Swallow King complexion, Luo Zheng also knows that Swallow King decides however immerses during some not good recollection.

However this is others family affairs, Luo Zheng does not feel better to ask.

Immediately Swallow King thinks, suddenly shows the cunning smiling face toward Luo Zheng, “aren't you comply with my Swallow King your family place to chat?”

“This......”just now Luo Zheng said that the expedient measure of but to reject the invitation of Crown Prince making, Swallow King again opens the mouth now, Luo Zheng actually does not know how to reject.

“Relax, will not feel embarrassed your, between you and me branched out one high under to be OK,”Swallow King continued to say with a smile, the sound that simultaneously actually lowered said: “My that Big Brother handles affairs to be watertight, decides however sends for monitoring you, if you do not go, another day will certainly visit once more......”

On the Luo Zheng face only then reveals a forced smile, does not go not to be good evidently, he only then nods.

Although this Swallow King temper does not curry favor, but is at least franker than that Crown Prince, if Luo Zheng must the choosing sides station, he rather choose Swallow King actually.

Follows the plans deep person together, always makes people nervous.

Therefore under the invitation of Swallow King, Luo Zheng brings Cao Junfeng to come in the arrived Swallow King mansion.

This Swallow King mansion is then situated south Lone Crane City, the big mansion, the style of construction is extraordinary, the scenery in mansion everywhere examines luxuriously.

Just accompanied Swallow King to enter in the mansion, four Life and Death Realm expert rapidly encircled, look was quite anxious, one of them was opens the mouth to ask: “On king, where just you went, making small one good to look.”

Swallow King coldly looked at that several Life and Death Realm expert, immediately asked back: “What's wrong? Does my whereabouts also need to report to you frequently?”

“This...... Actually,”Life and Death Realm expert lowering the head replied.

Swallow King is actually cold snort/hum one, faces forward to walk without consulting anybody, that four Life and Death Realm expert also want with, Swallow King saying: “Your four, look at the front door in entrance!”

“We......”

Life and Death Realm expert in Divine Country quantity, although are many, but is actually insufficient to reduce to looking at the situation of front door, that four people of complexions sink.

“What's wrong?”The Swallow King feature selects, “my words, didn't a point with have?”

Saw appearance that Swallow King as if must manifest suddenly, that four Life and Death Realm expert, only then draws back, walks toward the front door of Swallow King mansion.

Swallow King seemed to be profound meaning looked at Luo Zheng one, immediately smiles, “is very laughable?”

The clue that Luo Zheng also sees, asked immediately: “These people......”

“Hehe, my Swallow King mansion from the guard to the male servant, from the janitor to the maids is the person who my brother arranges!”Swallow King clenches teeth to say.

At this time, in the mansion went out of the female who wore the silk fabrics, this female also had Void Tribulation Realm cultivation base, if the long look the angel, that precious silk fabrics tailor were appropriate, so trod the broken step to walk, casual upward, sufficiently made all male palpitate with excitement, this female absolutely was the martial artist excellent companion.

“The prince came back! The male and female servants......”that female just opened the mouth, Swallow King has actually interrupted her words, “get lost/rolls!”

“The prince......”that female was so scolded by Swallow King, in both eyes is the teardrops is then billowing.

“Makes you get lost/roll you not to hear?”Swallow King cold sound angrily rebukes.

The female has stood erect a while, whole face is suffering from injustice, finally under scolding of Swallow King, retreats slowly.

Swallow King is immediately disappointed smiles, “forgot, even/including my wife, was my brother's person!”

This female is also the Crown Prince person......

Luo Zheng was also speechless.

This Swallow King so age, has such talent and strength, looks like the object who in side also envies the envy, has not thought that actually lives again in this kind of environment.

He to the Crown Prince so manner, among two people perhaps is also the accumulated grievances is quite no wonder deep.

The matter that actually in Black Iron Divine Country Swallow King and Crown Prince disagree, had already spread over entire Divine Country Continent, purity that this matter Cao Junfeng also knows.

This Swallow King was extremely outstanding, although already by Country Lord bestowed the title of king, but bestowed the title of king how? So long as is outstanding enough, another day grows, same can rob Crown Prince the position of crown prince.

That Black Iron Divine Country Crown Prince because of father's reason, cannot to own Younger Brother take action, but can actually everywhere make the elbow in Swallow King.

Therefore until now, Swallow King is links a person on one's own side not to have!

Swallow King is not a fool, he must develop oneself influence, other did not say, light enters the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea mystical place, is not his matter.

Crown Prince initially also hypocritical help/gang Swallow King collected one team of people, so the good intention, Swallow King has rejected naturally, after the issue is the rejection, whom can Swallow King look for?

Young generation of expert, had almost been bossed around by Crown Prince, as for was selected remaining these Void Tribulation Realm martial artist by Crown Prince, Swallow King itself cannot have a liking, under such aspect, Swallow King won over several to enter martial artist of second echelon reluctantly, but Swallow King knows, he was too small and weak, is unable to contend with his elder brother.

This bitter experience Luo Zheng, in his heart decides to with Luo Zheng divide one high, is under that Mansion Lord direction in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, Swallow King restrained itself reluctantly, he hopes that Luo Zheng became an own big boost.

They enter the Swallow King mansion in the main hall, Luo Zheng told that Cao Junfeng is waiting in the entrance, immediately has the maid to serve tea to pour water, after being busy at work, Swallow King once more these servants drove out.

Swallow King then both eyes brilliant stares at Luo Zheng to ask: “You enter Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, goes for anything, I can cooperate with you.”

( New year's celebration matter is a much less, excuses me!)

===========================

===========================





#774 - Corpse


Swallow King is willing so to the Luo Zheng opens the mouth, indeed to be very polite!

His solemn Swallow King, what body upper reaches is the emperor's clan blood relationship, when lowered the figure and person cooperates?

Although Crown Prince has bossed around Zhan Yun and Xiao Daoyuan such Divine Rank Talent, as well as various group of talents in two big Martial Mansion, but that is not the cooperation, they can only be the Crown Prince followers.

So long as the competent imperial prince, will train oneself follower, but Swallow King actually plans and Luo Zheng now cooperates.

Hears the Swallow King words, the Luo Zheng's vision dodges slightly, sips tea, was looking at the scenery outside palace gently, in the heart actually in the static consideration.

He comes four big Divine Country, does not plan to attach to any influence, if some people choose and Luo Zheng cooperate, both sides accord to his need, Luo Zheng will not reject.

Although this Swallow King is somewhat conceited, but Luo Zheng looks like, is in a heart the extremely honest person, let alone he is the king in Black Iron Divine Country, he will not be anybody's personal servant, but chooses and Swallow King cooperates, without doubt is suitable.

The only trouble, is conflict between this Swallow King and Crown Prince, but this in Luo Zheng's consideration, his four big Divine Country long will not wait for a long time again.

Sees on the Luo Zheng face also to have the color of hesitation, Swallow King is sneers saying: “You have the worry evidently, definitely is feared my Big Brother, I said right?”

Luo Zheng flipped the supercilious look, this Swallow King speech was too straightforward, immediately he smiles lightly, said: “I can choose with you cooperate, I so come, for Life Origin Stone in Feather Sovereign Mystical Place.”

Seeks for Life Origin Stone is not secret, Luo Zheng tells Swallow King also to might as well.

“Life Origin Stone!”On the Swallow King face reveals a meaningful happy expression, “you early said!”

Hears the Swallow King words, the Luo Zheng's heart jumps slightly, he has no fear of great distances, runs up to this piece of Continent, the most important goal is to seek for Life Origin Stone, if can obtain Swallow King here, that is the good matter.

Immediately Swallow King has patted clapping, the maid steps the broken step to walk.

“Brings Life Origin Stone of my Swallow King mansion collection!”Swallow King light saying.

The maid has resulted in the order of Swallow King, then cautiously has drawn back.

The Luo Zheng's heart is fiery, on the face even has the excited color that is hard to conceal, if in this Swallow King hand has Life Origin Stone, he consumes at all costs, must trade it, many trades many!

Swallow King notes Luo Zheng's look, said with a smile: “This Life Origin Stone, is very evidently important to you, is used to save others?”

Life Origin Stone can supplement that human race the strength of life, the strength of life is not equal to the life, is completely different from medicinal pill of these enhancement lives!

But Luo Zheng is young, is about 20 years old over, he does not need Life Origin Stone, therefore Swallow King is very easy to draw this conclusion.

The Luo Zheng slight bow, replied: “Yes.”

They waited for a while, maid goes to return, in the hand then carries a wooden plate, in the plate is actually covering with brocade gauze.

Swallow King sets out, puts out a hand to press firmly between the fingers the brocade gauze an corner/horn, pulls gently, reveals in the wooden plate stones.

ancient jade that these stones, Luo Zheng initially saw!

A pure life aura, then transmits to come from this Life Origin Stone!

Formerly Luo Zheng also had the concealed worry, slave seal that although Cao Junfeng was planted by Luo Zheng, will not deceive him, but he was afraid Cao Junfeng to admit mistakes, if Life Origin Stone didn't produce in Divine Country Continent?

Now Luo Zheng then determines!

Was only a pity, this wooden plate the quantity in Life Origin Stone, was too few.

Altogether also 12.

Luo Zheng remembers the strength of life in Life Origin Stone contains also only then little wisp.

In the Ning Yudie body Life and Death Wind, whole body the strength of life has been at the dry condition, this Life Origin Stone perhaps by far insufficient.

Saw in the Luo Zheng eye to glitter to wipe the color of regret, Swallow King naturally understood, he smiled, said: “Life Origin Stone will little retain, I in hand also be only do these many, consider too little?”

“Does not dislike,”Luo Zheng shakes the head, immediately said: “Is only the quantity that I need far exceeds these, can Swallow King be willing to sell to me these Life Origin Stone prices?”

Best quality goods true essence stone in Luo Zheng hand also has many, although this Life Origin Stone is precious, but Luo Zheng thinks that can also afford.

“Discussed that the business looked on as an outsider, you are willing to comply to cooperate with me, this Life Origin Stone naturally delivers your gift on first meeting!”Swallow King actually very straightforward saying.

Luo Zheng has not shirked, he is looks to understand this Swallow King temper, if he must pay true essence stone, perhaps will stir up this fellow to get angry, Life Origin Stone was too important to Luo Zheng, although the present quantity are few, he will be one will not then let off.

Therefore Luo Zheng puts out a hand to sweep, enters in the Life Origin Stone info clerk in wooden plate sumeru ring.

At this time Swallow King said: “Since wants Life Origin Stone, must enter in Feather Sovereign Mystical Place ‚mining’, by your strength, enters Feather Sovereign Mystical Place not to be actually difficult, but ‚mining’ is actually a tired work!”

“Mines? These Life Origin Stone dig from the mystical place?”Luo Zheng are not many, illegibility of this point Cao Junfeng also understanding Feather Sovereign Mystical Place understands.

Although Cao Junfeng is Life and Death Realm expert, although cultivation base is high, but initially he in Void Tribulation Realm, did not have the qualifications to enter Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, knew from others mouth regarding the understanding of several big mystical places.

Swallow King smiles, “our four big Divine Country are really strict to the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea blockade, the average person too did not know about these four big mystical places, Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, Divine Sovereign Mystical Place and Dream God Mystical Place as well as final Heavenly Star Mystical Place have nothing in common, Feather Sovereign Mystical Place is actually a mineral lode!”

“Mineral lode? This mineral lode produces Life Origin Stone?”Luo Zheng asked.

Swallow King shakes the head, “the mineral lode in Feather Sovereign Mystical Place is rare, the thing that produces is also all sorts of strange and unusual, this mineral lode had been unearthed several tens of thousands years by an once dragon vein clan, afterward had been unearthed many years by my four big Divine Country, but mineral resource is very as before rich! Besides Life Origin Stone, will also produce other rare and precious thing!”

Is defending this kind of mineral lode, mining that four big Divine Country naturally spare no effort.

“so that's how it is,”Luo Zheng nods, “actually does not know that in other two mystical places, what thing has?”

Swallow King light saying: “Divine Sovereign Mystical Place, is actually a tomb, is burying corpse of dragon vein clan many deceased clansmen, these corpse preserve with the mystique, ten thousand years not spoiled......”

“Tomb?”A Luo Zheng brow wrinkle, “actually does not know why this tomb can be called the mystical place? And also has any buried treasure......”

“Anything does not have,”Swallow King replied immediately: “Besides the corpse, is corpse, is a tomb, what good thing can the prospect attain from inside?”

“But......”Luo Zheng wants to ask such being the case, value that this place simply has not explored.

However the Luo Zheng's voice just fell, Swallow King said with a smile immediately: “But inside corpse is the biggest buried treasure!”

Is the corpse the buried treasure?

Here, Luo Zheng was more puzzled.

Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea for an inhabit region of dragon vein clan, a dragon vein clan had used the blood sacrifice finally, in the innumerable lifeform sacrificial offerings the clan fell, this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea also became the hopeless situation in hopeless situation.

Once in a long time, four big Divine Country are unable to enter Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea!

This Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea to a certain extent, almost can on Cursed Land with Sea God Continent be overbearing, is fiercer, the Cursed Land good and evil also has Battle Saint following lifeform to enter, is this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, all lifeform all may not enter!

However again bad risk place, has the means to explain, legacy that a dragon vein clan leaves behind, is the fat in four big Divine Country eyes, this fat actually cannot eat near at hand, how can rest calmly and steadily?

After fumble time and time again, they tried to find out finally enters Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, Divine Sovereign Mystical Place and Dream God Mystical Place method!

Four big Divine Country obtains benefits a great deal, finally went to last mystical place Heavenly Star Mystical Place the vision.

However this Heavenly Star Mystical Place is a dragon vein clan core is, was not the front three mystical places like that is easy to enter, Heavenly Star Mystical Place had once been stranded four big Divine Country innumerable years, to explore Heavenly Star Mystical Place, four big Divine Country had also sacrificed the innumerable martial artist lives, even linked Divine Sea Realm to be able also to sacrifice several greatly!

Final four big Divine Country has compromised, they discovered that oneself are unable to enter, this Heavenly Star Mystical Place strength of blood sacrifice is not the person of Divine Country can resist.

Therefore they went to another vision, is the corpse in Divine Sovereign Mystical Place.





#775 - Trust


Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, is Divine Sovereign Mystical Place, regarding Divine Country martial artist is also extremely the bad risk place.

However compared with Heavenly Star Mystical Place, that was little witch sees Big Witch.

Mines in Feather Sovereign Mystical Place, so long as according to the experience and rule, will not have the big problem generally.

However in Heavenly Star Mystical Place, is actually the place of all living things degeneration, besides the dragon vein human race clansman, other lifeform all may not enter!

In order to explain this difficult problem, four big Divine Country unite in together, does not know that discussed many times, finally was pondered over means of substitution by them.

That uses the corpse in Divine Sovereign Mystical Place.

In Divine Sovereign Mystical Place retains corpse that dragon vein human race was dying, many corpse have processed with the mystique, can undergo the years baptism.

Occupies their corpse, uses their corpse to enter in Heavenly Star Mystical Place again, will not receive in Heavenly Star Mystical Place the repel of strength of blood sacrifice!

However even if so, now the development of four big Divine Country to Heavenly Star Mystical Place is also at the most primary stage, after all after occupying corpse, many limits, let alone corpse in Divine Sovereign Mystical Place is not easy to take.

Heard Swallow King to say these, Luo Zheng had known about these mystical places a general idea, the behavior four big mystical places, complemented one another, to put it bluntly Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea was a den of dragon vein clan, but wanted to explore, actually many limit rules.

In the Luo Zheng heart understands clearly, this mystical place definitely cannot burst, four big Divine Country consume these many years, enters is also cautious, wants to obtain Life Origin Stone and that Ancestral Dragon Egg evidently is not an easy matter.

Even if no these Divine Sea Realm big energies, Life and Death Realm expert stops, Luo Zheng is impossible to enter with ease......

Compared with the Swallow King cooperation, now looked like also has become action inevitably.

“After this time attains Black Iron Command, I must form a team, enters Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, since Luo Tianxing you want to unearth Life Origin Stone, definitely must become my boost!”Swallow King said with a smile, he actually feared oneself could not retain Luo Zheng this grade of character.

Although he by bestowed the title of king, every year granting was been numerous, is actually not able to compare with Crown Prince, Crown Prince as a crown prince, the disparity between both are not generally big.

First did not say whether Luo Zheng is the person of high interest, his Swallow King and Luo Zheng do not have the too big friendship, on the contrary, somewhat has the mutual hatred before this! Swallow King can detain Luo Zheng's, was sincere.

Swallow King is also peak intelligent person, therefore talked under with Luo Zheng, has not covered-up, a bottom of one's heart, has not faked.

Now since Luo Zheng had the same goal with, he naturally must push the boat along, drags into Luo Zheng own team.

This point Swallow King is also the assurance is very proper, Luo Zheng has the intense vigilance to Divine Country people before this, because Swallow King is frank, he is willing to follow Swallow King, comes to his mansion.

“Does not have the issue,”Luo Zheng shows a faint smile, nods.

“Good!”Swallow King claps, is actually shouts said: “With liquor!”

Immediately has the good wine delicacies, before putting in two people.

This liquor, is similar to the blood is generally rich, moreover heard that not slightly wine taste, transmits extremely fragrant fragrances on the contrary.

Sees on the Luo Zheng face to reveal the color of hesitation, Swallow King says with a smile: “This is my Black Iron Divine Country Qi Luo Xiang! Even if your my this grade of cultivation base, same will get drunk!”

Ordinary good wine, to with the body of martial artist already not slightly effect, therefore martial artist drinks with the average man drinks water also similarly, will drink will not be drunk.

Swallow King said that to cancel Luo Zheng's anxiety first one step, fills in that blood common Qi Luo Xiang the entrance, turns over the jade cup, smiled toward Luo Zheng.

Luo Zheng shows a faint smile, raises glass similarly, drinks completely.

He is curious this liquor water, by body that he ten thousand do not invade poisonously, wants to kill by poison itself, has killed itself difficultly......

Immediately touches up staggered, discusses really happy.

Several pot Qi Luo Xiang drink, two people had several points of feeling of being drunk, also does not know that this Swallow King which muscle is not right, suddenly also said to that maid: “Goes, the princess will call!”

The maids have hesitated, said: “Reply the prince, the princess perhaps rested......”

“Rested also to give father to call!”Swallow King roared immediately.

The maid saw Swallow King to get angry, where also dares to neglect, again and again after the nod, retreated.

Luo Zheng on the contrary is bewildered, this Swallow King called his woman, what is this?

Sees the Luo Zheng's look, Swallow King actually smiles, both hands press firmly between the fingers a luminous winecup toward Luo Zheng in a flash, kill immediately.

“Is spreading a few words in our Black Iron Divine Country, can see a Han Xuan dance, even if little lives for hundred years to be also willing, this woman is in my Black Iron Divine Country the most beautiful woman! Brother Tianxing, a while makes you broaden the outlook!”Swallow King brings to get a little drunk intent to say.

“This improper?”Luo Zheng cannot bear flip the supercilious look, heard this saying is also speechless.

Does not know really this Swallow King is a matter, drinks to drink half, please come out to dance own wife? The good and evil is also a princess, how can so mistreat?

“Not any improper!”Swallow King waves the arms about, “today I was happy!”

Swallow King more said, Luo Zheng is also not comfortable, although Swallow King also said that this princess is Crown Prince places in his person, as a prince, and is strange bedfellows including own wives, is very definitely painful.

But can't so ruin her?

Before long, sees that female under several maids' leadership, angrily walked.

Swallow King actually waves, said to that female: “Han Xuan! Come, performs one for us...... Dance!”

That is called the Han Xuan female, angrily came, she as the Swallow King princess, how can make Lord Husband so ruin?

Han Xuan whole face indignantly, naturally not, since, she was also born in prestigious family Aristocratic Family, was only the appearance was splendid since childhood, the fame in Black Iron Divine Country was also enormous, like the female of her so status, often was also involuntary, under the arrangement of Crown Prince, then has married then Swallow King.

Since more than one year, among two people has also been far from any husband and wife sentiment, she eventually is the Crown Prince person, but in the surface is maintaining this relations, the destiny of her entire family controls in the Crown Prince hand, she also can only obey orders in Crown Prince.

Under the order of Crown Prince, she once in a while, must report the Swallow King trend truthfully.

This point Swallow King is also well aware, big Swallow King mansion is the Crown Prince person, is Crown Prince takes care of everything, said that sentence words not of pleasant to hear, Crown Prince is thinks that the Swallow King threat is too big, the meaning of being secretly Swallow King putting under house arrest.

Swallow King also has the vigilance to oneself, she naturally knows, but he actually cannot spoil itself like this!

Han Xuan was certainly indignant at this time!

Sees Han Xuan to be motionless, on the Swallow King face reveals the angry color immediately, extremely swift and fierce killing intent releases, immediately covers her, “I called you to jump, you jumped, otherwise has killed you!”

So under the vision, makes in the Han Xuan heart tremble immediately, Swallow King has killed her, also nobody can speak several words for her!

But, she actually bit the tooth to accept.

As the music of musician plays, this female then dances lightly in front of Luo Zheng and Swallow King......

Looks at her whole face not willingly expression and hatred, Luo Zheng also sighed, in the heart sighed, this is also the main house gate misfortune, only then among the emperor's clans will make this dispute.

But Luo Zheng is also clear, Swallow King said that then has two goals, on the one hand he no doubt dislikes to the Swallow King mansion, together with own princesses is the people of Crown Prince, by the Swallow King disposition, this tone is indeed unendurable, he said that is also one vents regarding oneself.

On the other hand, has the trust Luo Zheng's factor in inside.

This Swallow King was too young, was less than 20 years old, handled the matter actually not to consider the consequence, only strove for serving his purpose, this princess came out to perform for the guest personally, so passed on, his face also fell most probably, was really too absurd!

How Swallow King itself not to care, is makes Luo Zheng all kinds not adapt on the contrary, felt that sits like the pincushion!





#776 - Team


Although that Han Xuan dancer's posture wonderful graceful, however in the so strange atmosphere, where Luo Zheng has the mood to appreciate?

But the Swallow King facial features are actually very fierce, as if so suffers own princess is vent.

After finally, Luo Zheng was sets out to find an excuse in advance to depart.

No matter how this Swallow King and Crown Prince fight, struggles, Luo Zheng only needs the goal advance that defers to itself to establish then.

Makes some arrived Life Origin Stone from Swallow King mansion here, but quantity truly by far insufficient, but understanding of Luo Zheng Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea was also clearer.

Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, Luo Zheng must enter, these days Luo Zheng that but waits for will actually not waste.

Besides cultivation, he is wants to purchase many Life Origin Stone.

Lone Crane City eventually is the Black Iron Divine Country second largest city, and has Jade Profound Martial Mansion this to compare favorably with the sixth grade sect strength cultivation sacred ground.

In Divine Country does not have sect, but has various big Aristocratic Family, in Central Region most formidable Aristocratic Family third grade, has not been born fourth grade Aristocratic Family.

However in this light this Lone Crane City then many fourth grade, are as for fifth grade Aristocratic Family, the Patriarch strengths of these families also generally in Life and Death Realm Fourth Layer, even Fifth Layer realm.

Since Swallow King your family place collection has Life Origin Stone, then in big Lone Crane City, should be able to wash much, if can consume the true essence stone purchase, Luo Zheng will not let up this opportunity.

Therefore when cultivation, Luo Zheng is actually finds the opportunity to inquire.

Under inquired, unavoidably was somewhat disappointed.

Life Origin Stone can supplement that the strength of life, regarding martial artist is also the enticement that is hard to resist, even if this type of thing exists, rapid was used, little has to preserve, is the collection of Swallow King your family place quite a lot, therefore has few Life Origin Stone to take.

Then cut off Luo Zheng to buy the Life Origin Stone thoughts, can only wait for that explored Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea.

But opens Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is not Luo Zheng decides, but is under four big Divine Country unions, can make martial artist in Divine Country enter, Luo Zheng itself anxiously is also anxiously.

The time passed by half a month later, Swallow King was actually visits to come, after meeting, the Swallow King opens the mouth access road: “Walks, with me! I lead you to have a look at my troops!”

“Your troops?”Under Luo Zheng heart some doubt.

Luo Zheng had not asked, is only follower Swallow King, is directly soars Jade Profound Martial Mansion to go.

The Jade Profound Martial Mansion occupying land area is very huge, various building hall clubhouses are innumerable, in which martial artist sees Swallow King, is very respectful, bows in salute to salute, then makes way a road.

So under leads the way, is in a clubhouse in arrived Martial Mansion, in this clubhouse, actually two male female sitting well in, these three people are also Void Tribulation Realm later stage martial artist.

The Luo Zheng's sensation sweeps at will, is feels these three people of strengths not to be weak, belongs to Divine Rank Talent basically.

The Swallow King steps enter, that three people open eyes at the same time, the side that 20 -year-old over female, actually smiles toward Swallow King, “Huahua/playboy, you came!”

“Huahua/playboy......”Luo Zheng actually does not know, this Swallow King does have this kind of given name?

Swallow King also feigns to get angry: “this King has said that not only so called this King!”

“Huahua/playboy vitality/angry, was most lovable!”The female actually does not think disobediently, smiles as before, obviously this is a very lively female.

But presents the other two also saying: “Yue Ying, cannot be so impolite to Swallow King!”

Under so advises, that is called the Yue Ying female actually to note on Luo Zheng the vision, a beautiful eye of pair of round keeps turning on Luo Zheng, immediately continues saying: “Huahua/playboy, who is this fellow?”

Swallow King shows a faint smile, pats the Luo Zheng's shoulder then saying: “I come to introduce with several, this is Luo Tianxing, he will join in us temporarily.”

Afterward Swallow King also said to Luo Zheng: “Brother Tianxing, these three people are the teams that I form, separately is Yue Ying, Zuo Zhuandong and Lan Chen, in addition your, was five people are complete/even!”

In the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea mystical place, does not limit the population, but explores these many years, four big Divine Country also optimizations gradually best plan.

Explores the mystical place in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea to be best is comprised of a small team, the best population is five people.

But each Divine Country will dispatch certain like this small teams, enters in the mystical place.

Swallow King and Crown Prince in secret are forming own team, but with Crown Prince in comparison, Swallow King naturally fell leeward, moreover this leeward is also not the tiny bit!

Swallow King talent and strength, perhaps under Crown Prince, are not these three people at present, is actually not able they compares with Zhan Yun and Xiao Daoyuan.

This also why Swallow King wants the reason that draws Luo Zheng to join a group.

“Were our five people complete/even? Huahua/playboy, is it possible that are you are cracking a joke?”That is called the Yue Ying female, sizes up Luo Zheng, in the eye is actually revealing the expression that does not spare a glance.

Yue Ying, is Zuo Zhuandong and the others, stems from Lone Crane City fifth grade Aristocratic Family, moreover is in these Aristocratic Family the highest Aristocratic Family juniors.

Their strengths are not possibly able to be a worthy opponent with Zhan Yun, however can also be in Jade Profound Martial Mansion the second echelon is top, after these three people Swallow King selects, even has not participated in the inspection, the Black Iron Command issue, is helped them handle by Swallow King.

These days, they also gather, coordinates to discipline, to go to battle with Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea prepares.

Now Swallow King actually suddenly leads Void Tribulation Realm middle stage martial artist to join them, this makes Yue Ying they suddenly not want to understand.

In Jade Profound Martial Mansion, Void Tribulation Realm later stage isn't martial artist, one's turn at present this boy greatly?

Hears the Yue Ying words, how Swallow King not to understand her meaning? Obviously somewhat cannot take a liking to Luo Zheng this “teammate”.

“Brother Tianxing not must be offended,”Swallow King actually fears some Luo Zheng anything ideas.

Who knows that an eye revolution of Yue Ying that round, “what he has to be good to be offended, can make Swallow King settle on, joins in us, is his good fortune, is Huahua/playboy, why can't I think through you to draw a burden to join a group?”

Swallow King shows a faint smile, “Luo Zheng, is not the burden, if I have not been mistaken, he may be the pillar/backbone of our team!”

Heard a Swallow King such saying, Zuo Zhuandong and Lan Chen complexion had the change immediately.

Although their temper like that are not noisy like Yue Ying, the character but who can cooperate with Swallow King, in the heart somewhat the arrogance, where places is ten thousand miles selects a character.

Luo Zheng is Void Tribulation Realm middle stage cultivation base, how can enter their eyes?

But Swallow King actually so said that this explained this person of no small matter! Pillar/Backbone? In their teams, pillar/backbone forever one, that is Swallow King itself, this is called Luo Tianxing martial artist, is fiercer than Swallow King?

Yue Ying laughs at one general, vision provocation is looking at Luo Zheng, “I do not believe! Huahua/playboy is all right with us cracks a joke.”

“Joke?”Swallow King also knows, if Luo Zheng does not show one's skill, perhaps is very difficult to make them believe that “if thinks that I am cracking a joke, you can compare notes with Brother Tianxing!”

The Swallow King voice falls, these three people of vision brilliant is staring at Luo Zheng, looked that this wants to challenge Luo Zheng.

On the Luo Zheng face actually reveals a helpless smiling face, “this doesn't, need?”

“You said do not need, is really useless!”That is called the Yue Ying female voice to fall, the form in a flash, then extends the white hands suddenly, pats toward Luo Zheng.

In the instance that she moved, Luo Zheng's at present suddenly presented over a thousand white hands, this female was common just like thousand Goddess of Mercy, suddenly take action over a thousand times, were almost watertight, Luo Zheng all escape route seals stubbornly.

“The speed of this female, quick is not normal!”The Luo Zheng's vision dodges slightly, he is actually discovered that in this female body erupts very special Law Strength, this Law Strength, Luo Zheng has not experienced before this!

“Time Law?”

In the entire world most formidable two Law, one is Time Law, two are Space Law.

Luo Zheng has controlled Space Law, but since, whom had not experienced to control Time Law, has not thought actually in this is called on the Yue Ying female to experience arrived.

Also because of through the acceleration of Time Law, this female in can attack so many palms in blinking to Luo Zheng!

“Yue Ying! Swallow King makes you compare notes, do not injure to the opposite party!”That is called Zuo Zhuandong martial artist, instead urged.

After all Luo Zheng only then Void Tribulation Realm middle stage, this Yue Ying usually does not know the weight on some, if projects on the severe wound Luo Zheng, was blamed by Swallow King is not good.

The Swallow King whole face indifferent expression, as if simply does not have to be Luo Zheng worried.

===========================

===========================





#777 - Cooperation Strength


On that Yue Ying face flood smile was responding: “Relax, will not injure to this boy!”

However just said that palm imprint that she brandishes is getting more and more swift and fierce.

don't must think her slender white hands, even if the bronze statue that a fine iron builds, smashing that can also be divided by her, if under Luo Zheng is unable to deal, is injured is definitely avoidless.

In Luo Zheng's both eyes erupts the clear ray, attempts Time Law that comprehends in this Yue Ying body to bloom.

“Does not resist also uselessly, I really will attack!”Yue Ying saw that Luo Zheng somewhat is in a daze, in heart disdains, the ghost knows that this fellow is happy with Huahua/playboy that what cheated, made him join this team?

She then chops toward the Luo Zheng overhead, the strength has also used eight points!

Luo Zheng comprehended for a long time, actually shook the head, puts out a hand to pinch gently, the ease grasped Yue Ying that pair of white hands in the hand, immediately said in a soft voice: “Time Law Strength that contains are too few, I cannot become aware.”

He so relaxed grips both hands of Yue Ying, as if Yue Ying was just not began to Luo Zheng, but was driving putting out a hand makes Luo Zheng press firmly between the fingers general.

Yue Ying stayed one dull, wants to seize from the Luo Zheng hand own both hands, discovery oneself both hands just like were gripped by pair of big pliers general, she cannot extract oneself both hands.

Zuo Zhuandong and Lan Chen also want to look at a good play, they want to take a look at Luo Zheng to use what method actually, resists the Yue Ying style?

This Yue Ying “Thousand Leaves Jade Female Hand”the attack, is similar to the profusion of fallen petals is ordinary, dazzling, is containing Time Law, can change her time speed of flow in a short time, is unable to explain, can only break it with a more formidable method forcefully.

However what they have not thought that Luo Zheng is only pinches conveniently, directly broke, this then lets their look at each other in blank dismay, four items relative, full is shocking look.

But on the Swallow King face is reappearing the light happy expression, as if all in expected, in the Swallow King happy expression, is the somewhat amazed color, he thinks that Luo Zheng can break the Yue Ying style, but has not thought that so will be relaxed simply, with eating meal to drink water general......

As if the Luo Zheng's strength, has far exceeded Void Tribulation Realm this rank, only then so can achieve so the weight lifting such as light realm!

“You, let loose!”Yue Ying wants to pull out both hands, after having tried several times, is actually not able to pull out, the both eyes of that pair of round are perfectly round that opens, stubbornly is staring at Luo Zheng, above the cheeks even flood a crimson color.

Luo Zheng then gently loosens both hands, on face is having a happy expression, has not started talking with enough time, that Yue Ying said: “What is time Law Strength are too few? You want to comprehend Time Law from here!”

Hears this saying, everybody is the whole face is also strange.

Law comprehends quite to be difficult, moreover Yue Ying has displayed Time Law, is her own true essence stimulates to movement, after Law Strength true essence will stimulate to movement, becomes the disorder, will be only oneself can control, this Luo Zheng will want to comprehend opposite party Law Strength in the fight, this simply will be the wishful thinking.

They are not clear, after Luo Zheng has experienced Law Strength baptism, in Law Strength with entire entire world has highest compatible, pure comprehension Law Strength regarding other people, is quite difficult, but actually by no means any difficult matter to Luo Zheng.

Most formidable two Law, one is Space Law, two are Time Law, Space Law Luo Zheng itself had the comprehension, but Time Law until now, Luo Zheng has not actually contacted, this is the Luo Zheng first experience to Time Law!

Luo Zheng smiles lightly, said: “If there is an opportunity comprehension, Luo naturally cannot let off......”

“Bah!”Yue Ying cold snort/hum one, “Time Law was I also comprehended 10%! Where was comprehended easily!”

“Is first layer Time Law 10%?”Asking that Luo Zheng is actually ignorant of current affairs.

At this time on the Yue Ying face revealed a face the expression that wanted to kill people, wicked was staring at Luo Zheng!

In other foundation Law with the entire world are different, Time Law and Space Law are very precious rarely, the cultivation getting up difficulty is also higher.

Luo Zheng's first layer Space Law learns in True Dragon Realm, but second layer Space Law learns on Tablet of Talent in Tower of Evil, Space Law or Time Law, were very difficult to find legacy the tablet of Law in this Great Thousand World.

But Yue Ying cultivation Time Law, difficulty really plans compared with Space Law, simultaneously the might also gets up compared with other foundation Law, under the change time speed of flow, can let the leeway that martial artist displays is really too many!

Therefore Yue Ying can comprehend 10% Time Law in first layer, has made her smile the arrogant same step sufficiently.

However looks like in Luo Zheng, seems somewhat regrettable, sees Luo Zheng this appearance, the Yue Ying nature is angry!

At this time Swallow King then with a smile walked, light saying: “Was good, the probe also stopped, the Brother Tianxing strength, should under me, he unable to join in our teams, is one big helps absolutely.”

“Snort!”look that on the Yue Ying face is not convinced.

But just now Luo Zheng careless melted her attack, in addition under Swallow King so appreciates, in her heart also understands, perhaps the Luo Zheng's strength can post with the character of Zhan Yun that level, is the evildoer/monstrous talent talent of true first steps!

The martial artist quantity in Black Iron Divine Country how? Under this stage, only has four people merely, perhaps the great strength of Luo Zheng, is really not she can imagine.

At this time, Swallow King also said to Luo Zheng: “Can look, you always come and go freely, as if the significance of not clear team?”

Hears the Swallow King words, Luo Zheng thinks immediately arrived Cui Xie Heavenly Evil Sect, initially Heavenly Evil Sect then has special tactical rules, can make over ten thousand Spirit Illumination Realm martial artist true essence unite in together, making these low level martial artist display very terrifying strength.

Luo Zheng nodded.

Swallow King actually waved to Zuo Zhuandong and Yue Ying and the others, arrives at the center of this clubhouse, faces Luo Zheng to extend a hand, immediately said: “You can try to attack!”

Zuo Zhuandong and Yue Ying stand in the Swallow King both sides separately, but Lan Chen stands in Swallow King.

“This can Swallow King, unite they four people of strengths?”The Luo Zheng whole face has sized up one curiously, since complied to join the Swallow King team, oneself must integrate, thinks of here, the Luo Zheng's form in a flash, is without consulting anybody overruns to Swallow King suddenly.

Has not waited for Luo Zheng to approach, Zuo Zhuandong actually puts out a hand, then light purple true essence circle outside the body, these true essence actually keep turning regarding Swallow King!

Side Yue Ying actually smiles, under white hands wield, immediately forms light light screen, when Luo Zheng charges into that light screen the instance, he felt immediately periphery all look like are slow, together with own speed similarly is also slow incomparable!

“Is Time Law! Their these three people, became at this time the assistance of Swallow King......”in the Luo Zheng heart a thought flash through completely.

At this time, Swallow King personal appearance suddenly flashed, actually instantaneously came arrived Luo Zheng's behind, in the hand under the turn over, were many a sharp short blade edge to have put on the Luo Zheng's neck, under these people united, indeed was matching perfect without a gap.

However the Luo Zheng's response is also extremely quick, Time Law comprehension of Yue Ying is not deep, the Luo Zheng's body turns just like swimming fish generally slightly, opens from Swallow King sliding of short blade edge, on the face reveals the self-confident smiling face, asks for actually the short blade edge in Swallow King hand to seize.

At this time, Luo Zheng suddenly felt that own mind shakes suddenly greatly, as if the beginning chops in the Luo Zheng's head, that was called Lan Chen martial artist to display the soul attack to him.

If trades to be other people, under this multiple attack, is unlikely hard to resist this soul attack, even if resisted reluctantly, perhaps also wanted spirit fragment, how under spirit fragment to resist the attack of Swallow King?

But how Lan Chen can imagine, has the Luo Zheng's soul soon stepped into Green Soul Realm? His degree of soul attack, is only flexure is itchy to Luo Zheng!

Luo Zheng is actually not willing to expose own complete strength, he pretends snort/hum one intentionally stuffily, one leans toward the front, the Swallow King short blade edge puts up once more on the Luo Zheng's neck.

Swallow King is actually reveals one “prevailing”the smiling face, he wants to give Luo Zheng to show, strength that their several people coordinate, is more formidable than the Luo Zheng's individual.

However Swallow King where can think, even if their these four people join up, is not the Luo Zheng's match, but this compares notes today, Luo Zheng is not willing to reveal too many strengths.

“Huahua/playboy, has killed him! Snort!”Saw that Luo Zheng was trigged by Swallow King, on the Yue Ying face reveals the self-satisfied smiling face, obviously takes to heart to Luo Zheng just now action.

Swallow King demonstrates one to Luo Zheng, where will listen to the Yue Ying words, shows a faint smile, then evacuates the short blade edge from the Luo Zheng's neck that.

“Rest of the time are not much, enter in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, we will also face many competitions, if you have the time, can they wear in Yue Ying, our five people, must in the tour of this mystical place, attain the best result!”In the Swallow King vision is glittering the hope gloss.

He has been suppressed by Crown Prince, then must seek an opportunity of turning over.

Although Crown Prince is fierce, but he does not hoodwink the public, if Swallow King can obtain under the father sovereign's recognition, Crown Prince definitely will restrain under the scruples.

Luo Zheng nods, the Swallow King goal and own goal do not violate, if can realize under own goal to help Swallow King, he will not flinch similarly!

These days, Luo Zheng for the time being keeps in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, carries on “wearing in”with these three people.

Luo Zheng also slowly has been familiar with these three people of dispositions, that is called Zuo Zhuandong martial artist, the disposition is quite docile amiably, in comparison, Lan Chen somewhat is mechanical, bad spoken language, as for the Yue Ying disposition lively open, careless.

Along with the cultivation technique understanding of their cultivation, Luo Zheng understands why Swallow King will choose them.

Zuo Zhuandong or Lan Chen, or Yue Ying, their three are not good at attacking, cultivation technique that as if majors, is also the deviation assists one kind completely!

For example Yue Ying Time Law, mainly slows down the speed of match, under her Time Law covers, can in the flash, making the match slow, this flash, can want the life of opposite party!

But Zuo Zhuandong, is good at giving match to create many barriers, as for Lan Chen, then cultivation one type can harass the mind cultivation technique!

This martial skill legacy, is completely different from Central Region or Sea God Continent in!

Central Region and Sea God Continent, what pursue is the great strength of individual pinnacle, little coordinates with other people.

The martial artist coordination with each other of this Void Tribulation Realm, can achieve so the effect, if 5-6 position Divine Sea Realm can coordinate greatly? Luo Zheng is conceivable, even if the Liu Yu individual is very formidable, however discovers five Divine Sea Realm big energies above Sea God Continent, in five under with Divine Country vigorously to coordinate five Divine Sea Realm to resist greatly, Divine Sea Realm in Divine Country can greatly the winning percentage will be perhaps higher!

In this clubhouse, Luo Zheng with their cultivation, occasionally also will communicate together some questions above military study.

However most of the time, is Luo Zheng consults to them.

Divine Country legacy is indeed richer than Central Region, moreover in them suitable part legacy, came from upper realm human race, was only a pity that Luo Zheng is not clear, these four big Divine Country legacy and upper realm human race which influence.

Along with the crawl, Swallow King as if also became busy, little appeared in Martial Mansion, he is actually busy some business in emperor's clan.

Three months later, Jade Profound Martial Mansion convenes suddenly all through inspection Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, naturally also has included Luo Zheng.

In the Luo Zheng heart also knows, was Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea must open approximately, this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea was equal to four big Divine Country treasure houses, was equal to status of Profound Nether Cave on Sea God Continent, does not know how they distributed martial artist to enter.

Person who however Yue Ying, Lan Chen and Zuo Zhuandong three martial artist, in invitation, they do not belong to Swallow King actually, has not participated in the inspection, perhaps will accompany Swallow King together.

( Was not quite satisfied, has deleted, &gt\; _





#778 - Collection


Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea and Cursed Land are somewhat similar, similarly is located in a Continent center, regarding most martial artist, is restricted area general existence similarly.

However Cursed Land regarding high rank martial artist is the restricted area, but Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is to low level martial artist is the restricted area, between both has qualitative to be different.

Almost every year, four big Divine Country must jointly explore Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, sacred ground that a dragon vein clan leaves behind, regarding these Divine Country is taking the drainless treasure house, since four big Divine Country can develop, in resources except for Divine Country Continent surrounding endless sea area, most important was the mystical place in Saint sea!

Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea in four big Divine Country ruler eyes, naturally is the treasure in treasure.

martial artist that Jade Profound Martial Mansion all was selected, has boarded a giant square boat, this square boat is common just like an airborne palace, several hundred, sufficiently accommodate several tens of thousands people.

Luo Zheng is accompanies other through inspection martial artist, entered in this square boat, after the square boat lifts off, then in northwest speeds away to go.

Can look, each is excited through inspection Void Tribulation Realm martial artist.

Can be selected by Divine Country, enters in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea informed and experienced, in the future is the emperor spoiled child common characters of!

Some people once had conducted this kind of statistics, in four big Divine Country, almost 99% Divine Sea Realm big energies, first time entered in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea to achieve the good achievement.

The mystical place in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, is the rod that verifies the Divine Country martial artist potential, will therefore present each Void Tribulation Realm martial artist vigorously, but will be, will not have neglects slightly.

“Quite attractive! Had heard Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea is the golden color, today is the first time must see!”

“That golden light, it is said is under dragon vein clan trillion lifeform blood sacrifices, strength that leaves behind!”

Most people emerged above square boat Class A, is appreciating Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea above the upper air.

Luo Zheng also stands above the deck similarly, is appreciating this golden sea, he can feel the strength of blood sacrifice in that piece of golden light contains, a dragon vein clan defeats, then entire clan trillion lifeform by blood sacrifice, is containing surely greatly unwilling......

He looks into the distant place, will try to focus on remotely will be, under this golden sea will cover, Luo Zheng has not actually searched the traces of these mystical places.

If Luo Zheng guess right, four big mystical places should correspond the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea above four islands, but Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, although is only an inland sea, but Luo Zheng cannot seek for these islands.

After all arrived destination, said again, in these date and time Luo Zheng hearts is also anxious, but sometimes anxiously also useless, although in Central Region, he already did not have the rival, is in four big Divine Country, the Luo Zheng's strength is also insufficient crush all.

Although this square boat escapes fast extremely quick, but reached the destination also to consume for enough two days three nights of time, until early morning of third day, presented a great river in the front finally!

“Is Western Dragon River! Is the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea estuary!”

This Western Dragon River end is then connecting Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, what is quite magnificent, in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea that golden sea water, is similar to the good wine that in the cup floods is common, a Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea corner/horn is freely connected with this river, the golden sea water has not actually flowed to this great river.

Therefore this Western Dragon River one, is the sky-blue river water, but after arrived upstream, actually suddenly transforms into the golden color, engagement towering of.

In the one side of this great river, has anchored more than 20 giant square boats, evidently other Martial Mansion martial artist, came to be many.

The Jade Profound Martial Mansion square boat anchors slowly, under three Divine Sea Realm can lead greatly, many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist also followed left the square boat.

Dozens miles side Western Dragon River locates, then constructs a giant palace, in palace nearby is together over ten thousand mu big or small square, above this moment square a minute of raid gathered many martial artist.

“Four big Divine Country martial artist,”the ray in Luo Zheng eye dodges.

After Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea opening, enters, not only only has Black Iron Divine Country, Great Yu Divine Country, Heavenly Wind Divine Country and Starry Space Divine Country.

On this day, is the day that in four big Divine Country martial artist gets together.

In this giant square, in four big Divine Country young generation of martial artist is holding own domain respectively, but many Life and Death Realm expert, with the Divine Sea Realm big energy, then occupies above the stair before palace.

Under the Luo Zheng's vision sweeps slightly, the discovery in the stair peak, is standing erect big more than 30 Divine Sea Realm big energies.

Even if separated by not the short distance with Luo Zheng, Luo Zheng can feel these Divine Sea Realm big beam energy spreads to send out the terrifying imposing manner!

“Four big Divine Country inside story, are Central Region are really incomparable, in their eyes, Central Region is boundary of the young barbarian desolate, actually does not know that previous time extinguished has killed the Great Yu Divine Country two Divine Sea Realm big energies, in this Great Yu Divine Country had what sound?”

Luo Zheng most was worried that encounters that saintess in Great Yu Divine Country.

Initially in Heavenly Vast Immortal Grave, Luo Zheng had the big contradiction with that saintess, if that Divine Country saintess appears today here, regarding Luo Zheng perhaps was not a small trouble.

don't said that is these many Divine Sea Realm big energies, even if Luo Zheng Divine Sea Realm can stare greatly, perhaps is impossible to escape!

After Luo Zheng follows Jade Profound Martial Mansion these disciples enter that square, is hears above the palace, together resounding sound sound, “Black Iron Divine Country, Jade Profound Martial Mansion!”

That sound is sharp, has almost spread over in a surrounding area hundred miles range.

The Luo Zheng mixture in other martial artist, then entered in that giant square, but three Divine Sea Realm big energies in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, then stood above the stair of palace.

However the Jade Profound Martial Mansion three Mansion Lord positions are slightly low, are in the latter half of stair.

Above the square, many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist also defer to the difference of respective vassal state, position that occupies also respective different, for example Jade Profound Martial Mansion and black Martial Mansion with stemming from Black Iron Divine Country, martial artist in these two Martial Mansion then gather.

Before long, the horizon also had the giant square boat to arrive, anchors in the waterfront.

That sharp sound has made afterward a sound, “Starry Space Divine Country, Great Declaration Martial Mansion!”

From that square boat, also presented four Divine Sea Realm big energies, flying to palace stair above slowly, compares in Jade Profound Martial Mansion three Mansion Lord positions, position that this greatly profound Martial Mansion is, then wants on the high number step!

Sees this, in the Luo Zheng heart also understands clearly.

Although this piece of Divine Country Continent was occupied by four big Divine Country, but the places of some people, certainly will branch out one high under!

Black Iron Divine Country, in four big Divine Country perhaps is not strongest.

Although Jade Profound Martial Mansion compares favorably with the sixth grade sect influence, but similarly is not most formidable Martial Mansion, the Great Declaration Martial Mansion status that just arrived, should above Jade Profound Martial Mansion.

Luo Zheng's guessed indeed right.

Four big Divine Country have been maintaining the subtle balance for these years, but the strength truly has the division of strong and weak.

In recent years, these four positions in a hierarchy oscillate, the seating order also frequently changes.

But since recent hundred years, then must be Great Yu Divine Country is most prosperous, Starry Space Divine Country was next, gets down is Heavenly Wind Divine Country for the third child, Black Iron Divine Country placed end.

Naturally, this rank, but aims at an influence and young generation of comprehensive embodiment of country arranges, is only Divine Country Country Lord, in which Battle Sovereign Battle Emperor long has several tens of thousands years of life, but among Country Lord in the ordinary circumstances will not fight, was is hard to branch out one high and low.

Therefore, this rank did not show that Black Iron Divine Country is really weaker than Great Yu Divine Country many!

“Heavenly Wind Divine Country, Connecting Spirit Martial Mansion!”

“Great Yu Divine Country, Cloud Dragon Martial Mansion!”

“......”

This each Martial Mansion, badly is also the fifth grade above sect strength, Divine Sea Realm on stair greatly can the quantity increases unceasingly, in square Void Tribulation Realm martial artist quantity unceasing earth-shaking transformation are also many.

At this time, Luo Zheng suddenly felt that the corner of the eye blooms ray of light glow, looks up, is actually sees the west side to present a ray of light point, is ordinary just like a small Sun, in airborne flies rapidly!

When that luminous spot is getting more and more near, Luo Zheng can actually identify from the luminous spot, that unexpectedly is a golden palace!

Speeds along to come at the extremely quick speed in the golden light bright palace, suddenly anchored near Western Dragon River, then heard in this palace to hear together the deep laughter.

“Haha! The old man came evidently early, ate delicacies haughtily that several old fogies, has not come!”

Immediately Luo Zheng sees in this golden palace, then over a hundred a silhouette depart, is one person of head, is over the face red light middle-aged person.

Sized up one slightly, Luo Zheng henceforth the human has felt the imposing manner that was hard to resist, this imposing manner not with the imposing manner that the soul pressure released, but was a long time occupies the imposing manner that the Higher Position many years fostered slowly!

This imposing manner, even if Liu Yu in Heavenly Feather Sacred Ground, has not had, after all Liu Yu controls the Heavenly Feather Sacred Ground also more than 200 years, Luo Zheng has felt on the body of smoking!

Naturally, the imposing manner of smoking releases, be swifter and fiercer than this person! The imposing manner of this person, aims at human race martial artist merely, but the imposing manner of smoking, then almost can crush all living things.

“Starry Space Divine Country, Heavenly Fate Country Lord!”That say/way sharp sound, at the right moment the period of five days has then made a sound.

“Originally is Starry Space Divine Country Country Lord! Four big Divine Country are this piece of Continent ruler, then the strength of this person, should at least be able to be Divine Country Continent first four?”In the Luo Zheng heart guessed.

Heavenly Fate Country Lord is “Haha”smiles, but he does not have above the honest flying palace, but stayed a while in the square place above, took a fast look around many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist in square, hears this Heavenly Fate Country Lord saying: “My Starry Space Divine Country disciples and followers where!”

Hears own Country Lord so to question, in that Great Declaration Martial Mansion and Starry Space Divine Country martial artist in other Martial Mansion, are similar to the thunderclap responds immediately generally: “See Country Lord! We, in!”

Several hundred Void Tribulation Realm martial artist simultaneously roared, as if the ground trembled.

( Renewal little also has to hit to enjoy t_t to thank reading is always profitable 3000 to read the coin to hit to enjoy, thanks the farmer three fists to be a little sore 500 to read the coin to hit to enjoy, the following plot straightens out m__m to thank the understanding of fellow readers slowly, for these days for the time being maintains the 6 k renewal! Year later restores to renew to ten thousand/myriad character!!!)





#779 - Battle Sovereign Battle Emperor


“Good, hehe, the young animals, a while display well!”

Heavenly Fate Country Lord said with a smile, immediately was leading behind various Renzhan in stair the platform on uppermost layer.

Follows Heavenly Fate Country Lord behind these martial artist, has Life and Death Realm expert, many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, think that should be Starry Space Divine Country imperial prince Crown Prince......

After Starry Space Divine Country Country Lord arrives, not far away is together the blue flowing light raids, if that stream of light still the comet, drags to entrain the long trace together, straightly shoots.

After this flowing light approaches, Luo Zheng actually discovered that was one is enlarged the great sword of non- several fold unexpectedly.

“Great Yu Divine Country Country Lord came!”Some people have recognized the origin of this great sword.

Really, when that great sword anchors after the waterfront, presented many Divine Sea Realm big energies from that great sword, similarly also follower several hundred people.

At this time heard that sharp sound to announce, “Great Yu Divine Country Country Lord, Great Yu Battle Emperor!”

Compares Starry Space Divine Country day rhyme Country Lord, this Great Yu Battle Emperor disposition is cloudier, has sped along the square, has not spoken a few words, person who is bringing his stood in the stair top layer directly.

Under Luo Zheng sizes up carefully, then sees in this Great Yu Battle Emperor behind in the people, is following a female of face belt tissue, that tissue cannot cover the facial features, the Luo Zheng's eyebrow jumps slightly, actually shrank shrinking toward the crowd.

This female that Divine Country saintess!

In Great Yu Divine Country how does not know this Divine Country saintess's status, if were found by her accidentally, these Divine Sea Realm can launch an attack to oneself greatly?

On two Country Lord that the image space arrives, Heavenly Fate Country Lord, is this Great Yu Battle Emperor, is the Divine Sea Realm big energies, but Divine Sea Realm can in have the high under division greatly, by the Luo Zheng present strength, at all impossible to escape from their hands.

If that saintess spoke, does not know that Great Yu Battle Emperor can begin to oneself?

In the Luo Zheng heart slightly feels anxious, but quick on long inspiration, was been diligently tranquil by oneself, he believes that oneself destiny, that many difficult has lived through, now Luo Zheng then diligently makes itself calmer.

Then Heavenly Wind Divine Country and Black Iron Divine Country Country Lord, arrives in abundance, the Heavenly Wind Divine Country Country Lord given name is Heavenly Wind Battle Sovereign, but the Black Iron Divine Country Country Lord given name actually is really unique, actually says its, called “Zhou Huang”two characters.

This Country Lord given name, is very indeed chaotic, other martial artist see not to be strange, the Luo Zheng feeling is actually very irritable.

Because after arrived Divine Sea Realm, can Emperor to seal/confer Huangfeng, but some martial artist are also retaining oneself life, some martial artist called Battle Sovereign Battle Emperor......

In Zhou Huang, Luo Zheng discovered Swallow King in, with Swallow King together also has to sit Crown Prince on wheelchair.

Above stair, many Divine Sea Realm big energies, as well as four big Divine Country emperor's clans, in the square under stair, is four big Divine Country young generation of elites.

After the person arrives in full basically, that say/way sharp sound has made a sound.

“Four big Divine Country people have arrived in full, according to the convention, decides a victory and defeat in advance high, carries on the sacrificial offering again!”

This time arrived at the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea estuary, Luo Zheng had also understood how four big Divine Country explored this Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea every year.

Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea in four big Divine Country eyes, then just like a giant cake, each Divine Country every year must cut a blade above, but this cake cuts many, who cuts first, every year must branch out an order.

Several hundred years ago, several big Country Lord basically by quarrelling, several times also almost hit.

These Battle Sovereign Battle Emperor fight, extremely was rather earthshaking, let alone four big Divine Country brothers, so shouted in confusion also injure friendly.

Therefore before the sacrificial offering, among four big Divine Country young generation of top expert, then must decide a victory and defeat to come mutually, comes to inspect the major Divine Country young generation of strengths, two come also to branch out an order.

Gradually, four big Divine Country also more and more take seriously this ratio to fight, even some Divine Country martial artist, gather the results of these fights, will forecast a Divine Country future transporting potential and strong and weak!

Four big Country Lord stand in most top layer, after hearing this saying, immediately that Heavenly Fate Country Lord Haha smiles, “good! My Starry Space Divine Country young animal, stands first!”

In Starry Space Divine Country has three sixth grade Martial Mansion, can stand martial artist of first steps, reaches six people, falls in the Heavenly Fate Country Lord voice, in the square had martial artist to change to the flowing light to clash immediately left the square, arrived under of stair to do obeisance doing obeisance toward the place above, responded loudly: “Country Lord, my Zhao Tianji goes to battle on behalf of Great Declaration Martial Mansion!”

Heavenly Fate Country Lord as Starry Space Divine Country Country Lord, to Divine Country in young generation of expert heart naturally have several, he as if very much has the self-confidence to this Zhao Tianji, therefore heroic saying with a smile: “Good! Is met head-on by you! Does not know other Divine Country young animals, but dares to challenge?”

This Heavenly Fate Country Lord voice falls, in square has stream of light to project instantaneously, arrives under the stair instantaneously, this person is Great Yu Divine Country martial artist, the personal appearance quite tall and strong, is ordinary just like an ominous beast.

“Great Yu Divine Country, Wolf Shadow Martial Mansion, Yun Longtao, accepts a challenge!”

After that martial artist said that Great Yu Battle Emperor that gloomy face above stair, this reveals the light smiling face, immediately encourages saying: “Longtao/dragon waves, hears you to be known as is under Void Tribulation Realm invincible, these time thinks that will not disappoint me!”

“Reply Country Lord, under Void Tribulation Realm invincible, but is other people's false rumor,”on this Yun Longtao mouth, although said that but in the bone actually as if reveals the intense self-confidence, as if simply presence numerous Void Tribulation Realm martial artist will not have placed in the eye.

Since two big Divine Country matches jumped, this fight naturally started.

Under Void Tribulation Realm martial artist compares notes, sound is enormous, especially Void Tribulation Realm later stage is formidable, under erupts fully can actually moving mountains draining seas, the domain on the scene is enormous, insufficiently they display.

However the scene two Divine Sea Realm big energies are to actually go down the steps, under waves, in airborne presented thread, was these thread from the sky has formed giant cuboid barrier, in this barrier was the space that they fought.

barrier that Divine Sea Realm can make greatly, is not Void Tribulation Realm this level can explain.

Luo Zheng has not fought to care this ratio, in his opinion, this ratio fights with oneself does not have the big relations.

Is four big Divine Country young generation of martial artist branched out one high, what he cares is enters Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea......

At this time he also can only add the patience, waited for that they decided a victory and defeat.

Estimates according to Luo Zheng, this ratio will fight the time of continuing not to be long-time, can stand martial artist like Black Iron Divine Country above first steps, only then four people, a while Black Iron Divine Country martial artist will go to battle, mostly also will be Swallow King, Crown Prince, Xiao Daoyuan and Zhan Yun four people.

Even if Starry Space Divine Country and Great Yu Divine Country are slightly stronger than Black Iron Divine Country, but can stand the martial artist quantity in first steps will not be perhaps many, most also on the 6-7 person about.

Above square, many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist whole faces anxious is looking at the fight in barrier.

The Divine Country martial artist sense of belonging and sympathy, must be more formidable than it sect! Therefore was born in Divine Country martial artist, what pays great attention is the Divine Country glory!

This war is Starry Space Divine Country and Great Yu Divine Country martial artist branches out one high, martial artist in these two big Divine Country naturally most anxious and care, holds the mentality of seeing a play to observe as for Black Iron Divine Country and Heavenly Wind Divine Country.

“Bang......”

In along with the people top of the head in that cuboid, is flooding fierce flame, two people go on stage, situation already superheating.

Represents own Divine Country to go to battle, this glory in young generation of martial artist, must strive in any event!

“Snort, this is Yun Longtao known as under Void Tribulation Realm invincible? I looked that Great Yu Divine Country more and more will also boast!”

“Right, he absolutely is not the Senior Brother Zhao match!”What speech is Great Declaration Martial Mansion martial artist, should with that Zhao Tianji be fellow apprentices' relations.

However Great Yu Divine Country martial artist, rebutted with sarcasm, “a while Eldest Brother Longtao can everywhere look for the tooth that your any nonsense secret hit!”

“Your his mother said anything! Believes me everywhere to look for the tooth that you hit now?”

Here just began, above square actually quarrelled was fiery, appearance that especially martial artist in Starry Space Divine Country and Great Yu Divine Country, the popular feeling running highs, must begin shortly.

Luo Zheng only then shakes the head, on the face reveals the helpless smiling face, these martial artist have stepped into Void Tribulation Realm, is the mentality unexpectedly so not mature......

In comparison, Void Tribulation Realm martial artist in Central Region, as well as Battle Venerable in Sea God Continent, many that they are maturer.

However changes mind thinks, Luo Zheng can also understand, these Void Tribulation Realm martial artist grow in Martial Mansion, moreover they can follow Divine Country to come here, is the elite in elite, the age generally is not basically big.

In Void Tribulation Realm martial artist like Central Region, did not live majority of over hundred years old.

On Battle Venerable as for Sea God Continent, fully suffered in Tower of Evil informed and experienced, the disposition receives tempering that lives and dies, naturally cannot so naive testy.

This, is every year will probably perform one time, many Divine Sea Realm big energies above stair also looks but not see, turns over to quarrel noisyly, everybody's attention centralized in fight in midair.

What that Zhao Tianji cultivation is fire attribute cultivation technique . Moreover the strength of Fire Element Law as if also grasps arrived third layer, everywhere is containing pinnacle the strength of destruction in that flame.

Luo Zheng has sized up, the strength of this person is not indeed simple.

However that is called marquis Longtao/dragon waves martial artist, is stronger plans! Is was known as under seriously Void Tribulation Realm invincible, twists spaces on him unceasingly, is forcibly resisted all flame outside the body!

“Un? Using the strength of space, makes a piece by piece light space, treats as own armor?”The Luo Zheng's vision dodges, this should be the third layer space legal system, even if Luo Zheng does not have the opportunity to comprehend, four big Divine Country foundations are really solid!

===========================

===========================





#780 - Disturbance That Has No Interest In Causing


This Yun Longtao is not only skilled in Space Law, but also cultivation cultivation technique is also very unique, can actually the steric compression the light piece, cover before own.

Is equal to building an armor using the space for oneself!

In Void Tribulation Realm, most martial artist insufficient strength tearing spaces, so long as before is unable to break his body, these “space armor”is unable to injure to this person of slightest!

The Luo Zheng's vision glitters slightly, four big Divine Country legacy are really deep.

Although that Zhao Tianji offensive swift and fierce extremely, is under the suppression of marquis Longtao/dragon waves, does not have the spaces of too many displaying!

Only if Zhao Tianji itself has the tearing space strength, or he is skilled in Space Law, otherwise the offensive is swift and fierce, Fire Element Law is formidable, makes the inadequate injury to Yun Longtao.

“Perhaps this Zhao Tianji, must defeat,”Luo Zheng shakes the head to say.

Said has no interest, the listener has a mind.

Zhao Tianji in Starry Space Divine Country, enters the first steps steadily, is expert that in Great Declaration Martial Mansion ranks among the best, at this time ticket martial artist in Great Declaration Martial Mansion was staring in a big way the eye, anxious observing.

Suddenly hears martial artist in nearby Black Iron Divine Country to say this saying, that Great Declaration Martial Mansion martial artist does not do immediately.

“Although our Senior Brother Zhao must defeat! Do the boys, court death?”Several Void Tribulation Realm martial artist in Great Declaration Martial Mansion have turned head, fixes the eyes on the Luo Zheng anger to say.

“Senior Brother Zhao is my Great Declaration Martial Mansion gold crown first place! Also is one of my Starry Space Divine Country strongest six people, particularly you can speak!”

“Black Iron Divine Country, ahem, year after year ranks end, Jade Profound Martial Mansion is continually that black Martial Mansion was then inferior, the last stage in last stage, hears in their Jade Profound Martial Mansion strongest calling Zhan Yun, hehe, the boy pulls on shoes with our Great Declaration Martial Mansion does not match! Everybody pays attention to his words to do!”

Hears taunting of opposite party, Luo Zheng flipped the supercilious look, blames to talk too much, should not speak.

However Luo Zheng has not been angry, look is indifferent, although Divine Country legacy is formidable, but these martial artist with steady steps the flowers of growth in the greenhouse, the thoughts are eventually purer, Luo Zheng can understand them.

But Luo Zheng did not speak, wants to settle a quarrel and make peace with the parties involved, however Jade Profound Martial Mansion martial artist does not do!

“What did you say? Our Jade Profound Martial Mansion is the last stage! In a dog mouth spits anything randomly!”

“Looks at you fiercely, a while that Great Declaration Martial Mansion said our Senior Brother Zhan Yun comes up, does not make the excrement your Great Declaration Martial Mansion!”

“Ahem, is rich in Martial Mansion of court eunuch, dares to jump to speak!”

Under Jade Profound Martial Mansion martial artist counterattack, immediately made Great Declaration Martial Mansion get angry, the front words were good, last was rich in the court eunuch, but in poking in Great Declaration Martial Mansion many martial artist pains.

Martial Mansion that this Great Declaration Martial Mansion in Starry Space Divine Country indeed is listed first.

However Martial Mansion forms under the support of Divine Country generally, most Martial Mansion have these Battle Sovereign Battle Emperor to found, however Great Declaration Martial Mansion was formed by one group of court eunuches long ago, in the court eunuch also had expert!

Actually court eunuch cultivation, had the inborn superiority, because after castration, the court eunuch can defend stubbornly Yang Yuan, merit Law of some cultivation Pure Yang classes are twice the result with half the effort, court eunuches in four big Divine Country, many Divine Sea Realm big energies.

This Great Declaration Martial Mansion is not only formed by the court eunuch, in this Martial Mansion also really left several Divine Sea Realm big energies, but also is the court eunuch......

Therefore four big Divine Country martial artist call court eunuch Martial Mansion Great Declaration Martial Mansion in secret!

Although experiences these many years development, Great Declaration Martial Mansion cannot elute this given name as before, in other Divine Country said in secret, if by the Great Declaration Martial Mansion martial artist hear, must unavoidably fight.

Let alone is martial artist in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, satirizes face to face?

That side Great Declaration Martial Mansion martial artist is the blushing neck is thick, revolves true essence, must begin shortly.

Jade Profound Martial Mansion does not pass on responsibilities, is Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, is the talents in Divine Country, is the full of vigor age, where will exercise forbearance?

At this time, together the dignified imposing manner immediately covered!

Actually is Divine Sea Realm greatly can cover, wants to subside here tumult.

Divine Sea Realm can greatly is the imposing manner how formidable? That imposing manner coagulates just like the entity generally, pressure stubbornly on many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, Jade Profound Martial Mansion and Great Declaration Martial Mansion martial artist, felt immediately a mountain presses in own top of the head.

Even if Zhan Yun in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, has turned very quiet, felt that own hands and feet is stiff, is hard to move.

Only the Luo Zheng vision is indifferent, on the face is hanging the light happy expression, looked at a distant place that Divine Sea Realm big energy.

This Divine Sea Realm can suppress greatly own imposing manner, in discovery these Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, actually the person slightly had not been affected suddenly, is slightly one startled, this Divine Sea Realm can size up Luo Zheng greatly curiously, this imposing manner reclamation slowly.

In the heart is actually strange, in this Jade Profound Martial Mansion presented this kind of character? Can't suppress including my imposing manner?

Divine Sea Realm can greatly the soul, cultivation arrived at Battle Soul Realm basically, originally under this pressure, Great Declaration Martial Mansion and Jade Profound Martial Mansion martial artist should unable to move, although the boy has not moved, but this Divine Sea Realm can feel greatly obviously, he has not come under the influence of oneself pressure!

Did Void Tribulation Realm have the Battle Soul Realm soul? This is impossible, only if this boy has magical treasure of resistance soul pressure......

But can resist Divine Sea Realm to be able greatly magical treasure of soul pressure, even if Black Iron Divine Country Crown Prince also not necessarily has?

That Divine Sea Realm can in greatly the heart strange, but has not said that he is responsible for maintaining the order in square, but Jade Profound Martial Mansion belongs to Black Iron Divine Country, if he asked harebrainedly, perhaps caused Black Iron Divine Country Country Lord Zhou Huang was unhappy.

Therefore he also slightly pays attention to Luo Zheng, has not spoken.

After this makes noise was subsided, the above fight decided the victory and defeat.

Like such that Luo Zheng said that that Zhao Tianji offensive was indeed swift and fierce, was perhaps difficult to seek the match in Void Tribulation Realm, the issue is the present four big Divine Country young generation of talents gets together, everybody had the method of respective pressure bottom, he cannot break through Yun Longtao actually “space armor”was defeated finally.

“Bang!”

Zhao Tianji falls from the upper air, knelt on the ground directly, the whole face dispirited said to Heavenly Fate Country Lord above stair: “Country Lord, I defeated!”

Heavenly Fate Country Lord smiles lightly, then said: “Please get up! The victory or defeat is military commander routine matter! The young animals do not need to be concerned!”

Although Country Lord is comforting itself, but can look, that Zhao Tianji is as before depressed, after all he goes to battle on behalf of Starry Space Divine Country, at this time he represented was not oneself, but was Great Declaration Martial Mansion, but was entire Starry Space Divine Country!

All Starry Space Divine Country martial artist, the complexion is not quite attractive, many martial artist are eager to try, wants to jump to challenge Yun Longtao.

After all Starry Space Divine Country also has several other Martial Mansion besides Great Declaration Martial Mansion, the strengths of some people are not weaker in Zhao Tianji.

Yun Longtao crosses the hands behind the back to stand, floats in the midair, the whole face arrogant color, is taking a fast look around Void Tribulation Realm martial artist in square, he is waiting for the challenges of other people.

Since Yun Longtao dares to proclaim under Void Tribulation Realm invincible, he has to oneself strength fully self-confident!

“On me! My Li Yulong must challenge you!”

“On me, I......”

“First makes me deal with this fellow!”

What is most excited is Starry Space Divine Country martial artist, they had just defeated a weaponry, at this time actually hurriedly proves itself.

However that incisive sound has made a sound, “defers to the rule, the challenge comes in turn, is one's turn the martial artist challenge of Heavenly Wind Divine Country and Black Iron Divine Country!”

Swallow King and Crown Prince are the vision sparkle.

This challenge inspects the Divine Country young generation of martial artist strength, although Swallow King and Crown Prince have the qualifications to go to battle, but they are the Divine Country emperor's clan, the blood relationship is noble, in the ordinary circumstances cannot participate in the fight of this level.

However they cannot participate, has the suggestion power! For example Crown Prince can order Zhan Yun and Xiao Daoyuan goes to battle for him!

Although Swallow King also has own troops, is only entitled, has the strength to only have Luo Zheng that he goes to battle!

Swallow King in hesitant, is Luo Zheng willing?

In Swallow King hesitates, above square erupted the quarrel.

Because Zhao Tianji defeats, in many martial artist hearts in Great Declaration Martial Mansion is not feeling well, at this time had not been one's turn the Starry Space Divine Country challenge, in many martial artist hearts a stuffy nowhere vented, has actually aimed at Jade Profound Martial Mansion the goal.

“Your isn't Jade Profound Martial Mansion very fierce? Has the courage to come up to try?”

“That Zhan Yun, Jade Profound Martial Mansion first does expert, reveal two to have a look? Perhaps same everywhere will look for the tooth that Yun Longtao hits!”

“Perhaps Jade Profound Martial Mansion will unable to withstand!”

This Great Declaration Martial Mansion martial artist is in a tumult once more, Zhan Yun vision and Crown Prince relative, on the face of Crown Prince reveals light small, immediately the hand-held wheelchair said: “Zhan Yun, you represent me to go to battle!”

Zhan Yun is Crown Prince these words, under the nod, changed into stream of light toward airborne to fly to shoot on!

At this time Jade Profound Martial Mansion many martial artist were also seethes with excitement.

“Senior Brother Zhan Yun, come on!”

“Zhan Yun, the boy only will resist using Space Law, must fight a battle to force a quick decision!”

“Our Jade Profound Martial Mansion cannot make others think of as worthless!”

This atmosphere is suddenly warm, but after the Zhan Yun diving posture comes up, from behind has pulled suddenly out a blade, is generous the knife of blade, the back is common just like wolf's tooth, is glittering the light blue light.

“Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, can provide middle grade saint item...... Actually does not know whether this Divine Country Continent has divine item to exist,”in the Luo Zheng heart guessed.

Gives the devil his due, result that the Luo Zheng contrast fights does not pay attention very much, he was not born in Jade Profound Martial Mansion, is not a Black Iron Divine Country people, he comes in Divine Country to shoulder is saving the Ning Yudie mission, is only for the following traveling schedule, he must seize this opportunity to observe and emulate a present fight well.

In addition, in his heart somewhat worried, since this Crown Prince can assign the person to represent Zhan Yun to go to battle, difficult insurance a while Swallow King to look for itself?

Luo Zheng does not fear in the fight, but, if enters the stage, definitely will bring to the saintess attention of that Great Yu Divine Country, can this not know what to do?

( Happy Spring Festival!!! Lunar New Year's Eve does not have the time to look that party ^ _ ^ do not scold me...... Before 12 points, the 6 k character, will restore ten thousand/myriad Zigeng ^ _ ^ on the 20 th)





#781 - Space Cutting Sword


martial artist sets up the world, struggles with the person, struggles with the place, with day struggle.

Luo Zheng does not fear others' challenge, does not fear to challenge other people.

On the contrary, competes with the world talent, can be walked on the martial arts by oneself.

If not the Ning Yudie reason, Luo Zheng will step similarly also Divine Country Continent, challenges many talents on Divine Country Continent!

But now the Luo Zheng matter of primary importance, collects Life Origin Stone, other troubles he is not willing excessively to provoke, if let alone that Divine Country saintess discovered after oneself, perhaps also meets many awkwardly, will bring in Great Yu Divine Country Divine Sea Realm to be able directly greatly attack.

In order to safety, Luo Zheng after entering Divine Country Continent has chosen the low key conduct.

Evolves along with this situation, some people from will push eventually secretly Luo Zheng, he gazed at Swallow King above stair quietly, in the heart sighed, looks expression that Swallow King was eager to try, perhaps oneself could not escape.

Luo Zheng's guessed that is correct.

Swallow King is the same with Crown Prince, wants to prove itself in front of Zhou Huang, they must prove is not only own strength, own talent.

Crown Prince can make Xiao Daoyuan and Zhan Yun such character, his Swallow King?

Why this is also Swallow King must favor the Luo Zheng's reason, to win over Luo Zheng, his condescending wind is even expensive, and Luo Zheng are treated equally, opens heart to Luo Zheng confidently, tells the Luo Zheng present predicament, because Swallow King also knows, Luo Zheng this grade of character, the common thing also is very difficult to move, his only means sincerely treat.

Moreover Swallow King believes that own vision, the Luo Zheng's strength is worth him so intersecting!

Therefore at this time Swallow King pondered is not Luo Zheng whether went to battle, but when goes to battle is good.

Fight expansion on sky like a raging fire, Zhan Yun is in Jade Profound Martial Mansion Void Tribulation Realm first expert, the offensive also wants the formidable three points compared with Zhao Tianji worthily!

Especially in his hand that middle grade divine item, every time cuts to kill, can “space armor”above stay behind together the light trace in Yun Longtao that sets, although is unable to cut to break to pieces that space armor, but all people actually look clearly.

These traces are increasing unceasingly, and is deepening, if accumulates to certain situation, believes that this space armor will collapse eventually.

“My blade, is called dragon Ya, is builds with a tooth of True Dragon, resisting constantly, on you set of tortoise shell, will be cut by me useless eventually broken! Only knows martial artist that flinches, will defeat eventually!”Zhan Yun sneers, the personal appearance such as the wind is common, changes into the escaping light to charge into Yun Longtao instantaneously together.

“Defeats to me!”

“Dang!”

Zhan Yun together cut to strike, falls above the Yun Longtao space armor.

In sabre intent that this Zhan Yun has, contains to break the world myriad things the imposing manner, many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist looks, is the eyelid jumps.

Luo Zheng slight bow, the attack of this Zhan Yun is very indeed sharp, if Yun Longtao so has resisted, will be broken that space armor by Zhan Yun eventually.

What a pity insufficient...... Luo Zheng sighed slightly.

This Yun Longtao from beginning to end, resists using the space armor, the strength of this person should not only so! Zhan Yun could not perhaps have beaten this match.

If Zhan Yun can defeat Yun Longtao, regarding Luo Zheng should be a good deed, after all Swallow King should not be challenged Zhan Yun by oneself, perhaps same Divine Country martial artist, Luo Zheng challenged Zhan Yun to undermine.

However, even if Zhan Yun can defeat Yun Longtao, in four big Divine Country also has other martial artist to defeat Zhan Yun, when the time comes Luo Zheng unavoidably goes to battle.

The Luo Zheng's expectation is quite reasonable!

Before this Zhan Yun depends upon swift and fierce blade technique, presses Yun Longtao to kill, if makes Zhan Yun so kill, perhaps Yun Longtao really defeated.

But after Yun Longtao suffers to cut to kill that blade, unexpectedly on own initiative remove space armor.

He looked at Zhan Yun lightly, on the face has revealed look that despised, immediately put out a hand to summon, the little ray was similar to the firefly is common, gathered regarding his arm.

“buzz buzz......”

That hand surrounding space is vibrating gently, exudes a slight buzzing sound.

Quick has together dim long sword, appears in his hands.

This is a sword, rather this is one has the space of long sword shape shape!

Does this person, take the weapon by the space unexpectedly?

“Cloud Senior Brother Space Cutting Sword! Hehe, the climax came!”

“This Zhan Yun can compel the cloud Senior Brother unique skill, made him proud sufficiently!”

“Cloud fellow apprentice's Space Cutting Sword take action, breaks the person body inevitably, this Zhan Yun was perhaps miserable!”

Hears below discussion sound, how the Zhan Yun not clear this Space Cutting Sword fierce place? However his vision has been full of the firm and resolute color as before, he from obscure martial artist, stands in the Jade Profound Martial Mansion young generation of peak, has paid innumerable diligently and sweat.

Can obtain the acknowledgment of Crown Prince, is Crown Prince goes to battle, is the Zhan Yun at least unsurpassed glory, at this time he was impossible to flinch.

“Listens to arrived?”Yun Longtao light asking: “Space Cutting Sword take action, breaks the person body inevitably, leaves behind your hand, get lost/rolls!”

“bang!”

Above the stair, Crown Prince has a heavy touch heavy whipping on the arm rest of wheelchair, the arm rest of this wheelchair also makes with the ironwood, but under this pats, whole set wheelchair changes into the powder powder immediately, scatters place. But Crown Prince, is maintaining the sitting posture, floats in the midair.

A nearby court eunuch sees that quick takes out another wheelchair, placing cautiously under the body of Crown Prince, “this Yun Longtao, was too dissolute!”After Crown Prince said that arrival gently above wheelchair.

Four big Divine Country Country Lord note his action, but shows a faint smile, the matter of later generations, the nature is solved by the later generations, in their these elder ordinary circumstances will not intervene.

Above the platform in this stair peak, may continue Black Iron Divine Country Crown Prince, Great Yu Divine Country Crown Prince similarly also, Great Yu Divine Country Crown Prince has not spoken, instead is Great Yu Divine Country saintess chuckle one, “Elder Brother Zhou Ning, is this angry?”

Black Iron Divine Country is the Zhou world, the Crown Prince full name is Zhou Ning.

Zhou Ning cold snort/hum one, is actually disinclined to pay attention to that Great Yu Divine Country saintess, the vision such as the blade is staring at the fight in midair generally.

At this time in the Swallow King heart was quite comfortable, although Zhan Yun went to battle on behalf of Black Iron Divine Country, may eventually not be his Swallow King person, moreover this Zhan Yun was Zhou Ning invited, was oneself goes to battle on behalf of Zhou Ning, defeats was good!

Best is that Xiao Daoyuan a while also defeats, at this time Luo Zheng went on stage, can manifest his Swallow King vision, in the Swallow King heart actually so wants to say.

Actually Swallow King has not experienced the Luo Zheng true strength, but he actually trusts Luo Zheng!

After that Yun Longtao offers a sacrifice to Space Cutting Sword, rapid attacks three swords toward Zhan Yun!

That Space Cutting Sword nearly in transparent, if carefully did not look, even cannot see this thing the true body, can only through the spatial warping ray, be able to identify the shape of this sword indistinctly!

“Dang!”

This Space Cutting Sword first sword cuts, then cut fissures the dragon tooth in Zhan Yun hand.

“Dang!”

The second sword cuts to kill, directly the smashing that the dragon tooth of Zhan Yun cuts!

“Dang!”

The third sword is easy has delimited in the Zhan Yun shoulder place, explodes along with a blood, the arm of Zhan Yun without consulting anybody falls from the midair.

Good swift and fierce three swords!

The Luo Zheng's eyebrow selects, this match is not indeed simple!

“Was too fierce! In Void Tribulation Realm invincible, worthily is in Void Tribulation Realm invincible!”

“This Space Cutting Sword almost destroys the hardest defenses, middle grade saint item is unable to resist, just like chopping the melon cuts the dish to be ordinary, does not know that also who dares to come up the challenge?”

“Our Senior Brother Longtao/dragon waves is invincible existence! Hahaha!”

This is only the ratio fights, is fastidious a point, after all behind everybody must explore the mystical place, the arm of that Yun Longtao cut off, was he loses!

Zhan Yun clenches teeth, only then has drawn back, picked own arm.

martial artist breaks the arm, can meet actually, perhaps but these months his arm is unable to convalesce, explores the mystical place also to have very tremendous influence to him, but the technique was inferior that under the person Zhan Yun does not have what good complaint.

That Yun Longtao bows in salute toward Great Yu Battle Emperor, on Great Yu Battle Emperor that gloomy face then has revealed some happy expressions, “good! Yun Longtao! My Great Yu Divine Country from, when seals to enjoy you well!”

“Many thanks Country Lord, my Yun Longtao is only Great Yu Divine Country fights, did not ask to seal/confer Shang!”After saying, he turns the head to continue light saying facing the square: “Does which want to challenge me?”

On face of Crown Prince Zhou Ning, gloomy can drop the water leakage to come, at this time was saying of coldly: “Xiao Daoyuan, on you!”

Zhou Ning has a mind to manifest suddenly, but this Yun Longtao is not his Black Iron Divine Country person, but is Great Yu Divine Country martial artist, at this time Crown Prince Zhou Ning also can only hoping to pin on Xiao Daoyuan, if Xiao Daoyuan defeats on Yun Longtao, he did not have what sign to hit.

“According to the rule, only permits Heavenly Wind Divine Country and Starry Space Divine Country challenge now!”

Each Divine Country cannot challenge continually, under the Zhou Ning anger has actually forgotten this custom.

On the contrary is Zhou Huang light said to Zhou Ning: “Ning'er, not must be irritable, lets the joke that other people look.”

Not far away Great Yu Battle Emperor smiles, “right that Brother Zhou Huang said that something, are anxiously!”

Zhou Huang is coldly shot a look at Great Yu Battle Emperor one, these year of Great Yu Divine Country are very indeed strong, but four big Divine Country each other depend on each other, restricts mutually, the geomancy transfers in turn, tomorrow my family, this Great Yu Battle Emperor temper gloomy and cold, but also especially likes the dai Chinese zither!

In several Country Lord surfaces does not regard as important the victory and loss, several Void Tribulation Realm martial artist victories and losses, do not mean anything, actually everybody in secret is competing!

At this time Starry Space Divine Country Heavenly Fate Country Lord said: “Zhuo'er, what candidate you have to recommend?”

Starry Space Divine Country has defeated one round in the Yun Longtao hand, is the worried retrieving gathering place, Heavenly Fate Country Lord are not good to recommend the candidate, naturally asked own son.

Zhuo'er in his mouth, is Starry Space Divine Country Crown Prince, under that Crown Prince vision flashes, this opens the mouth saying: “Yue Congyun! You go to battle for me!”

( Had finished, we also listened to strike a gong ^ _ ^, thanked reading is always profitable 5000 to read the coin to hit to enjoy, thanked to encourage! The mentality is steadier! Understands how should do! Happy New Year!)





#782 - Four Swords


In Starry Space Divine Country, can be the talent of first steps altogether has six people.

Previous Zhao Tianji had been defeated, the person but who can meet in addition are many, moreover these six people have not been counted Starry Space Divine Country emperor's clan people, for example Starry Space Divine Country the Crown Prince, can steady is in the first steps.

In comparison, Black Iron Divine Country that Luo Zheng is at somewhat is indeed poor, if removes Swallow King and Crown Prince Zhou Ning, can stand steadily the first steps also only then Zhan Yun and Xiao Daoyuan two, moreover Zhan Yun had been defeated, calculates can go to battle also only has Xiao Daoyuan one person.

Naturally, this is other Divine Country so believes, Luo Zheng besides showed one's skill during the inspection of Jade Profound Martial Mansion, excessively has not shown own strength, other three big Divine Country people do not know that Black Iron Divine Country has this kind of character to exist.

Under the order of Starry Space Divine Country Crown Prince, that was called Yue Congyun martial artist naturally to go to battle.

Starry Space Divine Country Zhao Tianji has defeated in the Yun Longtao hand, if Yue Congyun defeats once more, is equal to defeating continuously to Yun Longtao.

Let alone Zhao Tianji is the candidate of Starry Space Divine Country Crown Prince recommendation, the words that suffers defeat once more perhaps, the Starry Space Divine Country face did not have the place to put.

However Starry Space Divine Country martial artist, as if very much trust to the Yue Congyun strength, after Yue Congyun rushes to barrier in sky, Starry Space Divine Country martial artist seethed with excitement again.

And Great Declaration Martial Mansion martial artist are most excited, although Yue Congyun does not stem from Great Declaration Martial Mansion, but is in Starry Space Divine Country other Martial Mansion, but Yue Congyun was placed the great expectations after all, if can defeat Yun Longtao, was helps Great Declaration Martial Mansion save the face.

“cluster cloud, so long as avoided his point to be OK, the fellow also depended on that the broken sword!”

“Right, careful should not be cut by his sword, at your speed, can certainly achieve!”

Yue Congyun obviously by speed win martial artist, his silently many nods toward, immediately faces Yun Longtao has made one “please”the hand signal.

Since Yun Longtao has offered a sacrifice to Space Cutting Sword, truth that has not received decidedly, he actually stretches out three fingers toward Yue Congyun, “three swords, cope with you also only to need three swords similarly!”

“Was too wild! Yun Longtao, has the skill you to get down, looked that we do not pound the meat sauce you!”

“Yue Congyun, avoids his first three swords first! A while he is unable to win, I thought that he is how rampant, looked how he hits oneself face!”

Starry Space Divine Country many martial artist had been full of the anger to Yun Longtao, hears this saying, immediately is similar to aggravates the situation!

Yun Longtao where will pay attention to the provocation of following these martial artist, although Void Tribulation Realm martial artist quantities in four big Divine Country are numerous, moreover today martial artist, is first basically, martial artist of second steps, the major part has Divine Rank Talent, but sky over can fly, participates is about 20-30 people that the ratio fights!

Below these people, Yun Longtao has not placed in the eye.

Many Divine Sea Realm big energies above stair, in noise to square turn a deaf ear, in their opinion, the atmosphere warm point is the good deed, the slapping in the face weaponry does not have the issue, so long as does not hit on the line, therefore has not stopped these martial artist.

In this loud noise, Yun Longtao this time is first take action!

As soon as he wields Space Cutting Sword, takes one step to pass through the space without consulting anybody, draws close to the Yue Congyun side, in the hand that transparent long sword the overhead has cut to Yue Congyun!

The crossing over space of short distance, this move of Luo Zheng uses actually frequently, can indeed play the unexpected effect, the opposite party is very difficult to respond.

Yue Congyun also had a scare, actually Yue Congyun lost self-confidently facing Yun Longtao, his strength and Zhao Tianji are similar, four big Divine Country will frequently also hold the ratio to fight, he and Zhao Tianji, although stems from different Martial Mansion, but two people have the record that fought several times, the number of times that two people flickering victory and defeat, Zhao Tianji wins is slightly are more.

Zhao Tianji defeated in the Yun Longtao hand, he did not have that to defeat Yun Longtao self-confidently, was only under the order of Crown Prince, he has to!

If the martial artist strength is about the same, spells is the one breath, once lost self-confidently, lost the imposing manner, loses 100 percent.

Let alone the hearing below Starry Space Divine Country martial artist words, in his heart also had the consideration, since this Yun Longtao talked big, three swords must be defeated oneself, then he evades his three swords!

Therefore facing the Yun Longtao first sword, he simply has not chosen the counter-attack, has chosen directly escaping!

“Whiz!”

Yue Congyun excelled at Body Maneuver Technique, the Yun Longtao first sword has stained his clothes robe, the corner/horn incision of his clothes robe.

That ghosts and demons common form rotates high-speed in barrier, intention is obvious, to avoid Yun Longtao Space Cutting Sword!

Sees this, Luo Zheng cannot bear shakes the head slightly, the so-called coming face to face with an adversary formidable victory, does not have including the upfront relative courage, how to gain the victory? This fellow counted on after Yun Longtao three swords, lets off him? This rather extremely in naive.

Three swords that Yun Longtao said that but to show off own strength, simultaneously gives the Yue Congyun pressure, let alone he has not said that three swords cannot take Yue Congyun to lose.

“Whiz......”

Although the Yue Congyun speed is extremely fast, the status is also quite strange, but is skilled in Space Law Yun Longtao only to need to tread one step, can draw close to Yue Congyun instantaneously, immediately uses the sword suddenly.

That said that Space Cutting Sword just like a poisonous snake of not being able to see, swallows to go toward Yue Congyun.

On the Yue Congyun face is also the whole face panic-stricken color, almost puts forth the skills, at the airborne stiff transition, this sword wipes following his neck, immediately cut to break to pieces the larger part his hair!

Although Yue Congyun seems very distressed, but on the face actually reveals the smiling face, at least he succeeds has avoided the Yun Longtao second sword.

“The second sword!”

“A sword, avoided the sword to be OK last!”

“cluster Yunxiong, come on!”

Starry Space Divine Country martial artist roared immediately, they also saw the Yue Congyun intention, first avoided the Yun Longtao three swords to say again!

Above the stand of stair peak, continuously Crown Prince in silent Heavenly Wind Divine Country, icy said toward these martial artist: “One group of idiots!”

The views and are Luo Zheng of many person same, how avoid the Yun Longtao three swords?

Quick, Yun Longtao cut the third sword......

This time, that Space Cutting Sword has delimited from the back of Yue Congyun directly, after Yue Congyun, the clothes robe that carries on the back has cut open a huge opening! However Yue Congyun by own speed advantage, sways from side to side under the body actually, escaped, until now, he has not been injured.

“Three swords! Three swords!”On the Yue Congyun face reveals the happy expression, has turned head to laugh saying that what as if at this moment wins is he is ordinary.

However the Yue Congyun voice has not fallen, Space Cutting Sword is once more closely associated, presented straight thread in his side strangely, Space Cutting Sword has delimited quietly, immediately that thread vanishes, the arm of Yue Congyun has separated with the body, falls down toward the ground without consulting anybody.

At this moment Yue Congyun has even forgotten the ache, the whole face scowl stares at Yun Longtao saying: “Haven't three swords, reached an agreement three swords?”

“motherfucker, this Yun Longtao does not obey the custom, reaching an agreement is only three swords divides the victory and defeat!”

“Was too mean! This person should suicide to apologize!”

In Starry Space Divine Country many martial artist, is the anger of being filled with righteous indignation said.

The smiling face on the Yun Longtao face actually revealing pitying, immediately saying gently: “Your ear, heard me saying that three swords did divide the victory and defeat? I said that three swords take you! Since three swords have not taken you, I use the fourth sword, what's wrong? Not?”

This world always only then the share of expert view, Yun Longtao said three swords actually, was actually equal to formulating some rule, but this rule was his Yun Longtao formulation, he wants to change to change, how did you refuse to accept?

His saying, had food stuck in the throat many martial artist in Starry Space Divine Country immediately......

Yun Longtao turned head to sweep Starry Space Divine Country martial artist immediately, light saying: “You, were too weak! Except that shouted in confusion below, but also was useful? Some skills challenge me!”

“Snort, who said very strongly are probably same! You are also Void Tribulation Realm later stage!”In Starry Space Divine Country some people are not convinced, only then so returns to choke to say.

Yun Longtao actually shook the head, to continue saying: “It is not I am very strong, actually I am very weak, in this world, most martial artist waste like you! My talent is higher than you, is also diligently little than you, but called the king before you sufficiently.”

Yun Longtao this saying said that the people were silent immediately a while, at this time Great Yu Battle Emperor clapped suddenly, “good! Longtao/dragon waves, said well!”

Four big Divine Country can a dragon vein clan extermination of the clan, what dependence is the help of upper realm human race.

Initially upper realm human race to help four big Divine Country, opened a counter spirit channel forcefully, to aid that four big Divine Country carried on.

The history remembers that firmly, four big Divine Country martial artist like Central Region like that almost did not know about upper realm, in the Central Region trillion martial artist minds, upper realm is only a fuzzy concept, is regarding four big Divine Country martial artist, really has actually witnessed the upper realm martial artist strength and superiority.

Although Yun Longtao these words have not mentioned by name upper realm martial artist, but where many Void Tribulation Realm can't martial artist understand?

His pride shows in view of four big Divine Country all martial artist, but his modesty, then in view of upper realm, only then aims at the talent in upper realm, he is a weak one.

These words, said in many Divine Sea Realm has been able greatly in pit of the stomach.

These lived ten thousand years of old monsters, in the heart is flooding a huge regret, that is unable to fly upwards upper realm.

In four big Divine Country, they can indeed lord it over, is the pursue of martial artist, how possibly to limit above this Continent? How can limit above Divine Sea Realm this level?

Therefore many Divine Sea Realm can living greatly for ten thousand years later, in abundance leaves Divine Country Continent, goes to the endless mysterious sea area to look for more opportunities, even wants to break this, enters in other Great Thousand World......

Until now, in addition does not have Divine Sea Realm to succeed greatly.

===========================

===========================





#783 - Non-Solution


Even if obtains the appreciation of Great Yu Battle Emperor, Yun Longtao also shows a faint smile, afterward continues saying: “Also who can challenge me?”

Since Yun Longtao offers a sacrifice to Space Cutting Sword, connected two people then to cut off the arm by him, excited Void Tribulation Realm martial artist, were silent immediately.

Said not actually these martial artist lack self-confidently, four big Divine Country can stand martial artist of first steps, which isn't the outstanding person in Martial Mansion? If to the absolute self-confidence, is unable to stand the first steps.

However the Yun Longtao point was too abundant, this makes the first steps the talents hesitant.

If there is won fortunately, but lost accidentally?

Then everybody must set out to Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, the arm is cut off, although is not the major problem, but is impossible to restore to the most flourishing condition in a short time, will have not the small influence to the Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea traveling schedule.

At present this ratio fights, initial time is to enter one before Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea adds to the fun, is only after many years of evolution, slowly turned has inspected four big Divine Country youth disciple strengths the ratios to fight.

Even so, with exploring compared with the mystical place in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, is unimportant.

Therefore the talents of many first steps backed down......

They are not clear, these emperor's clans on stair, faintly has actually fought true fire, several Divine Sea Realm can greatly, although has not spoken, but eventually feels not to be feeling well to Great Yu Battle Emperor and Yun Longtao.

Starry Space Divine Country is defeated once more, was one's turn Heavenly Wind Divine Country and Black Iron Divine Country.

Heavenly Wind Divine Country Heavenly Wind Battle Sovereign has not spoken as before, including the Heavenly Wind Battle Sovereign behind Crown Prince imperial princes.

But the Black Iron Divine Country Country Lord Zhou Huang vision dodges slightly, has swept Swallow King and Crown Prince Zhou Ning, Zhou Huang has not spoken, but the vision showed all.

In the Swallow King heart a heat, just prepared to open the mouth, he wants to recommend Luo Zheng to enter the stage, Zhou Ning has actually forestalled one step, the clear and resonant voice said: “Xiao Daoyuan, goes to battle for me!”

Hears the Zhou Ning words, the vision coldly glance of Swallow King, has not spoken.

Since the elder brother must draw a city, makes you go first, Xiao Daoyuan is also your last board game piece, if this Xiao Daoyuan also lost, even was cut off the arm, perhaps was very much has attacked to your team, the effect of exploration mystical place greatly will definitely fall short, I anticipated actually very much, after Xiao Daoyuan lost, did you plan to go forth to battle personally? Swallow King so wants to say in the heart.

Zhou Ning indeed is somewhat anxious, Xiao Daoyuan and Zhan Yun are the subordinates who he settles on, he wants to prove itself in front of Zhou Huang, showed that his vision and technique of controlling person, Zhan Yun does not make every effort to succeed, so with ease was defeated!

He can only hoping to pin on Xiao Daoyuan.

Black Martial Mansion is in Black Iron Divine Country biggest Martial Mansion, although with Jade Profound Martial Mansion with is the sixth grade influence, but Jade Profound Martial Mansion can only occupy second, but Xiao Daoyuan is most expert in black Martial Mansion, under this enters the stage, not only has had the Crown Prince great expectations, has had the Black Iron Divine Country many martial artist great expectations!

Hears the Crown Prince words, Xiao Daoyuan jumps to jump, cups one hand in the other across the chest toward Crown Prince and Black Iron Divine Country Country Lord arch, then took out a spear/gun from sumeru ring.

“high grade saint item......”

“motherfucker, Black Iron Divine Country martial artist is this, Void Tribulation Realm martial artist can have high grade saint item, simply is......”

“Does not have the means that Black Iron Divine Country is rich in refiner master, in our four big Divine Country has majority of saint item, from Black Iron Divine Country, this is rich in Pill Refining Master with Heavenly Wind Divine Country, Great Yu Divine Country is rich in Rune Master is the same truth!”

Black Iron Divine Country the technique of refining item is indeed most famous, what is more important, Xiao Daoyuan Xiao Family is refining item Aristocratic Family, but even so, high grade saint item as before is very rare existence, ordinary time, Xiao Daoyuan will not provide a high grade saint item rank long spear.

However these time explores the mystical place in Heavenly Feather Sacred Sea, is enormous regarding the future influence of Xiao Daoyuan, therefore Xiao Family rationed Xiao Daoyuan high grade saint item.

“bang!”

What is unexpected, this high grade saint item spear's/gun's body is quite as if pliable but hard to break, under Xiao Daoyuan makes an effort to shake, is similar to a whip is unexpectedly ordinary, numerous brushing above the air, erupt together the deafening blasting.

The Xiao Daoyuan vision is cold, stubbornly is staring at present Yun Longtao.

This time, Yun Longtao actually stretched out a palm of the hand toward Xiao Daoyuan, “five swords, defeat you only to need five swords.”

Xiao Daoyuan is actually cold snort/hum one, “puts down your set, too department of pediatrics, no matter a sword, is five swords, or is 50 swords, the victory and defeat is the victory and defeat!”

Hears the Xiao Daoyuan words, on the Yun Longtao face reveals the smiling face, “this time match is good, evidently, I should be earnest!”

“What is earnest? Before this doesn't Yun Longtao have fully?”

“I do not believe, this person is good to install to compel!”

“Yun Longtao defeated Zhan Yun to use three swords, defeated Yue Congyun to use four swords, perhaps he has not used really fully......”

Now besides Great Yu Divine Country martial artist, other three big Divine Country martial artist it can be said that shared a common hatred now, this Yun Longtao was too crazy, he also has the extremely arrogant qualification, his strength is also immeasurably deep, comes up these many people, but also nobody can probe his depth.

These time was Yun Longtao launched the attack as before, his form like the shuttle, the wearing out space, in the hand that fatal Space Cutting Sword wielded once more.

Xiao Daoyuan cold snort/hum, long spear in hand is similar to a snake is unexpectedly ordinary, plate.

The Yun Longtao Space Cutting Sword speed is extremely quick, however after the Xiao Daoyuan long spear plate gets up, immediately shakes the rope to exit, is if quickly lightning, after unexpectedly, sends first to!

Not only so, that long spear lance point in the thorn to the Yun Longtao instance, unexpectedly a encirclement, after that soft tall and slender rifle stock directly Space Cutting Sword has circled, the lance point is unprecedented, thorn to Yun Longtao face!

Was equal to that Xiao Daoyuan this spear/gun, not only has sealed up Yun Longtao Space Cutting Sword, but must strike to assassinate Yun Longtao.

Yun Longtao Space Cutting Sword is indeed sharp, even if general saint item, could not resist under this Space Cutting Sword several, but Xiao Daoyuan long spear after all was high grade saint item, let alone that rifle stock was pliable but hard to break, so under the winding, Space Cutting Sword actually did not cut off the long spear rifle stock.

“Whiz!”

The long spear lance point just like a snake head of venomous tongue, the nail to Yun Longtao face, sees only the head of Yun Longtao slightly one, the lance point touches and goes from his ear directly.

However that lance point just like having own consciousness is common, cannot hit, under twists once more, unexpectedly turns head to puncture toward the back of the head of Yun Longtao!

At this time on the Yun Longtao face revealed the light smiling face, gripped the hand of Space Cutting Sword to loosen, the whole person sank suddenly, at the same time, then also vanished using Space Cutting Sword of space manufacturing, this Space Cutting Sword was Yun Longtao congealed using the space, even if vanished he also to be able shortly to congeal.

Under Xiao Daoyuan strikes, Yun Longtao that compels unexpectedly gives up own weapon, simultaneously chooses to retrocede......

Has saying that best result that this also until now obtains.

Black iron Martial Mansion many martial artist relaxed immediately, perhaps in their hearts, the young generation in Black Iron Divine Country, had not counted on that defeated Yun Longtao, Yun Longtao retreat that so compelled, saves some faces.

But Zhou Ning and in the Zhou Huang heart actually does not think.

Solemn Black Iron Divine Country, suddenly cannot discover the person to resist Yun Longtao, this is the reality that they could not accept absolutely.

Although Black Iron Divine Country these years slightly are emaciated, but are insufficient to this situation weakly!

The Zhou Ning vision is cloudy, in the heart has been calculating, if Xiao Daoyuan has defeated, perhaps oneself must go on stage to kill this Yun Longtao spirit! He as Black Iron Divine Country Crown Prince, has the duty to defend the Black Iron Divine Country dignity!

Although he by the Crown Prince status, goes to battle personally, unavoidably somewhat loses face, but could not give a thought to these many at this time.

Yun Longtao downward sinks, personal appearance after shrinks, came the distance with Xiao Daoyuan, under waves, Space Cutting Sword appears again in his hands.

“Good, is indeed good, makes me in more earnest sufficiently!”Yun Longtao transparent Space Cutting Sword will point to Xiao Daoyuan.

“Idle talk are really many!”Xiao Daoyuan is grasping long spear, another hand stretches out two fingers, according to above the long spear spear's/gun's body, along with shaking that hand of long spear is making an effort to pull, this long spear is ordinary just like the line tape of tailor, had been delimited by his two fingers.

“Hissing......”

After the Xiao Daoyuan two fingers have delimited, then putting in order long spear lightens, that long spear as if had Spiritual Nature to be ordinary, changed into a snake completely, wound to circle regarding Xiao Daoyuan unceasingly, from beginning to end aimed at Yun Longtao as for the lance point.

On the Yun Longtao face hangs the smiling face, Space Cutting Sword in hand is wielding gently, indeed no longer rubbish, attacked the second sword to Xiao Daoyuan!

After that Xiao Daoyuan activated long spear Spiritual Nature, when Yun Longtao just approached, is similar to a sharp nose wild animal, has launched the attack to Yun Longtao automatically.

“Ding!”

The long spear lance point sewed on the body of Yun Longtao without consulting anybody, was in this moment, the body of Yun Longtao presented that space armor again......

This spear/gun has left a deeply trace above space armor, is unable to break his armor as before, or under strikes, is unable to break.

Saw this, Black Iron Divine Country many Void Tribulation Realm martial artist complexions sank immediately.

Everybody thinks after that Yun Longtao congealed Space Cutting Sword, is unable to congeal this space armor, wants to come to be only Yun Longtao thought before this does not have this necessity.

This fellow has space armor of invulnerability, has to sharply cutting broken myriad things Space Cutting Sword, does this hit? This radically is the non-solution!

Like such that everybody thinks, Yun Longtao that is earnest, gave up the avoidance and defense radically, to the Xiao Daoyuan long spear straight thrust, but Space Cutting Sword in his hand actually unceasingly slides in the space, a sword sword cuts to Xiao Daoyuan.

The third sword, the fourth sword, the fifth sword......

After five swords, the form twinkle of Yun Longtao in the one side, opened along with blood fireworks and firecrackers, is an arm from airborne crashes.

A vision twinkle of Crown Prince is uncertain, in the eye glittered disappointed look, the brow deeply wrinkled, what to do? To go to battle really?

At this time, the Crown Prince vision suddenly fell above the square above a slightly thin form, that person in observing Luo Zheng.
